Authors
Curtis Edmonds
Number of Reviews
74

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Confession time:  I have never, ever seen Gone With the Wind.  I don't
know why, really.  Haven't wanted to check it out on video, haven't been
at home the nights it was on network TV, and it was too far to drive the
last time it was on the big-screen.  So right up front, I'll admit that
I don't know what the heck I'm talking about, but here goes...
Is Titanic the Gone With the Wind of the 1990's?
Maybe that's going a little bit too far.  As good a job as Leonardo
DiCaprio and Kate Winslet do in this movie, they're no Clark Gable and
Vivien Leigh.  But...  the parallels are there.  GWTW was the first
movie to take real advantage of the most revolutionary technology
available -- Technicolor.  Titanic takes revolutionary steps forward in
seamlessly integrating computer graphic design with actors.  GWTW places
America's greatest tragedy in the background of a classic love story,
Titanic does the same with the Atlantic's most legendary tragedy.  They
both have strong-willed redheaded heroines, they both exploit the class
differences between the aristocracy and the slaves/steerage bums, they
were both incredibly expensive and popular...  OK, maybe that's not
enough parallels.
So Titanic's not in GWTW's league.  No matter.  Titanic is a great movie
in its own right, complete with spills, thrills and (especially)
chills.  Much has been made of the humongous cost of the production, and
all of the care than went into making the huge luxury liner come alive
again.  The money was obviously well-spent.  The costumes look great,
the sets look great, the CGI graphics look great.  I especially liked
the expensive little touches, like spending tons of money on authentic
Titanic china only to break it all on the floor as the ship sinks.  But
writer/director/producer James Cameron's real challenge in
writing/directing/ producing Titanic wasn't just costuming and set
design and special effects.  Cameron's major headache was keeping the
audience interested in a tale where everybody knows the ending going
in.  He succeeds masterfully.
Cameron does two things that work incredibly well.  First, he shows us
modern-day salvage operations on Titanic (that's just "Titanic", not
"the Titanic", mind you).  The first glimpse we get of Titanic is the
ship in its present state, corroding slowly away under the hammering
pressure of the North Atlantic, from the window of a minisub piloted by
treasure hunter Brock Lovett (Bill Paxton).  Television coverage of the
exploration of Titanic intrigues 101-year-old Rose Calvert (Gloria
Stuart), who survived the wreck in 1912.  Stuart does a phenomenal job
in a brief role, narrating the story of her experience to a stunned
Paxton and his roughneck crew.
Secondly, Cameron keeps the storyline focused almost exclusively on the
Rose character, and the romantic triangle between Rose (Winslet), her
bastard millionaire fiancee Cal Hockley (Billy Zane) and the
irrepressible young artist Jack Daswon (DiCaprio).  The way that
big-budget disaster movies usually go wrong is to have an all-star cast,
so we see the impact of the disaster on a wide group of people.  Cameron
wisely chooses to stick with Rose and Jack, while paying scant heed to
the celebrities on board.  The supporting cast is professional, but
mostly anonymous -- other than Kathy Bates as the Unsinkable Molly
Brown, there's no moment when you stop and say, oh, yeah, I know him,
what's he been in.  (Although I would like to have seen Colm Meaney in a
White Star uniform, or even as the ill-fated engineer.)
The love story itself is rather conventional.  I think some reviewers
found it weak, and that may be a fair criticism.  The performances are
the key here.  Zane has the meatiest part in the movie, and he plays the
arrogant, condescending steel millionaire to the hilt.  He's smooth, he
looks great in a tuxedo, and he's a convincing enough jerk that the
Winslet-DiCaprio relationship looks plausible.  At the moment when he
sees a little girl too frightened to get aboard a lifeboat, you can hear
the wheels in his mind turning, saying not "Can I save this little
girl?", but "Can she help me get on a lifeboat?"
DiCaprio is a revelation.  I hadn't seen him before in anything, and
didn't know what the heck to expect, really.  (Honestly, I expected a
bad Irish accent, but Cameron evidently decided that was a bad idea, so
DiCaprio plays a poor American artist who wins a ticket in a poker
game.)  DiCaprio exhibits an infectious joy at being alive, and being on
the Titanic, that it's hard not to like him.  From the moment that the
ship leaves port until it hits the iceberg, DiCaprio has to carry the
movie and keep our interest, and he never falters.
Winslet's character grows up a lot during the movie, and so does her
performance.  At first, she's not required to do anything but wear
period clothing and look drop-dead gorgeous.  We know from the narration
that she's monstrously unhappy with her arranged marriage to Zane, but
there isn't any expression of these feelings until she encounters
DiCaprio.  Winslet and DiCaprio develop a chemistry that manages to
propel the movie along until the ship hits the iceberg.
It's at that moment where Winslet's character really comes alive.  Faced
with real danger, she drops her spoiled-rich-girl mannerisms and does a
splendid job.  As  Rose and Jack race around the doomed ship, looking
for shelter from the freezing water and Cal's fiery temper, Winslet
turns in a superb acting performance, mixing courage and compassion and
anger with sheer shrieking terror.
Of course, the most interesting character is the ship itself.  Cameron
has clearly fallen in love with Titanic, and shows her in every mood --
as a deserted wreck, down in the boiler room, up on the bridge, down in
the hold, at the captain's table, down in steerage -- and manages to
bring the great ship back from the dead.  Cameron's greatest gift is
that he allows us to fall in love with Titanic as well.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
"The greatest trick the devil ever pulled was convincing the world he
didn't exist."  So says Kevin Spacey's character in The Usual Suspects,
a far, far better movie than Fallen.  Fallen stands for the opposite
premise:  that the devil walks among us and wants to convince us that he
does exist.  Or anyway, that he wants to convince Denzel Washington that
he exists.
This devil's name is Azazel, and he's by far the most interesting
character in Fallen, by virtue of being the only interesting character
in Fallen.  (In a movie like this, being interesting is a virtue.)
Azazel is left-handed, enjoys injecting people with poison, and likes to
sing a particular Rolling Stones song (no, not Sympathy for the Devil",
but "Time is on My Side").  He has spent the last few years in prison,
possessing the body of a serial killer, and when the killer is executed,
Azazel is free to walk among us, transferring his evil nature from body
to body by touch.
Azazel's motto, as one of the possessed tells us, is "maximum fun".  Fun
for Azazel is tormenting poor homicide detective John Hobbes
(Washington), the only man that he can't enter through touch.  So Azazel
begins killing people in a style reminiscent of the recently-executed
serial killer -- crimes that the baffled Hobbes is called on to solve,
and is eventually suspected of committing himself.
Fallen has two specific obstacles to face, succeding in one and failing
in the other.  The first problem  -- turning a powerful, invisible
spirit into a movie villian --  is handled quite well.  There's a couple
of very nice scenes where we see Azazel transferred from host to host
like the virus in Outbreak.  Also, the people Azazel possesses carry
around a Steadicam with some weird yellow filter on it, so the audience
can see things from the demon's perspective.  And the people that Azazel
possesses are extremely well-cast.  They all have a demonic glint in
their eye when they're playing the part of Azazel.
The second problem is:  how do you make all this interesting?  Well, you
don't.  The main problem with this movie is Washington's character, who
is written to be dull and plodding.  Denzel, like the good actor he is,
dutifully plays his part in a dull and plodding style -- although he's
not able to outdo his partner John Goodman, who's so boring he's almost
narcoleptic.  And the movie ambles slowly along, following Detective
Hobbes along the connect-the-dots plot of the gratuitous little clues
that Azazel leaves strewn everywhere.  There's nothing in the movie to
lighten its leaden tread.
Fallen is Moviemaking Light:  a thriller with no thrills, an interesting
premise with no substance, a decent twist ending that comes about a
half-hour too late, featuring good actors trapped inside a mindless
script.  One wants to ask the writers and producers filmed this
pointless, overlong story, but the answer seems guaranteed to be:  "The
devil made me do it."  The greatest trick this movie could pull off
would be in making us believe that it never existed.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
If Princess Mononoke ever gets an American remake, it will be a western.
I say this not to make some kind of point about The Seven Samurai
evolving into The Magnificent Seven (and I'm sure there are other
examples) but to say that Princess Mononoke is very much a frontier
movie.  I don't imagine that 15th century Japan was all that much like
18th century America, but (at least in this retelling) they both appear
to be frontier societies.
The first thing you need in a frontier society is the technological
progress that allows you to get to the frontier in the first place.  In
America, you have things like the rifle and the Conestoga wagon.  To
colonize Australia, you need a working chronometer and a knowledge of
how Vitamin C wards off scurvy.  To tackle the Japanese forests, you
need to know how to make iron and guns.  The iron in Princess Mononoke
is made at the fortress of Irontown, which serves as the prerequisite
Western town.  (It's even in the western part of Japan.)
But like all Western towns, Irontown is menaced by outside forces.
Unlike Western towns, Irontown is not menaced by outlaws or ranchers or
Indians, but by... er... well.. gods.  Irontown needs iron ore and wood
to make iron, and the forest has plenty of both.  Unfortunately, the
forest also has wolf gods and boar gods and the "spirit of the forest",
none of whom like the idea of people cutting down trees and mining.
In the middle of all this madness walks one lone, silent, honorable man
carrying a terrible curse.  But unlike the guilt carried by gunfighters
like The Outlaw Josey Wales or Shane or Bill Munny from Unforgiven, this
curse has a little more of a physical manifestation.  Prince Ashitaka
(Billy Crudup) carries a horrible, spreading infection, the legacy of a
battle with a boar god.  The boar god was wounded by an iron bullet
fired from an Irontown gun.  Instead of dying, the boar god was consumed
by nightmarish snakelike demons, which caused Ashitaka's wound.
Ashitaka travels to both Irontown and the forest to discover the cause
of the enmity between humans and the gods.
Irontown is a busy place.  It's an island fortress, ruled by Lady Eboshi
(Minnie Driver, with the haughty accent down pat), where the fires of
the forges burn all night.  In an American film, the capitalist owner of
the steel mill would be a villain, and a nasty one too.  In contrast,
Lady Eboshi is a real sweetheart, looking after her employees in a
manner that is both egalitarian and matriarchal.  She even hires women
-- straight from the brothels -- and people with disabilities.  (The
latter employees are lepers, building rifles in the ultimate sheltered
workshop, but hey, it's the 15th century for crying out loud, give her
some credit.)  It's a tribute to Lady Eboshi that the character who
steals the show is Toki (Jada Pinkett Smith), an outspoken, liberated
ex-brothel girl.
We get to the forest before we get to Irontown, though, and it's an
alien world.  It's ruled by the "spirit of the forest", which takes on
all different forms.  The deputy rulers of this forest are Moro the wolf
god (Gillian Anderson) and her three kids -- two wolf, one human.  The
human is San, the Princess Mononoke (the spunky Claire Danes), the
ultimate Woman Who Runs With The Wolves and a supercool ninja to boot.
(There's also a bunch of annoying little ghostly forest elves.)  The
forest gods are rightfully unhappy about their trees being cut down
left, right and center, and they're getting ready for a final battle
with the humans.
Ashitaka walks right into this sorry mess like Gary Cooper, with
Crudup's voice supplying the steely will and moral courage of a true
Western hero.  But unlike a good-guy bad-guy Western, Ashitaka isn't on
one side or the other. Instead, he's looking at the situation with "eyes
unclouded by hate", seeking an elusive harmony between the forest and
the city. Ashitaka sees the goodness inherent in both the forest and the
city and seeks to preserve both the lives of the villagers and the
mystery of the forest.
Observant readers (that's you, right?) will notice that so far in this
review, I haven't mentioned that Princess Mononoke is an animated film.
Nor have I mentioned the name of the director (Hayao Miyazaki) or the
word "anime".  I've done this intentionally.  Princess Mononoke is first
and foremost a good story with some decent characters, and if that's
what you're looking for, don't let the "anime" tag scare you.  People
who know more about Japanese animation than I do (that is to say, anyone
who knows anything about Japanese animation) already know about this
movie and can tell you much more about it than you probably want to
know.  Go see Princess Mononoke -- not just for the stunning animation,
but for what it says about the frontier of all our hearts.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Oh, if life were like the movies, I'd never be blue."
    -- Alan Jackson, "Here In The Real World"

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
I am writing you, well, because I figure I owe you some money.  You see,
I went to see your new movie, Any Given Sunday, the other night.  This
particular theater shows movies that are in their second or third week
of release in this annex on the other side of the parking lot, and
there's usually just one person there who takes tickets and serves
popcorn.  Anyway, when I walked into the annex, that person wasn't
anywhere to be found.  (I confess I didn't look that hard.)  So, I
walked right into the theater without paying a dime.  I'm hoping that
you'll tell me exactly how much of a fraction you'd receive out of the
$7 dollars I didn't pay to see your movie, so I can send it to you.
I'm not all that worried about reimbursing the actors (especially Barry
Switzer), or the theater, or the crew or your investors or whoever else
it is that gets pieces of the pie.  I do, however, want to salute you,
from the bottom of my heart, for your outstanding efforts in creating
Any Given Sunday -- probably the best cinematic practical joke of the
year.
It took me a while to figure out what you were doing, of course, as
you'd expect.  Why, I walked out of Any Given Sunday convinced that it
was a horrible movie, a cliche-ridden mess with hideous, screeching
performances.  At first, the whole thing looked like it was edited by a
pack of genius high school sophomores anxious to try every bell and
whistle on their Ronco Edit-O-Matic.  And the apparent lapses of logic
and common sense were just so grating.  (Not to mention that you managed
to put he-men football heroes like Al Pacino and Dennis Quaid in
aprons.)  How was I to know what you were thinking?
I didn't figure it out until I started writing an amateur movie review
for the movie.  I started focusing on your portrayal of the head coach,
played by Al Pacino.  This baffled me no end, Mr. Stone, let me tell
you.  The media hype you orchestrated had us believe that Any Given
Sunday would blow the lid of the NFL, that it would be a searing expose
of the seamy side of pro football.
And of course, it is, partly.  We see all the things we expect to see --
drugs, women, letting players pay with potentially life-threatening
injuries.  But none of this is surprising, not really, and it would be
hard for you to outdo the really embarrassing things that have already
gone on the NFL's extensive police blotter this year anyway.  (What is
really surprising, to me anyway, is that everybody in the movie is
really, really unhappy, in a be-careful-what-you-wish-for way.)
Anyway, one part of the seamy side -- as made apparent in the firings
this week of real life coaches Chan Gailey and Ray Rhodes -- is the lack
of loyalty shown by owners to hard-working coaches whose talent base
has, through no fault of their own, eroded.  You explore this quite a
bit, but I was having problems with your take.  What had me fooled is
this:  we never see Pacino work.  Oh sure, he stands on the sidelines
and yells.  He talks to players in an avuncular tone when needed and
delivers kick-butt sideline pep talks.  But -- as you know -- this is
not really what coaches do.  Coaches work like dogs all the year 'round
-- running practices and team meetings and looking at film and working
up game strategy and designing plays and dealing with the media and God
knows what.  Pacino doesn't do any of that.  He hangs out in bars and
relaxes in his plush digs and goes to mayoral charity balls and
whatnot.  The only time he gets to talk football is with the team owner,
the whiny Cameron Diaz.  ("The running game!' Diaz complains loudly.
"You're always talking about the boooring running game.  Throw some more
touchdown passes.")
Since Any Given Sunday begins with a quote from Vince Lombardi, it might
be easy to assume that you mean for audiences to identify the Pacino
character with Lombardi, or Shula, or Paul Brown, or any of the great
coaches of the past.  (As a Cowboys fan, I appreciated your having a
Landryesque coach on one of the opposing teams.)  And then I realized:
Pacino's not supposed to represent these other coaches.
That's it, isn't it?  I mean, it's obvious if you think about it.
Football head coaches and movie directors are two peas in a pod.  You
both work too hard and have to deal with burnout.  Most of your real
work is behind the scenes on the necessary drudgery of your
professions.  You both have to deal with prima-donna
actors/quarterbacks.  You both have to deal with team owners/studio
bosses who don't really understand what you do, don't give you the
resources you need, and who scream a you every time you don't put forth
a winning effort.  And you have to deal with fans and reporters who
don't really understand what you do, either, but are the first to
criticize you about it.  (Movie directing must be even worse, what with
all the smart-alecks out there who think they're movie reviewers.)
And... ultimately, you're the ones that are responsible if things go
bad.  Just as NFL owners fire the coach instead of firing the team, it's
the director, rather than the actors, who is at fault if the movie
fails.  (And the actors/players are the ones who get the most credit for
victories, aren't they?  Ask Rob Reiner if you don't know what I'm
talking about.)
This explains why there's so much glitz and so little substance to the
Pacino character, too.  After all, you're not going to make someone who
is playing you less than glamorous, are you?  Of course not.
So -- if I'm right, and this is just a practical-jokey way of making a
biopic about yourself, then it really doesn't matter that the rest of
the movie stinks.  The horrible editing, the annoying, whiny
performances, (excepting Jim Brown as the defensive coordinator and
Jamie Foxx as the young QB) and the wretchedly cliched final game
sequence -- all of these things are extraneous.  We shouldn't worry
about them.  We should just understand the code and enjoy the movie from
there, right?  Right?
Because... well... if I'm wrong, and this is not some sort of joke
you're pulling, that means that this is a really, really bad film with
nothing to redeem it, and... well... that just isn't possible.
Anyway, thank you for taking the time to read this letter, and thank you
once again for filming part of your movie in Texas.  The film industry
is very important ot the Lone Star State, and your movies like Born on
the Fourth of July and JFK have been milestones in our state's cinematic
history.  Good luck on your next picture.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
"The question we need to ask: Is our children learning?"
    -- Governor George W. Bush

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
To understand Rounders, you have to understand the work of Mihaly
Csikszentmihalyi.  Csikszentmihalyi is not a great filmmaker or novelist,
but a professor at the University of Chicago who studies creativity.  He's
best known for his 1990 book, Flow:  The Psychology of Optimal Experience.
Professor Csikszentmihalyi's work focuses on what he terms "flow", that
state where people reach their peak experience.  Flow occurs when our
skills are challenged by demands such that we immerse ourselves in whatever
activity we undertake.  To quote the professor, "Because of the total
demand on psychic energy, a person in flow is completely focused. There is
no space in consciousness for distracting thoughts, irrelevant feelings.
Self-consciousness disappears.  When a person's entire being is stretched
in the full functioning of body and mind, whatever one does becomes worth
doing for its own sake; living becomes its own justification."
For example:  When I was in law school, I wrote two lengthy papers to write
-- fifty-page monsters with hundreds of footnotes, placed just so.  I'd sit
down at my desk and write, and next thing you know, it would be four in the
morning.  I had blocked out everything.  The world had narrowed itself to
me and my notecards and my word processor.
However, I can't claim that I "flowed" my way though law school (sometimes,
I feel like I "slept" my way through law school).  Law school can be an
ugly, depressing, soul-killing time, as Matt Damon finds out in Rounders.
(You knew there was a segue in there somewhere, didn't you?)  Damon plays a
"rounder", a young poker player who prowls the mean streets of New York and
the casinos of Atlantic city like a cat, looking to pounce on unsuspecting
pigeons with more money than ability.  After losing his stake to a Russian
cardsharp named Teddy KGB (John Malkovich), Damon decamps and goes to law
school, working his way through driving a pastry delivery truck.
Damon lands on his feet in law school, finding a cute girlfriend (Gretchen
Mol) and a possible internship with a judge.  But we get the sense from him
that he's not happy, he's not using his skills to the finest.  When his
best friend Worm (Edward Norton) gets out of prison, the lure of easy money
and fast times seduce Damon back into the world of high-stakes poker.  (A
dark, seedy, atmospheric world that's lovingly rendered and presented by
director John Dahl.)
The conflict in the movie is whether Damon will choose Mol and an education
and a career or choose to pursue his talents as a gambler.  What makes
Rounders so compelling is how it makes the latter choice seem more
appealing than it otherwise might be.  There are many factors involved in
Damon's choice -- his loyalty to his friend, his (apparent) struggles in
law school -- but the most important factor is that playing poker puts
Damon in the "flow".  He's able to lose himself in the game and test his
skills against others.  Damon is not playing poker because he's under a
compulsion or an addiction, he's playing because he's good at it and can
take pleasure in stretching his skills.
Rounders is more than just a great illustration of an important
psychological concept, of course.  It features fine performances from Damon
and Norton, who is fantastic as the sleazy gambler Worm.  Norton seems to
have the idea of flow down pat as well, losing his identity and slipping
neatly into the skin of whatever character he's playing.  Malkovich, on the
other hand, delivers a cartoonish performance as Damon's nemesis, who
proves that it's a bad idea to play with your food.
Rounders is a sharp, classy, intellectual picture, buoyed by an intelligent
script, sharp directing, and first-rate performances.  Well, that about
sums it up for this review.  Hey!  It's almost midnight!  Where did the
time go?
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- movienation@xoommail.com
I know it seems ungrateful to discuss a well-crafted, well performed movie
like A Simple Plan on the basis of its flaws, but there isn't another
honest way to do it, and anyway, there's only two of them.  The first one
isn't even anyone's fault.  Originally, director Sam Raimi had tried to
shoot the movie in Ohio, but the script called for there to be massive
quantities of snow everywhere, and it was too warm last winter for that in
Ohio.  Production was moved to Minnesota, where there was plenty of snow.
However, it was easier to change the setting than it was to change the
accents of stars Billy Bob Thornton and Bill Paxton.  As a result, A Simple
Plan ends up looking like Fargo but sounding like Deliverance.
I really don't want to talk about the other flaw.  Partly because it's a
spoiler, and I don't like putting spoilers in movie reviews or critics that
put spoilers in movie reviews.  Partly because you'd never know about it if
you hadn't read the book first.  And partly because, despite the flaw, A
Simple Plan turns out to be a pretty good movie nonetheless.
The book and the movie both start out the same way.  Paxton and Thornton
play brothers Hank and Jacob Mitchell.  Hank is educated, intelligent, and
married, while Jacob is uneducated, dim, and lives alone in a filthy
hovel.  (Thornton's character is dim, but sweet and goofy, a world apart
from his character in Sling Blade.)  They are joined by Jacob's redneck
friend Lou (Brent Briscoe, also from Sling Blade) on a visit to their
parents' grave that turns into an impromptu hunting trip that turns into
the discovery of $4.4 million in used hundred-dollar bills found in a
downed plane.  The "simple plan" of the title is that Hank will hold the
money until the plane is found and it's safe to split the proceeds and
leave town.
A movie isn't a movie without conflict, and conflict soon develops.  Things
aren't helped when Hank's manipulative, pregnant wife Sarah (Bridget Fonda)
enters the picture and proceeds to scheme ways to protect her husband from
the incompetence of his cohorts in crime.  And then, one night, fueled by
booze and distrust, the situation explodes... and this is where the flaw
happens.
The novel, written by Scott B. Smith, is wonderful, but it's very
coldblooded and cruel, much more than the movie.  The filmmakers made the
decision to tone down some of the more evil and heartless aspects of the
novel.  I understand their reasoning, but I can't agree with it.  As a
result of a bad choice midway through the movie, the ending becomes painful
and false.  What should be gut-wrenching and powerful instead becomes
foolish and almost laughable.
I take nothing away from the principal actors.  When the casting was
announced, I thought that Paxton, Thornton, and Fonda were the best team
that could have been assembled, and I still think so.  Paxton does a
steady, workmanlike job in a steady, workmanlike part.  Thornton pulls
another Southern Gothic portrayal out of his repertoire and does his
customary, outstanding job.  Fonda has the most difficult role, changing
back and forth from a nurturing wife and mother to a calculating
conspirator in rapid-fire mode, and she's sharp and convincing.
The performances are enough to recommend this movie, especially accompanied
by the bleak Minnesota scenery which provides an effective backdrop to the
bleakness of the story.  But fans of the book will walk away feeling
disappointed and cheated.  The novel is a classic morality play,
illustrating the limits of greed and corruption, but the movie doesn't come
anywhere near close to reaching those limits.  The real crime in A Simple
Plan is that it isn't evil enough.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
American Beauty:  Only Skin Deep
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Kevin Spacey, not too long ago, helped reintroduce us to the seven
deadly sins in Seven.  In no particular order, they are gluttony,
avarice, envy, pride, wrath, lust, and the other one.  (I'd look it up,
but I'm too lazy.)
Aside from a hearty helping of Lust, American Beauty mostly steers
clears of the deadly sins.  What we see are a laundry list of tacky
little suburban sins.  Stalking the Cute Neighbor with a Video Camera.
Trading in the Camry without Asking the Wife.  Buying Marijuana from the
Kid Next Door.  Saying Mean-Spirited Things about the Gay Neighbors.
And so forth.  Even the Lust is tacky, lending itself more to Jerry
Springer than the stuff of high drama.
In a way, this is appropriate, American Beauty is not truly concerned
with the deadly power of sin at all.  Its focus is on resentment, which
is equally as destructive and deadly without being as much fun.
American Beauty presents a seething, simmering cauldron of resentment,
focusing on one Lester Burnham, played by the incomparable Kevin
Spacey.  Burnham is burnt out, sick of his cubicle and his job and his
smarmy employer.  His family dynamics are replete with the sort of
circular resentment it takes years of therapy to overcome.  It's
spilling over into the real estate practice of wife Carolyn (Annette
Bening) and into  daughter Jane's (Thora Birch) relationship with her
beautiful best friend Angela (Mena Suvari, a tempting enchantress right
up until the time that she opens her mouth).
So much resentment is building at the Burnham house that it's even
sloshing over to next door.  One family, we're told, has already left
the neighborhood because an enraged Carolyn uprooted their sycamore
tree.  ("The root system was on our side," she explains.)  The new
neighbors have their own growing resentments, and these interact with
the Burnham's resentments.  In fact, you'd have to be a sociopath not to
be affected by this yawning ocean of resentments.  American Beauty is
thoughtful enough to provide us one in the person of Ricky Fitts, (Wes
Bentley), the teenage neighbor next door with the video camera.  Ricky
is admirably self-possessed and confident, but creepy -- a young
Hannibal Lecter with a camcorder.
Eventually, with all this resentment floating around, something has to
give.
And when you think about it, this may be a good year to let off a little
resentment.  Check out the Doug Hutchison character in The Green Mile
and see how he unleashes his resentment against an inmate who mocked
him.  Take a look at George Clooney's soon-to-be-cashiered major in
Three Kings, who is driven at least as much by resentment as greed.  Or
the extreme steps taken by John Cusack's character when he resents his
wife's desire for freedom in Being John Malkovich.  To go back to the
earlier part of the year, there's Election and Rushmore, where Matthew
Broderick and Bill Murray experience a lot of the same resentment as
Spacey does here.  And don't forget Fight Club, which oozes with
resentment to about the same extent that it oozes with blood.
Better yet, don't go to any of these movies.  Just stay at home and rent
The Ref.  If you haven't seen it, you're missing out on one of the
funniest comedies of the 1990's.  The Ref features the selfsame Kevin
Spacey, playing Lester Burnham all over again.  Judy Davis is his
frustrated wife, and her character is a close enough duplicate of
Bening's to make one wonder if Davis and Bening have ever been in the
same room at the same time.  In The Ref, a long-brewing cloudburst
between husband and wife is precipitated by the arrival of cat burglar
Denis Leary, who takes the couple hostage in the course of a botched
robbery.  Davis and Spacey engage in this tremendously bitter verbal
duel all the way through the movie, but the resentment level is leavened
considerably by a hilarious script.
Much of the comedy in The Ref comes from the aggravation that Leary (no
stranger to angry resentful outbursts himself) is forced to endure in
listening to the bickerings between Spacey and Davis.  But in American
Beauty, we, the audience, are the outsiders looking in on these
resentful relationships.  Unlike Leary's character, we can't tie up
Spacey and Bening and yell at them to shut up, and more's the pity.
While there's some comedy to be had in American Beauty, (especially one
funny scene where Spacey and Bening confront each other at a fast-food
joint) mostly, it's overwhelmed by the anger and the bitterness and the
resentment.
As a piece of entertainment, American Beauty is just flat-out
disappointing.  For me, anyway, the pervasive level of repressed
hostility and outright resentment seeped over into a resentment of the
movie and all its works, enough so that I couldn't enjoy it at any
level.  The characters are neither likable or sufficiently interesting
or colorful to allow them to get away with unlikability.  The acting
isn't good enough to recommend it, either.  Although Spacey is his usual
wonderful self, he never manages to differentiate Lester Burnham's
character from his overall persona.  Wes Bentley is spooky-good as the
creepy neighbor, but his part is just so odd that it's hard to connect
with him.
American Beauty has been winning a lot of the critic's awards, so
there's very likely more to it than I got out of it.  But it's hard to
see what that might be.  Maybe there's some value to the whole thing
about unveiling the seedy side of suburbia, but, hey, I could've told
you that suburban life is depressing, and it wouldn't have cost you $7,
either.  There's some pretentious talk about the idea of beauty,
illustrated by this little movie of this plastic bag flying around like
the feather from Forrest Gump.  However, all of this claptrap comes out
of the mouth of Ricky the sociopathic neighbor, who walks around filming
dead birds and such.  If there's higher truth or higher meaning in
American Beauty, it's only skin-deep.
According to one of the real-estate signs in the neighborhood, American
Beauty takes place in area code 847, which works out to be suburban
Chicago.  I know this, because I just looked it up, and I can tell you
that I'm disappointed.  Why?  You see, at the beginning of the movie,
Lester Burnham tells us that he's going to die.  Well, he does die.  And
when he dies, I was comforted by the thought that maybe the death took
place in suburban Baltimore, and that maybe, just maybe, Tim Bayliss and
Frank Pembleton would show up at the door and investigate, and that
somehow, this whole movie would turn into a Homicide episode, which
would have improved it no end.
For me, at least, in moviemaking, there are only two deadly sins.  One
is casting Richard Gere.  The other one, almost as bad, is the sin of
not being entertaining.  American Beauty wisely steers clear of the
first one, but commits the second one over and over again.  In the end,
it's enough to make you resent the whole movie.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Chances are, you've either been in this situation or know someone who
has -- or both.  It happens all the time -- a smart, talented, and
bright person who makes a bad decision about a relationship.  There's
always the question, "How could somebody so smart do something so
stupid?"  And there really isn't a good answer to that (not even if
you're the President).  Sometimes your heart gets you into situations
that your head can't get you out of.
Out of Sight is ostensibly a heist movie, but that's not where the real
action is.  The plan is for bank robber par excellence Jack Foley (the
dashing and charming George Clooney) to break out of a Florida prison
and, along with partner Buddy Bragg (Ving Rhames), rob a Detroit
multimillionaire (Albert Brooks, who proves that even multimillionaires
can be schmucks).  And if the movie had been about that, it might have
been a good middle-of-the-road action picture.
Instead, one tiny little thing goes wrong, and that one tiny little
thing elevates Out of Sight far beyond the level of the ordinary.
Deputy United States Marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) shows up at
the jailbreak to deliver a court summons and ends up being stuffed in
the truck with Foley on the long ride back to Miami.  They're in a tight
space, romantically lit by the brakelights, Clooney's hand is on Lopez's
thigh ("but in a nice way"), and even though she's a cop and he's a
robber, and even though he must smell wretched, there are some sparks
there.  It sounds like it's a ludicrous situation for romance to
develop, but it does.  And it's wholly believable on film, even though
it doesn't sound like it on paper.
Example:  There's a scene early on where Clooney and Rhames are trapped
in a Miami hotel, hemmed in by the FBI and a bucketful of slow-moving
senior citizens.  Lopez's job is to watch the elevator and yell if she
spots Clooney.  The door opens, their eyes meet... and she lets him go.
Sounds stupid, right?  But you have to see the way their eyes meet to
understand what they're both thinking, what they're feeling, how things
might work out under different circumstances.  It's a scene where the
actors, deprived for a moment of the routinely splendid Elmore Leonard
dialogue, have to sell the movie -- and they do so effectively.
If the Clooney-Lopez romance was all there was to Out of Sight, it would
still be an entertaining movie.  Clooney is always fun to watch, and
(like Harrison Ford) at his best when asked to play a charming rogue.
Lopez is wonderful, somehow finding a way to be hard-nosed and sensuous
at the same time.  The chemistry between the two is captivating -- but
at the same time, they're probably the least interesting characters in
the movie.  The strength of the movie is in the supporting characters,
parts that are blessed with meaty Leonard dialogue, that are well-cast,
and are entertaining as can be.
You see the craftsmanship in big roles like Clooney's partner Buddy, who
can't stop confessing his sins to his sister.  After his breakthrough
role in Pulp Fiction, Rhames has usually made to play tough-guy roles,
and it's a treat to see him in a meatier part.  Don Cheadle, effective
and smart as a small-screen district attorney in Picket Fences, has the
tough-guy role here, and manages to be menacing and comical at turns.
But even the smaller roles are well done:  Steve Zahn as the stoner
getaway driver, Luis Guzmán (the bartender in Boogie Nights) as a dim
escapee, Dennis Farina as Lopez's overprotective father, Samuel L.
Jackson and Michael Keaton dropping in from parallel Leonard universes.
Out of Sight is a treat, like a big glass of rich hot chocolate during a
Michigan winter.  Intelligent, well acted, well scripted, and with an
eye for human foibles and an ear for snappy dialogue, Out of Sight
delivers what most summer movies seem to have lost in the mail.  Stephen
Soderburgh has created a sparking gem of a movie -- which deserves more
than to be shuffled in with the dull, lifeless films we've seen so far
this year.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
by Curtis D. Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Calvin:  Dad, how come old photographs are always black and white?  Didn't
they have color film back then?
Calvin's Dad:  Sure they did.  In fact, those old photographs are in
color.  It's just that the world was black and white then.
Calvin's Dad:  Yep.  The world didn't turn color until sometime in the
1930's and it was pretty grainy color there for a while.
Calvin:  But then why are old paintings in color?  If the world was black
and white, wouldn't artists have painted it that way?
Calvin's Dad:  Not necesarily.  A lot of great artists were insane.
Calvin:  But... but how could they have painted in color anyway?  Wouldn't
their paints have been shades of gray back then?
Calvin's Dad:  Of course.  But they turned colors like everything else did
in the 30's.
--  Bill Watterson, Scientific Progress Goes "Boink", A Calvin & Hobbes
Collection
There are only two good things about Pleasantville.  One is that it made me
get my Calvin and Hobbes books out of the closet to find that quote.  The
other is the seamless integration of color and black-and-white images as
the small TV town of Pleasantville metamorphizes into a colored world.
Other than that, there's not much to recommend this awkward puzzler of a
movie about a town that struggles as its population and landscape starts to
take on new hues.
We've seen this technique before, most notably in Schindler's List, where
Steven Spielberg chose to color his black-and-white vision of the Holocaust
by showing us the color of a doomed girl's red dress and the bright flame
of candles.  But Schindler's List had a great story to tell -- the color
was just a device to accent two moving and poignant scenes.  In
Pleasantville, the color changes aren't accents, they're the whole story --
and it's not a story that's emotionally compelling in any way.  (Although
the line between Pleasantvillians and the Nazis turns out to be very
narrow.)
Pleasantville draws from two main sources of inspiration:  time travel and
alternate reality.  In this instance, two modern quarreling teenagers
(Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon) are thrust into the alternate
universe of a 1950's television sitcom.  While this seems like an original
concept (or it must have seemed like an original concept to the studio
bosses who greenlighted it), both strands of this genre have been done
before, with better results.  Back to the Future, a less ambitious but more
entertaining movie, effectively showed the culture shock of a modern
teenager coping with a world without MTV.  Peggy Sue Got Married does an
even better job of cultural juxtaposition.
Pleasantville is able to manage only a few pokes at satire in a setting
that's ripe for it -- even the wretched-beyond-words Last Action Hero and
the listless Truman Show managed to skewer their respective targets
somewhat effectively.  The only cleverness exhibited by the script is in
its references to the segregation rampant in the 50's:  the people who have
transformed from black-and-white to Technicolor are branded as "coloreds"
and forced to sit in the balcony of the courthouse.
The problems of Pleasantville have nothing to do with the cast.  Maguire is
given the lead, and he's effective and touching as the leader of the
"coloreds".  He starts out as an uber-geek, a fanatical devotee of the
Pleasantville reruns on a "Nick at Nite" knockoff.  When he wrestles with
his sister for the remote control on the night of the Pleasantville
marathon, he shouts that he's been waiting a year for this -- and we
believe him, and that's very very sad.  Somehow, he matures emotionally
during his stay in Pleasantville, and it's a treat to see his character
transform into a compassionate and sensitive adult.  But his character is a
mass of paradoxes.  Thrust into his ideal fantasy world, he screams to be
let out, presumably to watch the show some more.  He watches the show
ostensibly to bask in the parental love missing in his dysfunctional
family, but we never see him spending much quality time with his parents.
He wants to preserve the town of Pleasantville, but ends up altering it
forever.  We're never sure what Maguire is thinking, or why he acts the way
he does -- a trait, unfortunately, he shares with his fellow townsfolk.
Witherspoon sparks the sexual revolution in Pleasantville and then all but
disappears.  She looks outstanding in black and white, and she makes angora
sweaters look better than anyone this side of Johnny Depp in Ed Wood.  But
she's given very little to do in the second half of the movie, and the
movie is poorer for it.
The Pleasantville parents are absolutely dead-on in their portrayal.
Veterans William Macy and Joan Allen look like they were born to play their
roles of Mom and Dad.  I would have loved to have seen Macy get a little
bit crazy with the whole family-man thing, the way he did in Fargo, but
instead he settles into befuddlement.  Allen is the spouse who gets to
rebel, but her transformation from prim housewife to town scandal happens
so sharply that it's scarcely credible.
Of the other grownups, Jeff Daniels is wasted as a soda jerk with an odd
learning-disability who learns to paint overnight, while the late great
J.T. Walsh glowers effectively in his last performance.  (Don Knotts makes
the least sense of anyone in the whole movie as the TV repairman who sends
Maguire and Witherspoon on their journey:  if he's a comic genius, then I'm
Pauline Kael.)
Pleasantville reminds me of a film that seems to be its polar opposite:
Alex Proyas's brooding nightmare Dark City.  Both films are well-cast, with
outstanding set designs and cinematography emanating from an overarching
vision.  But neither of them has a plot to speak of.  They both lie up
there on the screen like well-dressed corpses, waiting for a spark to
animate them.  Dark City is marginally worse, I suppose, because it's
largely humorless, but it's a close call.
I did like one scene in Pleasantville, where the high school kids stand in
line waiting to go to the library, whose books have miraculously sprouted
words.  Kudos to Pleasantville for encouraging reading.  And that's the
message of this review as well:  Don't watch Pleasantville, read a book
instead.  (And no, sorry, Calvin and Hobbes books don't count.)
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
I am an amateur movie reviewer.  "Amateur", of course, implies two
things -- that I am not very good, and that I am not getting paid.  (All
those who wish to remedy this status, either by telling me how wonderful
I am or by giving me money, are free to do so.)
But being an amateur, I have certain freedoms.  I do not have to see
every movie, whether it's one of those arthouse flicks that gets hyped
on NPR or one of those mindless teen slasher movies.  I do not have to
review every bad movie I see, which meant that I did not have to
chronicle the multiple sillinesses in, let's say, The Thirteenth
Warrior.  (Or, as they're calling it at the studio, the Chapter
Thirteenth Warrior.)
But most importantly, if a movie is really important for me, if it
really speaks to me in meaningful ways, if I can't write a coherent
sentence about it because of the flood of feelings that come washing
through me, I don't have to write a review.  I tried for weeks to write
a Good Will Hunting review before I figured out that I could stop and go
to the next review.  I didn't have to search my emotional thesaurus to
fight the right words to describe how Matt Damon and Ben Affleck's
script affected me.
And I thought, there for a while, that I wouldn't be able to write a
Fight Club review.  I had the first paragraph done, but I got stuck.
"Fight Club is a movie about men and manliness," I wrote, right after I
first saw the movie.  "It is about blood and courage and recklessness.
It celebrates the raw power of men beating the stuffing out of each
other.  It is a macho, savage movie with scene after scene of
bloodletting and violence.  These things are all true, to some degree,
but they do not encompass the movie.  The truest thing about Fight Club
is its resonance, the way it tugs on the little harp strings in your
chest that let you know when something  is... is..."
I thought, there for a while, that Fight Club had a capital-M Message.
A message specifically tailored for bored 30-year-old urban professional
children of divorce.  A message that would ring in our ears and inspire
us. Somewhere in all that high-sounding bombast ("Our Great War is a
spiritual war.  Our Great Depression is our lives.") there was something
that was talking to us.  Something that would be the final word for all
of us lost, soulless Generation X slackers.
The key scene in Fight Club comes very early on in the movie, and is, in
the way, the pebble that starts the avalanche of silliness.  Jack the
Narrator (Ed Norton) starts the movie with a description of his life as
a thirtysomething cog in a corporate machine.  Cogs in machines don't
get to sleep, and neither does Jack, whose insomnia leaves him stumbling
through life.  Jack goes to see his doctor, begging for sleeping pills.
The doctor says no.  (Incredibly, he doesn't seem motivated by any
desire to save Kaiser's prescription plan a couple bucks.)  The doctor
tells Jack that he doesn't need pills, that he's really not going
through any real pain.  Go visit the testicular cancer survivor's
support group, the doc says, and see what real pain is like.
For a long while, I was mad at the doctor.  How dare he be so callous?
Just because Jack (or me) has trouble sleeping, or is depressed about
work and life and the quality of the furniture in our apartments,
doesn't mean that our struggles and our problems and our sense of
emptiness can be dismissed?  Just because our pain isn't as severe as
people with cancer or parents of murdered children or Rwandan refugees
doesn't mean that it's not important, doesn't it?  Doesn't it?
What I think the doctor is trying to tell Jack is two simple, universal
truths:
1.  Everybody's got problems.
2.  Everybody's got to deal with their own problems.
Jack learns the first part of this lesson, but not the second part.  He
begins to infiltrate support groups for diseases he doesn't have,
sucking up the grief of others like a sponge.  It helps him to sleep,
somehow, and gives him an emotional release.  (Thankfully, it gives the
audience some satiric fun, too.)  But it's not a real solution, as is
demonstrated when another faker (Helena Bonham-Carter) starts haunting
the same groups.  And when the real world hits Jack with a real and very
personal catastrophe, he can't use the twelve-steps to sidestep his
pain.
At this point, Fight Club opens the door for Brad Pitt's nihilistic
maniac Tyler Durden.  After a brief meeting on an airplane, Tyler and
Jack somehow form a relationship as balanced as the yin and the yang on
Jack's departed coffee table.  Tyler doesn't have any trouble sleeping.
He's a soap-making entrepreneur (you learn a lot more about the
soap-making process than you want to), outside the system, outside
materialism, outside any sense of right or wrong.
Tyler, himself a walking sartorial sight gag, lives in a trashed-out
nightmare of a house that represents a fantastic step forward in the
lively art of set design.  This house would cause Kosovar refugees to
turn up their noses and ask for a nice, dry tent.  Martha Stewart would
go mad with horror and fear.  This is the kind of house that would make
Bob Vila drop his tool belt and sadly walk away, frustrated by the
magnitude of the opportunity.
Together, Tyler and Durden found Fight Club, where men of all shapes and
sizes can pummel each other senselessly.  I said earlier that I thought
that Fight Club was about men and manliness, which is 100% wrong.  It's
about boys and boyishness.  Men fight, but they fight for reasons, be it
honor or protection of the weak or a multi-million-dollar pay-per-view
purse.  Fight Club is fighting for the sake of fighting, just the way it
took place on the Johnson Elementary playground.  The only thing
different is that no one is stealing anyone else's lunch money.
Fight Club eventually develops into Project Mayhem, which is more
childish but is childishly creative as well.  The men of Fight Club set
up code words and play soldier and get to stay up all night smashing
things.  The audience can, and does, take some juvenile pleasure in
seeing the world's biggest bowling ball run over a Starbucks, but that's
it.  No one in Project Mayhem is dealing with their problems, they're
blowing them up instead.
Fight Club itself has problems if its own that it doesn't deal with,
either.  Fight Club is as nonsensical as a history lesson from Pat
Buchanan or (to be nonpartisan) grand jury testimony from Bill Clinton.
It is lavishly overproduced, with baroque touches like talking penguins
and subliminal film splicing.  Everything is laid on too thick, from the
incessant, whiny narration to the blood flowing from Edward Norton's
nose to Brad Pitt's tough-guy act to Helena Bonham Carter's eyeshadow.
The whole movie screams of excess. (The screaming, unfortunately, is
loud enough to drown out a solid performance by Ed Norton and a dead-on
Winona Ryder impression by Helena Bonham Carter.)
The final verdict on Fight Club is a split decision.  There's a lot to
like and admire about the moviemaking skill that all parties (even Brad
Pitt) display.  If all you're looking for is a fun, mindless movie,
Fight Club may be for you.  But just as there's a message in Fight Club
-- a message that none of the actors heed -- there's also a danger.  The
danger in Fight Club, like the danger in nihilism itself, is that some
people will actually take it seriously.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Moviemaking is a lot like being the general manager of an NFL team in
the post-salary cap era -- you've got to know how to allocate your
resources. Every dollar spent on a free-agent defensive tackle is one
less dollar than you can spend on linebackers or safeties or centers. In
the NFL, this leads to teams like the Detroit Lions, who boast a
superstar running back with a huge contract, but can only field five
guys named Herb to block for him. In the movies, you end up with films
like "Spawn", with a huge special-effects budget but not enough money to
hire any recognizable actors.
Jackie Chan is the Barry Sanders of moviemaking. He spins and darts
across the screen like Sanders cutting back through the defensive line.
Watching Jackie in Operation Condor as he drives his motorcycle through
the crowded streets of Madrid, fleeing an armada of pursuers in
identical black compact cars, is reminiscent of Sanders running for
daylight with the Chicago Bears in hot pursuit, except that Sanders
doesn't have to worry about rescuing runaway baby carriages.
But like the Lions star, Jackie doesn't have anybody to block for him.
Almost every cent that's invested in a Jackie Chan movie goes for
stunts, and as Chan does his own stunts, the rest of the money goes to
pay his hospital bills. This leaves about 75 cents to pay for things
like directors (Chan directs), scripts and dubbing and supporting
characters, not to mention the hideous title sequence. This also
explains why the movie was shot in odd places like Morocco and Spain.
(Chan's first release in this country, "Rumble in the Bronx", was
supposedly set in New York, but was filmed in Vancouver, and in the
chase scenes the Canadian Rockies are clearly visible.) Heck, Jackie
doesn't even have enough money for a haircut, looks like, much less a
personal hairstylist.
In Condor, Chan plays the same character he's always played, himself, a
mixture of Bruce Lee and Tim Allen, a master of both kung-fu and
slapstick-fu. Jackie is sent by the UN to retrieve a cache of lost Nazi
gold in the North African desert, and is chased by a horde of neo-Nazi
sympathizers and two stereotypical Arabs (one of the things I like about
Jackie Chan movies: no political correctness). He is joined by three
women, who have little to do except scream, "Jackie, save us!", and
misuse firearms. The villain is an old Nazi whose legs were broken in
the secret base so that he has to be carried everywhere, and he's more
pathetic than evil.
En route, we have an extended motorcycle chase scene, a hilarious fight
in the Moroccan version of Motel 6 with the neo-Nazis, and two
confrontations with savage natives. Once at the secret desert base,
there is a long chop-socky sequence, followed by the film's centerpiece,
a wind-tunnel fight that's even better than the one in Face/Off.
This is where the money was spent, on well-choreographed kung-fu
sequences, on giant Kevlar hamster balls, on smashed-up crates of
bananas, and on scorpions. Ignore the gaping holes in the plot (how,
exactly, if the villain's legs were broken, did he escape from the
secret Nazi base, and why didn't he take the key with him?). Don't worry
about the production values, or what, exactly, the Japanese girl was
doing hitchhiking across the Sahara. Just go see the movie.
Operation Condor has pretentions of being a "Raiders of the Lost Ark"
knockoff, but one wonders what Jackie could do with the Raiders
franchise blocking for him -- with a Lawrence Kazdan screenplay, a John
Williams score, Spielberg directing and George Lucas producing, Condor
might be an A+ movie. However, you've got to go with what you've got,
and what you've got in Jackie Chan is something special -- a talent that
mainstream Hollywood should, could, and ought to utilize.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange -- http://www.hsx.com
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
One of my favorite television shows ever was a Discovery Channel
documentary on squirrels.  The show was investigating different
contraptions designed to keep squirrels away from bird feeders.  The
plucky squirrels were so successful (after a couple of dozen hilarious
attempts) at defeating the stratagems placed against them that the
producers finally created the world's first Squirrel Obstacle Course.
The heroic squirrel had to make impossible leaps, walk a tightrope,
climb a ladder, and even (I think) pedal a little squirrel bicycle, all
to get to the seeds in the bird feeder.  A true representation of the
triumph of the squirrel spirit.
Primary Colors isn't anywhere near as good as the squirrel show, but the
theme is the same, nonetheless.  John Travolta plays... um... an
empathetic baby-boomer Southern Governor with gray hair and a high, yet
hoarse voice.  The movie is about Governor "Jack Stanton", his 1992 race
for the Presidency, and the various obstacles along his path to the
White House.  Like our friend the squirrel, Stanton has to persevere
through all sorts of odd situations.  We see Stanton soliciting votes on
a New Hampshire streetcorner in the driving rain as if he were homeless
and looking for handouts.  We see him wearing a yarmulke and chatting up
Florida retirees about Medicare and Israel, and dealing with lesbian
hecklers in New York City.  We see him selling satellite technology to
the Chinese... wait, that's for the sequel.
We see a lot of the sheer physical effort it takes to survive a
Presidential campaign in Primary Colors, but the movie is mostly about
the moral effort expended.  Primary Colors raises deep moral questions
in the pragmatic context of politics:  When is it appropriate to run
negative ads?  How do you ask the candidate's wife if he's been sleeping
around behind her back?  If it's moral to research your opponent, is it
moral to use that research against him?  The mantra you hear in election
season is that campaigns should be about "the issues."  To its credit,
Primary Colors is about moral issues and the buffeting those issues
receive on the campaign trail.
It's also about politics.  Political junkies will find much to carp
about in the presentation of politics in the movie -- you never, ever,
not even once hear any reference to fundraising, which is unthinkable in
a novel about campaigning -- however, director Mike Nichols manages to
capture much of the energy, nerves, and confusion that surround a
political campaign.   The set design, from the motel rooms to the
storefront headquarters is authentic in its shabbiness.  The casting is
phenomenal.  The large roles are famously well-cast (especially Billy
Bob Thornton as James Carville), but the smaller roles are filled
imaginatively:  Rob Reiner as a schmaltzy Miami talk-show host, Larry
Hagman as a ghostly Presidential contender, former Dukes of Hazzard
actor-turned-Congressman Ben Jones as a media advisor.
The script follows the famous novel closely -- perhaps too closely --
and although the twists in the storyline are awkward, they parallel the
awkwardness of the 1992 campaign.  I was, for a while, incredibly
distracted by the comings and goings of the assorted staff members, the
subplots that sputtered and went nowhere, until I realized that
campaigning is distracting in just that way, and that real-life subplots
don't always play out.
However, Primary Colors qualifies as a disappointment because what we
see on the movie screen is so at odds with what we know of real life.
Part of this is due to the unhealthy, interest we show in our leading
politicians.  Travolta plays a character based on a man whose private
life over the last six years has been scrutinized to an extent surpassed
only by the fictional protagonist of The Truman Show.  As a result, we
all think we know the President, and although Travolta does a fine job
of impersonation, he doesn't measure up.  Primary Colors gives us
nothing more than a superficial caricature of the real candidate.  His
worst enemies will concede that Bill Clinton is a thoughtful and
intelligent man, well-versed in public policy.  Travolta's character has
no grasp of public policy other than a desire to do big things, very
little personal warmth or charisma, and seemingly compulsive eating
habits.  The vague, buffoonish and broad characterization of the Clinton
character strikes me as more than a little unfair -- and this is coming
from a reviewer who is a confirmed right-winger, mind you.
In the same vein, Billy Bob Thornton may be perfectly cast as James
Carville, but he is wretchedly underused and cheaply stereotyped as an
ignorant redneck, no smarter than the role he played in The Apostle.
Adrian Lester has a smarter role as the narrator/campaign manager, but
he's saddled with a naive idealism worthy of the misfit volunteers who
people the storefront offices and make copies.  Only Maura Tierney, in a
too-brief role as media spokesman, has the appropriate level of
intelligence and cynicism you'd expect from a veteran political
operative.
Paradoxically, both the least and most most crudely drawn performances
in Primary Colors are the best.  Emma Thompson sheds her English accent
to play Travolta's long-suffering wife.  She manages to wrench a
profound and moving performance from the lines she's given, playing a
character with the intelligence, sensitivity and guts to deal with the
stress of the campaign and her husband's cheating heart.  Kathy Bates,
as a political troubleshooter -- or "Dustbuster", as she terms herself
--  is the most broadly overdrawn character in a movie full of overdrawn
characters.  She acts like a cartoon character throughout the movie,
screaming and brandishing guns, she redeems that performance with a
touching and pivotal role in the movie's climax.
But placing these performances aside, the heart of Primary Colors is
Travolta's Clinton.  With the tragic death of Phil Hartman, Travolta may
be the best Clinton impersonator out there today.  It's unfortunate that
Travolta's performance in this movie is more "Saturday Night Live" than
"Saturday Night Fever".  Primary Colors is a dishonest look at a
frequently dishonest political culture, and a misuse of quality actors
and moviemakers.  Nevertheless, there are enough positive things about
the movie to make a trip to the video store worthwhile -- unless, of
course, the Discovery Channel runs that squirrel documentary again.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Genghis Blues (1999)
Genghis Blues:  The Best Movie You Haven't Seen
It was the Year of our Lord 1989 and International Communism in Europe
came crashing down with a thump.  Writer P.J. O'Rourke was in Berlin,
setting aside his usual cynical mien to exult.  "The West won the Cold
War," he shouted.  "The privileges of liberty and the rights of the
individual went out and kicked butt."  O'Rourke saw an impoverished East
German border guard stretching out a skinny hand through the ruins of
the Berlin Wall, begging some raucous students for a souvenir piece, and
he got all choked up.  "The tears of victory rolled down my face." he
wrote, "and the snot of victory did too, because it was an awfully cold
day."
Where O'Rourke was standing, he could still hear the glorious sound of
power tools tearing the Berlin Wall to pieces.  He couldn't have known
that, over ten years later, the triumphant echoes of that sound would
still ring out across the world.  And he would never, ever, have dreamed
that the echoes of freedom would stretch to a little Soviet
mini-republic called Tuva, half a world away from anywhere, and that
they can still be heard in the harmonious echoes of a traditional form
of music called throat singing.
Tuva is a little country on the map, wedged in between Siberia and
Mongolia.  We're told it's about the size of North Dakota, and it looks
to be on the same latitude as Winnipeg.  Its people are nomadic
sheepherders with a religion that's part shamanistic and part Tibetan
Buddhist.  Just as the Tibetans have been squashed by the Chinese
Communists over the years, the Soviets oppressed the Tuvans, forbidding
their clothing styles and culture and even their language.  When the
Soviets folded up their yurts and headed back to Moscow, the Tuvans were
free once more to talk and think and dress as they pleased, and pass on
their unique culture to their children.
But the recovery of freedom in Tuva is not the whole story of Genghis
Blues.
For, you see, Tuva had been free once before, back in the mid-1920s when
the Soviets were too busy fighting the Russian Civil War to pay
attention to Tuva.  The first free Tuvan state might have passed into
total obscurity had not they issued a set of odd-looking stamps.  A
young man named Richard Feynman collected these stamps, and grew up to
be a famously iconoclastic Nobel Prize winning physicist.  He developed
an interest in all things Tuvan (after all, he said, any place with a
capital named "Kyzyl" had to be interesting), but was denied permission
to visit Tuva by the Soviets.  His friends maintained the "Friends of
Tuva" association and were eventually successful in bringing some Tuvan
musicians to play in San Francisco in the early 1990's.
But the unlikely relationship between Americans and Tuvans is not the
whole story of Genghis Blues.
No, the real story is even more unlikely.  For at the Tuvans' concert in
San Francisco, a member of the audience met up with them backstage and
began throat singing a Tuvan ballad in the ancient style.  Paul Pena, a
blues musician who is blind, heard a Tuvan throat singing performance on
a shortwave radio some years before.  Fascinated, he figured out the
Tuvan musical style of throat singing, which involves using the lungs
like bagpipes to create this weird harmonic sound.  Well, the head of
the Tuvan delegation immediately invited Pena to the Tuvan throat
singing competition and cultural symposium in 1995.  Pena left San
Francisco and traveled to Tuva, accompanied by a team of kamikaze
filmmakers and a local radio DJ.
This is the story of Genghis Blues -- the story of the triumphal visit
of Paul Pena to Tuva -- and you won't see a better movie this year.
Now look, I know what you're thinking.  You're thinking that I've lost
my mind.  This can't be the best movie of the year.  It's a documentary,
for crying out loud.  It's got subtitles.  It's about some weird kind of
music that you have to hear to even believe.
I know.  It sounds incredibly goofy.  It sounds like the sort of movie
that your friend the film buff tells you to see that's only playing at a
tiny theater on the other side of town and has Ralph Fiennes wearing
something other than a Nazi uniform or Harvey Keitel not wearing
anything.
But trust me.  This is a great movie.  Let me tell you what happened to
me.  There's a scene, early on, where Pena visits a school in Tuva.  All
these little kids are lined up, and they're demonstrating throat
singing.  After they're finished, they come up to Pena -- who's this
great big shaggy bear of a guy -- and hug him and welcome him to their
country.  And one of these kids is wearing a San Francisco Giants cap,
and when I saw that, I started grinning and didn't stop.
It gets better.  (Not right away, there's a sheep slaughtering scene in
between, but it does.)  There are two scenes in this movie where Pena
gets on stage and performs... and... well, I'm never going to be a
throat singing fan, and if this stuff ever hits the airwaves on anything
other than NPR I'll be shocked.  But that doesn't matter, not one little
bit, because these scenes are electric.  Pena develops this incredible
rapport with the audience that completely transcends the music,
East-West relationships, anything you care to name.
There are those who say that 1999 was a great year for movies, and a lot
of them point to what they call "movie magic".  From a pure special
effects angle, they have a point, and movies like The Matrix and the new
Star Wars movie show a lot of technical wizardry.  But the real magic of
movies is not what's on screen but what's in the heart.  Genghis Blues
is the most magical movie of the year.  It tells an extraordinary story
about great characters in a faraway land, and it does it with the kind
of open, exuberant spirit you don't see in movies anymore.  Genghis
Blues reminds us that movies, like children and music, have the power to
stir the most cynical bean-bag of a heart.  Yes, and to make it dance.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Good fences don't necessarily make good neighbors, but high fences
help."
      -- Hank Hill, WD-40 For The Soul

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
"Our tragedy today is a general; and universal physical fear so long
sustained by now that we can even bear it.  There are no longer problems of
the spirit.  There is only the question:  When will I be blown up?"
William Faulkner, Nobel Prize Lecture, 1950
Faulkner wrote those lines in the years after Hiroshima and Nagasaki, in
the early days of the Cold War, back when the threat of nuclear apocalypse
was real and powerful.  Today, that threat has subsided, leaving us free to
concentrate on the problems of the spirit without fear of imminent
destruction.
Unless, of course, you're in Hollywood.
In Hollywood, the question isn't "When will the world be blown up?" but
"How can we blow up the world?"  In the Decade of the Digital Disaster,
Hollywood has the technical means to blow up the world a dozen times and
still have everyone out of the theater in time to catch Seinfeld reruns.
The only limits to the scope of the apocalypse are the imagination of the
screenwriter and the creativity of the technical wizards.  Together, they
can wreak all sorts of havoc, whether with a large-scale asteroid or a
small-scale virus.
The Matrix, if nothing else, deserves credit for the most creative
apocalyptic scenario so far.  The Matrix plays on two of the themes of the
1990's:  the fear of an impending environmental collapse and the
realization that people are getting stupider as their machines get
smarter.  Eventually, we are to believe, people get so stupid that they
destroy the environment, forcing a new generation of super-intelligent
machines to build... The Matrix.
What is the Matrix?  Well, not to give away too much, but The Matrix is a
giant planet wide virtual-reality simulation in which humanity exists.  As
long as you accept the reality you're given, you're in good shape.  Once
you question that reality, however, things start to happen.  You're no
longer completely bound by that reality.  You can leap tall buildings in a
single bound, for example.  Of course, once you start doing that, the Men
In Black come after you.  (In The Matrix, the Men In Black have guns
instead of neuralyzers, and they can leap bigger buildings than you can.)
The alternate universe of The Matrix is a fun place to be.  It's rendition
of the post-industrial apocalyptic landscape is stylish and as
well-conceived as anything in genre classics like Aliens or The
Terminator.  It's populated by smart, resourceful villains and really
scary-looking alien ships.  It has a good sense of humor and some insanely
well-choreographed action scenes.  The Matrix has everything going for it
except for one thing:  it isn't very good.
The Matrix manages to be less than the sum of its parts.  It starts out as
a top-notch sci-fi thriller, in which super-hacker Neo (Keanu Reeves)
learns the secrets of The Matrix and escapes its evil clutches.  But The
Matrix betrays its promising beginnings.  The last half of the movie is
just your standard cheesy superficial action movie.  While it has very good
computer-driven special effects and some cool stop-motion sequences, it's
ultimately a tedious whirlwind journey where the clichés fly faster than
the bullets.  (Fans of the lets-put-down-our-guns and fight-man-to-man
cliché and the fight-you-never-backed-away-from-anything-in
your-life-fight cliché will feel at home in The Matrix.)
As in other movies in the Digital Disaster genre, the acting isn't that
great.  Most producers simply can't afford to hire talented actors and do
high-tech effects at the same time.  (Steven Spielberg and Tom Cruise's
rumored Minority Report project may be the exception that proves this
rule.)  Laurence Fishburne as Morpheus, leader of the human resistance, is
the best of a bad lot, but does little other than provide atmosphere and
profound-sounding speeches.  Carrie-Anne Moss has the Michelle Yeoh
love-interest-with-an-attitude role, but she does a lot better at acrobatic
computer-enhanced fighting moves than dialogue.  The rest of the pirate
crew can't disguise .  The rest of the pirate crew might as well have
Starfleet red shirts on for all they add to the proceedings.  Only
Australian actor Hugo Weaving, as the leader of the Men In Black, makes any
kind of impression.
Detractors of Keanu Reeves will enjoy The Matrix more than most.  The
Matrix seems designed to maximize Keanu's strengths and minimize his
weaknesses, like talking.  (Fittingly, Reeves does his best acting in a
wonderful scene where he is deprived of the power of speech.)  He does an
awful lot of chopsocky, especially given his twig-boy physique.  There's
nothing especially horrible about his performance -- he's about as good
here as he was in Speed, which may be about as good as he'll ever be --
but one gets the feeling that this is a movie that calls for more.  Reeves
has his entire reality ripped away, a situation that would be tailor-made
for driving most people completely barking mad, but it doesn't seem to
affect him that much.  He doesn't even ask that many questions, even,
accepting the new reality he's given with little curiosity.
But the real problem with The Matrix is not the weaknesses in the plot or
the acting.  Where The Matrix is very concerned with blowing things up, it
pays little attention to the "problems of the spirit" that Faulkner
defined.  While there is some debate in the movie about whether a
comfortable virtual existence is better than an arduous real existence,
there's not a lot of human warmth or interplay in the movie.  Everyone in
the movie seems stiff, almost lacking in affect.  It's almost as though
everyone is trying hard not to outact Keanu (which must have been a
strain).  There are a lot of punches thrown in the latter half of the
movie, but there's no emotional impact to counterbalance the fight scenes.
We can gaze at amazement at the detail of the set design, and marvel at the
technical artistry needed to create the movie, but without some form of
emotional resonance, somewhere, it's not worth much.  The Matrix promises
us a good, filling meal but only serves us eye candy.
To quote Faulkner again, The Matrix "has forgotten the problems of the
human heart in conflict with itself which alone can make good writing".
Instead, it settles for a CGI conflict with an out-of-control video game.
Nothing wrong with that, for people who like such things, but anyone
looking for a real movie will leave The Matrix disappointed.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Safe Men (1998)
For some reason, the rising tide of political correctness in Hollywood
still has not reached stupid people -- forgive me, the "differently
intelligenced".  It's still perfectly PC to make fun of the stupid,
which is convenient, as their ranks grow daily.  Safe Men has no other
purpose, no other reason for existing:  it is doggedly dedicated to
poking fun at its witless characters.  There's no one in this movie with
the motherwit to think themselves out of a wet paper bag.  The problem
is, the filmmakers make the assumption that the audience is every bit as
stupid as the characters.
The movies starts out promisingly enough.  There's a cleverly done
cross-cutting scene to open the movie, where we are introduced to inept
safecrackers Mitchell and Frank and horribly inept singer/songwriters
Samuel and Eddie (Sam Rockwell, Steve Zahn).  Samuel and Eddie's act is
just indescribably bad.  We see them doing their act at a Polish
fraternal lodge.  They're wearing these outfits on loan from the Museum
of Dorkiness, and they're playing some sort of odd technopop that just
beggars description.  This sounds like it could be funny -- like a last
half-hour sketch in a bad Saturday Night Live episode in an off-season
-- but instead, the movie audience has the same embarrassed and
uncomprehending stare that the elderly Poles have.  A conversation after
the show reveals that Samuel is a few links short of a kielbasa dinner,
and that Eddie is only marginally smarter, if that.
The plot begins when Samuel and Eddie are mistaken for the safecrackers,
and are intimidated by the Jewish Mafia into actually robbing safes.
Problem is, the Jewish Mafia is led by Big Fat Bernie Gayle (Michael
Lerner) and Veal Chop (Paul Giamatti) who are, themselves, a couple of
matzo balls short of a Passover dinner.  The plot meanders on from here,
driven entirely by the stupidity of the characters.
Safe Guys isn't just a movie about dumb people doing dumb things, it's a
movie that's been completely dumbed down.  The audience is expected to
believe, during the course of the movie, that:
 -- the appropriate response to a mob death threat is a gift basket full
of country jellies
--  Samuel and Eddie, who aren't bright enough to crack open a comic
book, are somehow able to open safes
--  Big Fat Bernie actually believes that Samuel and Eddie can open
safes, in spite of obvious and manifest evidence to the contrary
-- Samuel and Eddie can't hear the operation of a band saw in the next
room, even with a stethoscope held up to  the wall, but can hear
whispers outside
--  Harvey Fierstein would be a good casting choice as a rival Jewish
gangster
And, of course, there are other sheerly incredible plot points that I
won't reveal here -- all converging in the one central premise that the
audience is a bunch of nitwits, the same as the characters.
The movie is odd in other ways as well.  It is ostensibly set in the
mid-90's, but the clothes and the decor seem to be from a weird
1975-1985 time warp.  Add in the Mafia tie-ins, and it's like a Quentin
Tarantino movie on Ritalin.  The sight gags are numerous and inventive,
easily the best part of the movie -- but not enough to make the movie
funny by themselves.  And the directing by first-timer John Hamburg...
well, let's just say that when I (not the most observant person in the
world) start noticing things like boom mikes appearing where they
shouldn't, there's a problem.
The performances are pretty decent.  Lerner isn't really a figure of
menace as the mob boss, but he isn't one, really, just someone who
spoils his kid rotten.  Giamatti has an eye-rolling monologue early on
about "Lawrence Nightingale Syndrome", but he's mostly wasted as
Lerner's cabana boy.  Rockwell is so convincing as an idiot that he
strays into Keanu Reeves territory.  Zahn might have been convincing had
his character been a shade better written -- as it is, he spends the
whole movie in a battle of wits with Rockwell's unarmed character.
Safe Men is a low-budget independent movie, so it's probably not nice of
me to be knocking it so.  However, there are plenty of low-budget movies
out there that exhibit good writing and interesting characters without
insulting the intelligence of the moviegoer.  Go see one of them
instead.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I went into A Bug's Life with certain expectations, and I was not
disappointed. I expected to see a technically advanced movie, with visually
stunning sets. I expected to see cutesy little characters spouting bad
puns. I expected to hear lots of celebrity voiceovers. And I expected A
Bug's Life to rival it's predecessor, Toy Story, in providing that
ineffable something known as movie magic. If A Bug's Life did nothing more
than meet my expectations -- which it does -- it would be a very good movie
indeed. In movies, and life, you're supposed to expect the unexpected. What
makes A Bug's Life a wonderful movie is the one thing I didn't expect going
in. A Bug's Life just happens to be a grand celebration of something that
seldom gets celebrated in Hollywood these days: The Values that Made
America Great.
First, you need to know that A Bug's Life is about a clash between three
cultural and political systems. We start off with the Ants, who are a
nameless, faceless, Communist horde. (To their credit, the ants are the
nicest, cutest Communists you'd ever want to meet, and they're ruled by
Phyllis Diller instead of Big Brother.) They are opposed by the
Grasshoppers, who are an evil Fascist menace led by Hopper (Kevin Spacey),
who rules Grasshoppers and Ants alike with an iron, er, fist, I guess. The
Ants work like Stalinist shock-workers to gather enough food to feed
themselves and the Grasshoppers.
Along comes Flik, who -- with one exception -- is the digital embodiment of
the American Spirit.  (Save for his voice, which is provided by Canada's
Dave Foley.)  Flik is an Eagle Scout among bugs (yes, they have Scouting in
A Bug's Life).  We know right from the outset that he is smart, creative
and inventive -- we see him with a jerry-built harvester designed to
collect grain more efficiently.  When he accidentally endangers the colony,
he accepts responsibility and tries to stand up to the bully grasshoppers.
He bravely goes forth on a noble quest and returns heroically -- then uses
his daring and ingenuity in the final battle with the grasshoppers.  Flik
is the closest thing to a Frank Capra hero we've seen since Captain Miller
in Saving Private Ryan (and before that, Kevin Costner's Postman, which
makes you wonder where all the Capra heroes have gone.)
Flik is aided on his mission by a wandering troupe of circus bugs, who make
the trip to the ant colony thinking they're there to entertain -- instead
of serving as mercenaries.  The troupe provides all of the other elements
that you'd expect from a Pixar movie:  lots of celebrity voices, physical
humor, and cheap puns.  The top act at the flea circus is at least as
visually complex as the "falling with style" sequence in Toy Story, and the
ending battle with the grasshoppers is as inventive as Buzz and Woody's
final dash for the moving van.  My only complaint is that there are
probably one or two too many circus performers, and the ones who are most
interesting (say, Bonnie Hunt's black widow) don't get enough screen time.
However, this is a minor quibble, and in no way should affect my admiration
for the hard work of the Pixar team in bringing us this lively holiday
gift.  A Bug's Life is a labor of love in an industry that all too often
takes the quick and dirty approach.  Best wishes to them and to their
marketing department, which is now, I'm sure, busy selling little Flik
dolls... because capitalism is an American Value too.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The 1990's will be remembered in twenty-first century film schools as
the Decade of the Digital Disaster.  This is the time when new advances
in computer graphics and modeling are leading to... well, not bigger and
better movies, but bigger and better explosions, anyway.  Like any good
group of little boys, the disaster moviemakers are using their powerful
new tools to take things apart and blow them up.  Want to see the White
House explode by an alien attack?  Want to see a great green atomic
lizard flatten New York skyscrapers?  Want to see a giant tidal wave
wash away the Brooklyn Bridge?  You want it, the CGI boys can do it.
(Although God knows why they're so hard on New York.)
But it's one thing to have these new toys, and quite another to make
good movies with them.  Snappy computer graphics can't save movies
without believable storylines or interesting characters -- case in
point:  Alex Proyas's Dark City -- while the same quality graphics
integrated with classy acting and writing (and all the other things that
Titanic had going for it) can make a movie magical.
Somewhere right in the middle is Deep Impact.  The graphics quality is
first-rate, although most of it is at the end of the movie, and the
filmmakers wisely limit the scenes of death and devastation.  Deep
Impact takes the road less traveled in disaster genre movies, choosing
to focus on people and their relationships instead of action and
suspense.  While other movies have concentrated on the wholesale
destruction of landmarks and cities, Deep Impact saves much of its
concern for the destruction of families and friendships.  While it's
possible to sit back, munching popcorn, contemplating the destruction of
a digital Manhattan with an awed "Cool," there's something moving about
the ending of human relationships, no matter how badly or inexpertly
handled.
The problem with Deep Impact isn't the genuinely touching and wrenching
moments, easily the best part of the movie.  The moments and the
emotions would be there no matter how well the movie was written.  The
problem is that the people we follow throughout the movie almost seem to
be chosen at random: the crew of the space vessel sent to stop the
comet, the family of the teenage astronomer who discovers the comet, the
MSNBC news team who follows the story:  The end result is something
reminiscent of Tim Burton's Mars Attacks!, another end-of-the-world epic
with a large and unwieldy ensemble cast.  (Any other similarity is
incidental, Deep Impact is nothing if not sincere, and levity is sorely
lacking.)  And by picking a large number of ordinary people to suffer
through the end of the world, what you get is a very ordinary movie.
It doesn't really help that almost everyone in the movie is a refugee
from NBC's Thursday night lineup.  (It certainly doesn't help that the
MSNBC network is referenced at every conceivable point.)  Most notably,
you have Tea Leoni (The Naked Truth), a gifted comic actor who looks
woefully stiff and out of place behind the anchor desk.  Throw in Bruce
Weitz (Hill Street Blues) and Laura Innes (ER) on the news team, and Ron
Eldard (ER), Blair Underwood (L.A. Law) and Jon Favreau (Friends) aboard
the oddly-named Messiah spacecraft, and what you have is a Must See
TV-Movie.
The two leads are, thankfully, America's Greatest Actor -- Morgan
Freeman -- and Robert Duvall, who's not that far behind.  Unfortunately
-- and this is a chronic complaint of mine -- neither of them are given
enough to do.  Freeman is the President, but (outside of an early
conflict with Leoni) he is never seen doing anything Presidential.  He
is the oracle, the narrator, providing reassurance, oratory, and plot
points.  Which is fine, and he's great, but it's not enough.  On the
other hand, Duvall is at the heart of the action, aboard the spacecraft,
and he is -- Chuck Yeager!  Yes!  Supercool, lollygagging around up
there in outer space, the sole standard-bearer for Tom Wolfe's righteous
stuff, all ready for the next comet landing or spark plug commercial...
and it's a mold that he never breaks out of.  I suppose parts like this
are the price that Duvall -- and the rest of us -- have to pay for the
privilege of movies like The Apostle, so I won't comment too severely on
his choice of scripts.
The one thing I took out of the theater from Deep Impact was the
sterling quality of the THX system in Austin's Lincoln 6 theater.
Whenever the camera pans past the comet in space, the THX emits this
rumble that made the walls shake -- sort of like a low-level
Sensurround.  (Never mind that real comets couldn't possibly make that
rumble in the soundless vacuum of outer space.)  Despite the movie's
refreshing attention to relationships over explosions (there's only one
completely mindless and extraneous explosion, early in the film), when
the standout part of the movie is the sound system, something's
missing.  There's a lot missing from Deep Impact, a perfectly ordinary
and middle-of-the-road disaster flick in every regard.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
If Snake Eyes were a dog, you'd put it to sleep.  If it was a couch,
you'd put it out on the sidewalk, where it would sit for a week.  If it
were your child, you'd be reading military school catalogs.  If it were
a ship -- no, it wouldn't be the Titanic, that would imply glamor and
tragedy -- it would be the Exxon Valdez.
(Personal side note:  I saw this movie on the road during a Houston
business trip.  For whatever reason, my hotel's cable system wasn't
showing the Astros-Braves game, which featured a Randy Johnson-Greg
Maddux matchup.  This forced me to pay full price for Snake Eyes instead
of watching a perfectly good baseball game for free -- so the invective,
deserved as it is, should be seen in that perspective.)
Snake Eyes is supposed to be a mystery movie, and good mystery movies
are supposed to leave you asking yourself questions on the way out of
theater.  Snake Eyes is not a good mystery movie, but I had some
questions:  Where's the manager, and how do I get a re-admit pass?  If I
fall asleep on the drive home and wreck my rent-a-car, can I sue Brian
De Palma?  Is it too late for the Academy to revoke Nicolas Cage's
Oscar?  Will someone please (I'm begging you) give Gary Sinise a role
worthy of his talents?  And how, exactly does Cage end up wearing the
exact same shirt and tie as Sinise does?
The first and most glaringly wrong thing with Snake Eyes is the
trailer.  If you've seen the trailer without seeing the movie, consider
yourself fortunate.  The trailer is a work of sheer genius.  It manages
to convey everything worthy of the movie -- the noteworthy Steadicam
work, the exuberance of Cage's performance as a thoroughly corrupt
Atlantic City policeman, the essential elements of the marginal plot.
The expert craftsman who pieced together a fairly good trailer out of
snippets of a wretched movie deserves praise and a percentage of the
gross.  (Is a Best Trailer category at the Oscars that far-fetched,
after all?)  But all it does is set us up for an overwhelmingly
disappointing movie.
The trailer sets up what should have been a promising plot:  Detective
Ricky Santoro (Cage) must solve the mystery of who shot the Secretary of
Defense at an Atlantic City pay-per-view boxing match.  Unfortunately,
there are multiple problems afoot.  The trailer gives away much, too
much of the story.  The shooter is killed instantly, so the story
revolves around why the Secretary was killed and who is involved in the
conspiracy.  The film's secret is ho-hum at best, and anyone who has
watched the trailer and is aware of the Law of Economy of Characters can
figure out who the top conspirator is.  Without an interesting plot,
without interesting dialogue, and without much of a reason to care about
the characters or the story, Snake Eyes is a failure on almost every
possible level.
As much as I hated this movie, I must give Brian De Palma one tiny bit
of credit.  De Palma is maddeningly inconsistent.  He can, on his day,
create amazingly well-done movies (The Untouchables, Carlito's Way).  On
off-days, he can be, well, just horrid (The Bonfire of the Vanities,
Raising Cain).  Snake Eyes falls into the horrid category, but there are
a couple of moments that are worth seeing strictly for their film-school
degree-of-difficulty value.  The Steadicam opening scene does a good job
of introducing the Cage character and is a virtuoso technical job by
both the director and the actor.  There is a split-screen chase scene
that looks pretty good, and it's followed by a God's eye view of a bank
of hotel rooms that's imaginitively done.
This is what's called giving the Devil his due.  But the technical skill
doesn't even come close to making up for the sheer evil of this movie.
Placing plot holes to one side for a moment, Snake Eyes features easily
the worst boxing match in cinema history (George Foreman is in better
shape than the movie boxers), a hurricane that exists for no other
reason than to punctuate significant plotlines with portentuous
thunderclaps, and perhaps the worst, most overly drawn out ending in
years.
Snake Eyes is a criminal act, an evil waste of time and talent.  Cage,
Sinise, and yes, even De Palma deserve better.  The audience deserves
better -- but no refund, no re-admit pass, no free popcorn coupon, can
ever restore to us the time we've spent or wash the awful images from
our mind.  However, we are left with one consolation, that we were
warned by the movie's title -- because Snake Eyes is nothing more than a
roll of craps.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
To quote Johnny Caspar, it's all about ethics.  If you're an ethical movie
reviewer, you don't give away secrets about movies, you don't spoil the
plot for others, you don't say grandly effusive things about wretched
movies.  (If you're an unethical movie reviewer, of course, you get to see
your name plastered on newspaper advertisements.)  If you can't trust your
friendly neighborhood movie reviewer, who can you trust?  Otherwise, "then
you're back with anarchy, right back in the jungle."
So, no, I won't tell you the secret of The Sixth Sense, even though I would
like to.  I will tell you that I figured it out early on, and that I think
you'll enjoy the movie a lot more if you don't try to figure it out for
yourself. The real question about The Sixth Sense is not about the secret,
not really, but about whether the movie is worth seeing if you know the
secret.  Three of the best secretive movies of recent years -- The Usual
Suspects, Seven, and The Crying Game -- still hold up after repeated
viewings, mostly on the strength of the performances and the script.  On
the other hand, once Michael Douglas's The Game ends, there isn't much
point in going back to the rental counter for another look.  The quality of
the movie is more important than the quality of the secret.
The Sixth Sense is a quality movie because of the quality performances of
Bruce Willis and young Haley Joel Osment.  Willis plays a Philadelphia
child psychologist, dedicated to his work.  The dedication is tested when a
former patient breaks into his house and shoots him before committing
suicide.  A year later, Willis finds young Cole Sear (Osment), exhibiting
some of the same symptoms as his previous patient.
Apart from an early scene where Willis engages in some Dr. Seuss-style
banter (reminiscient of his old David Addison role on Moonlighting) with
Olivia Williams, Willis operates through the movie in Sincere Mode.  The
beautifully counterpointed script has him doing one of two things:  he's
either in session with Cole, or trying to make up with Williams (Rushmore),
who has been depressed and distant ever since the shooting.  Willis in
Sincere Mode is usually a bad sign -- The Jackal springs to mind -- but,
fortunately, Sincere Mode in The Sixth Sense contains a lot of
vulnerability that leads us to some very poignant scenes.
Most of those scenes are with Osment, an 11-year-old actor who's getting
rave reviews for his performance, not to mention the early lead in the Best
Supporting Actor race.  (He's in Sincere Mode too -- in fact, the whole
movie is so sincere it should be expecting a visit from the Great
Pumpkin.)  Osment has to convince us about halfway through the movie that
he "sees dead people" -- a tough job, considering that we haven't seen any
of the dead people he sees, not to speak of, anyway. But, of course, we
believe him, because we've seen him stopped, time and again, by some
nameless fear that we can't see.  Later, we get to see a lot more of these
ghosts and understand what is scaring Osment so badly, but his performance
does an excellent job of conveying the unseen terrors that make the movie
work.
How good is Osment?  I don't want to throw on superlatives here (The Sixth
Sense is kind enough to have a character that's a spoiled brat child actor,
probably as an object lesson) because we all know what happens to child
actors who get too many superlatives too soon.  I would, however, like to
take this opportunity to mention (in case Osment's agent is reading this)
that there's a book out there by Orson Scott Card called Lost Boys that
I've always wanted to see be made into a movie, and that requires a young
child to play a character who may be in touch with the supernatural.  (I
still think that Jake Lloyd is a better fit for Ender's Game, another Card
novel that requires a young protagonist.)
Add to these two great performances a great job of writing and directing
(and acting, in a brief scene) by M. Night Shyamalan, the atmospheric look
of Philadelphia in fall, and good supporting work by Olivia Williams and
Toni Colette, and you've got a very good movie, one that's worth seeing
again, even if you know the secret.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The best thing -- in fact, the only good thing -- I can say about Dark
City is that it made me want to go see L.A. Confidential again.  Or go
rent Body Heat, to see William Hurt do some real noir.  Or even -- God
help me -- Palmetto.
Alex Proyas's new movie screams atmosphere.  I screamed, too, "Get me
out of this theater!"  New Line Cinema spent millions of dollars
creating the expressionistic film noir visuals and paying the actors,
and doesn't have any way to get it back.  I paid $4.25 for a matinee
screening and don't have any way to get my money back, either.
You'll hear a lot from other critics about the look and feel of this
movie.  I will admit that the cinematographers and costume designers and
set artists and CGI graphics geeks all worked hard to create a stunning,
nightmarish future world where it's always a late night in 1948,
complete with rotary phones and automats and fedoras. I've got news for
you fellows -- I don't care how hard you worked, or how visually
stunning this movie looks -- you wasted your time and mine, working on a
movie without a plot, without a clear sense of direction of where it
wanted to go, without a soul or a reason to care.
The movie starts out oh-so-promising.  John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) is
lying in a bathtub in the sort of seedy hotel that in real life, would
have been boarded up long ago.  There is a dead, mutilated prostitute in
the other room -- a surprise, as he has lost his memory.  The phone
rings:  it's a sinister-sounding man, claiming to be his doctor, telling
him to flee for his life.
All well and good, right?  Wrong.  Apparently, someone decided that the
audience was just a bit too dim to figure out the intricacies of the
plot.  (This is getting to be a popular assumption in Hollywood.)  So,
the actual beginning of the movie is not Sewell running for his life,
rather, it's a voice-over narration by the aforementioned doctor (Keifer
Sutherland) explaining exactly what is going on and who is responsible.
It's as though Sam the piano player had told us that Rick and Ilsa had
been getting it on in Paris in the first three minutes of Casablanca.
No, wait, that's not fair to Casablanca.  It's more like watching a new
plotline at the first of the show -- or if you want to know how I really
feel, having an off-screen narrator explain that Gilligan won't be
getting off the island in this episode.
>From here, the coherence of the plot goes down faster than (insert
Monica Lewinsky joke here).  The characters just wander around the city
aimlessly and bump into each other for no apparent reason, and that's
what moves the plot.  What we're left with is a string of unanswered
questions that don't make any sense.  We're given aliens with unlimited
omnipotent powers, yet they forget to use them at critical moments and
get themselves killed.  We're given a hero who can "tune" into these
same powers, yet he only uses them when it's convenient to the plot.
We're given a whole long list of loose ends that go nowhere
Usually, critics will say that an actor playing an underwritten part
"isn't given much to do."  In this movie, no one is given anything to
do.  Sewell is given the impossible role of a man who doesn't remember
anything, and plays it like... um... a man who doesn't remember
anything.  The aliens are tall, pasty-faced, and bald, and wear long
black cloaks and fedoras to remind us that they're evil -- and there's a
child alien as well, straight out of an Anne Rice novel.  Sutherland is
saddled with a limp, a twitchy eye, and a breathy accent to remind us
that he's in league with the aliens.
To its credit, Dark City boasts two impressive bits of casting.  William
Hurt is perfectly cast as the world-weary inspector charged with
catching the man who is murdering prostitutes all over the city.
Jennifer Connelly, playing Sewell's love interest, is given two
all-too-brief moments on screen as a lounge singer -- and turns in the
sexiest performace this side of Jessica Rabbit.  But instead of the
dogged policeman and the femme fatale given central treatment in the
script (the way they would be in any self-respecting noir movie) they're
almost tangiential to the plot, such as it is.
The problem with Dark City is this:  it's a bad science fiction movie
pretending to be film noir.  The essence of film noir isn't, as Proyas
seems to beleive, breathy dialogue or snap-brim fedoras or tall, bald
evil villains who would make Peter Lorre curl up in a corner.  Dark City
has not one bit of intrigue, moral ambiguity, suspense, or anything else
that keeps us coming back to the noir classics.
Dark City is like the intricately carved door that Kate Winslet floats
on in Titanic.  It's an exceptionlly well-made and intricately designed
piece of flotsam, sailing around and around the middle of the ocean,
going nowhere.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
It's easy to dismiss U.S. Marshals.  It's nothing more than a sequel to
The Fugitive, a far superior film.  Wesley Snipes, while passable as
fugitive Mark Sheridan, is no Harrison Ford.  The supporting cast blends
into the scenery as though they were wearing camoflauge.  The plot is
paper-thin, and the movie's big surprise is obvious from the first reel.
You can make all of these criticisms, and you would be quite right and
justified to make them.  No matter.  For all its flaws -- and it has
many -- U.S. Marshals has Tommy Lee Jones as Deputy U.S. Marshal Sam
Gerard, and that's all it needs to be a success.
I say that because U.S. Marshals -- even though it recycles Gerard's
character from The Fugitve -- is not that movie's spiritual heir.  U.S.
Marshals is actually looking past The Fugitive, all the way into the dim
reaches of time, to the days when Inspector Harry Callahan still walked
the foggy streets of San Francisco.  This, my friends, is a Dirty Harry
picture.  And if anyone out there is qualified to fill Clint Eastwood's
brogans as this generation's police action hero, it's Jones.  Jones has
the same killer stare, the same charisma, the same dry sense of humor as
Eastwood did in his prime.
And like Eastwood, Jones can carry a movie all by his lonesome, as he
has to here.  Jones got a richly-deserved Oscar for his turn as Gerard
in The Fugitive, and his acting is the same quality here, even if the
film isn't.  He's not given any of the memorable lines of dialogue he
had in the last movie ("My, my, my.  What. A. Mess," or "Think me up a
chocolate donut with some of them sprinkles," or even "I don't care!")
but it doesn't matter.  Even in a ludicrous chicken suit in the movie's
opening scenes, he's got a magnetic screen presence that saves U.S.
Marshals from being hideously bad.
I'm not going to recapitulate the plot here because there isn't one,
it's just Jones chasing Snipes.  The action sequences aren't especially
well-done, and they're shot full of cliches where they make any sense at
all.  (One wonders, for example, how the shackled prisoners on the
"Con-Air" type transport are supposed to get their chained hands up far
enough to reach the oxygen masks that fall as the plane crashes.)  The
relationship between Jones and his team isn't as interesting as you
might have thought from the first movie -- but even at that, it's more
interesting than the relationship between Snipes and his girlfriend,
French actress Irene Jacob.
This is a very bad movie with one great performance that redeems it.  My
advice is to disconnect your brain, forget there ever was a movie called
The Fugitive, get some popcorn and enjoy the movie for what it is.  U.S.
Marshals may or may not make your day, but all of us punks have to feel
lucky that Tommy Lee Jones works as hard as he does.  (When does MIB2
come out again?)
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
An early Wednesday evening at home.  Walk in the door, open a bag of chips,
check e-mail.  Nothing interesting, much.  Change clothes, put on running
shoes.  Walk outside.  Raining too hard.  Walk back inside.  Decide to wait
and see if rain stops.  Turn computer monitor back on, pull up game for a
few minutes.  Rain gets heavier, thunder gets louder.  ZOT!!!  Power goes
off.  Power stays off.
Hunger builds, dinnertime approaches.  No microwave, no oven, no
refrigerator, even.  Dry cleaners close at seven.  Walk to car in driving
rain, start engine, get to dry cleaners five minutes before close.  Still
hungry.  Stop by Chuy's, get chicken enchiladas in green chile sauce.  Have
to stop eating like this.  Diet starts soon.
Rain stops on drive home.  Check mailbox on way in.  Get electric bill.
Chuckle at irony.  Get dry cleaning out of car.  Rain stops.  Walk in door,
power still not on.  Open window, read paper until too dark to read
anymore.  Power still not on.
True Crime starts in twenty minutes at dollar theater.  Clint Eastwood
stars and directs.  Better than sitting around in dark room.
Drive to movie theater, arrive as previews start.  Trailer for The Mummy
looks cooler than expected.  Never Been Kissed trailer looks stupid.
Wonder who would ever want to go back to high school.
Movie starts.  San Quentin Prison, exterior scene.  Didn't know San Quentin
was on the Pacific.  Scene where warden talks to condemned criminal.  Blah
sort of scene.
Here is Clint, at a bar, with a young girl.  Clint drinks a tall drink with
a stalk of celery in it.  Wonder how much celery a bar goes through in a
week.  Clint chats up the girl, tells her he stopped drinking, hits on her
a little.  Girl feels uncomfortable, leaves bar, drives away.
Girl is driving drunk in the rain.  Worse yet, girl decides to change radio
stations.  Girl comes up on Deadman's Curve, spins out, dies in horrible
preventable car crash.  Yet another innocent life sacrificed to make a
corny plot point.  Wonder when we will ever learn from these tragedies?
Clint is needed to replace girl on story about imminent execution of
condemned criminal from first scene.  James Woods and Denis Leary talk bad
about Clint behind his back.  Woods actually looks like he's doing a Denis
Leary impression.  Denis Leary glowers a lot, not wanting to upstage Woods
while he's doing his Denis Leary impression.
Clint comes into newsroom and is shocked and horrified over girl's death
for about two minutes.  Clint starts to investigate story, asking questions
about murder that the condemned man allegedly committed.  Clint stops to
light up cigarettes over protests of co-workers and to have a boring
conversation with his secretary about sexual harassment.  Wonder if anybody
ever told Dirty Harry Callahan to stop smoking.
Clint also calls his wife, who is Diane Venora, who was pretty good in The
Jackal, which was otherwise pretty bad.  Clint's wife reminds him to take
his daughter to the zoo.  Clint intersperses investigation into innocence
of condemned man with family life, doing neither well.  Dirty Harry
Callahan never would have stopped to take anyone to the zoo that he wasn't
feeding to the tigers.
Scenes go in in prison in the meantime.  Michael McKean plays a
smarmy-looking prison chaplain who gives a bad name to chaplains
everywhere.  The warden and the prison guards are nice enough people, doing
their jobs.  The condemned man shares some awkward moments with his
family.  He decides to have steak for his last meal.  Would choose some
more of those chicken enchiladas myself.
Clint drives around Bay Area, confronting people.  Eventually, he confronts
the condemned man (Isaiah Washington), who explains why he is not guilty.
Clint believes him, so he must not be guilty.  Can Clint save him before
time runs out?  Remind self that Clint is the director and the producer and
Clint can pretty much do what he wants.
Finish watching movie.  Marvel at silliness of ending.  Wonder if this is
just a potboiler for Clint to make other, better movies.  Hope that this is
indeed the case.  Respect the quality of Clint's acting, and the good work
of the supporting cast, but wonder what the screenwriter was thinking.  Ask
self if this was really better than sitting alone in a dark room waiting
for the power to come back on.
Leave theater disappointed.  Drive home.  The power is back on!  Write
review, reset clocks, go to sleep.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Of the major horror sub-genres, vampire movies are easily the most
adaptable.  Think about it.  Frankenstein movies haven't changed all
that much because they still need that mad-scientist-in-Bavarian-castle
setting.  If you made a Frankenstein movie today, you'd have to have the
monster be a virus or something -- and outside of Michael J. Fox, there
aren't any actors that could play a virus convincingly.  Movies about
mummies would still have to be set in Egypt.  There's not much you can
do with werewolves except take them to London or Paris, unless you want
to have a teenage werewolf or something.  (And there's that Michael J.
Fox thing again.)
But you can have vampires do anything, and you can place them in any
genre you want, just about.  You can have traditional vampire movies
(Bram Stoker's Dracula) or have the Anne Rice version (Interview with
the Vampire), or play it for laughs (Vampire in Brooklyn).  You can put
vampires in locales from sunny Southern California (The Lost Boys) to
squalid Mexican dives (From Dusk Till Dawn) to your local high school
(Buffy, the Vampire Slayer).  Were it not redundant, you could have a
movie about a law firm full of vampires. Any day now, I expect we'll see
a movie about a vampire third baseman who has to decide whether to play
a day game in order to break the home run record.
Or, you can insert the vampire legend into a Hong Kong action movie --
and when you do that, you get Blade.  Wesley Snipes has the Chow Yun Fat
role in this movie -- the silent, expressionless hit man who destroys
everything in his path.  In this case, the everything happens to be
vampires that explode into CGI shards instead of dead, bleeding
corpses.
Snipes has less to say here than as the fugitive in U.S. Marshals, but
does a demonstrably better job here as a half-vampire wreaking vengeance
on the bloodsuckers.  Blade is a silent, brooding presence, laying waste
to vampires without a shred of remorse.  He is as cold as his
silver-bladed sword, as single minded as his garlic-filled bullets.
Yet, he's not without quirks:  Blade drives a battered muscle car and
has to glean Rolex watches from his vampire victims in order to stay
solvent.
Like any good Hong Kong movie, Blade is heavy on the chopsocky action.
For some reason, Blade spends a lot more time using his kung fu artistry
than using the traditional anti-vampire weapons of garlic and silver.
(Blade dismisses a man-portable arc lamp as being too heavy, although it
looks to be a more efficient tool to dispatch vampires.)  Unfortunately,
the guiding hand of John Woo is absent from this film, relegating Blade
to the status of The Replacement Killers, which it most strongly
resembles.
The Replacement Killers is the last movie I saw that I didn't review --
mostly because it made no impression on me, and I couldn't remember
anything other than noise, violence, and the intensity of Fat's
performance.  Blade has a little more going for it, and has the vampire
myth to draw from -- but other than that, it's the same kind of movie --
exciting, with well choreographed action scenes, but with no
resonance.
With a stronger villain (Stephen Dorff is (pardon the pun) curiously
bloodless as the head vampire, leaving us to wonder what Denis Leary
might have done with the role), a wittier script, and a strong
supporting cast, Blade might have been able to rise beyond the level of
commonplace summer entertainment.  As it is, Blade is an average action
movie that serves to do nothing but remind us that the summer movies
just keep getting dumber and the vampire movies just keep multiplying.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
The year was 1990, the movie was Miller's Crossing, and the man was
Gabriel Byrne.  Byrne had the plum role of Tom Reagan, Irish gangster, a
smart guy in a tough town.  Byrne spent the whole movie laconically
spitting out hard-bitten Coen Brothers dialogue as if he were born to
it. He didn't have the Bogart charm but had all the Bogart flair, with
the cynical coolness thrown in.  Miller's Crossing didn't break any box
office records but has its place on many critic's ten best of the '90's
lists.  (Personally, I like Miller's Crossing better than Fargo, the
Coen Brothers movie that made the AFI 100 list.)
The year was 1993, the movie was True Romance, and the girl was Patricia
Arquette.  Arquette played Alabama Worley, who hooked up with Christian
Slater on a cross-country road trip in search of a better life through
drug trafficking.  True Romance was the movie that introduced us to a
young screenwriter named Quentin Tarantino, and there hasn't been a more
attractive performance in any Tarantino movie than Arquette's.  True
Romance is no Pulp Fiction, of course, but it has lots and lots of
things to like.
Hold on to these memories.  You'll need them if you go see Stigmata.
Arquette plays Frankie Paige, a Pittsburgh hairdresser working in the
Dennis Rodman Memorial Beauty Salon, offering a wide range of services
from hairstyles and manicures to tattoos and piercings.  Frankie is a
twenty-three year old party girl (Arquette is actually 31) hanging out
in the best dance clubs and coffee houses.  She lives in the type of
fabulously decorated Art Deco loft apartment you only see in the movies.
Arquette's mother (who we must assume is paying for all this) travels to
Brazil and sends her the rosary of a dead priest.  That evening,
Arquette is lounging in one of those bathtubs you only see in the
movies, surrounded by votive candles.  Suddenly a dove flies through the
apartment, all portentous and symbolic.  And then, to the tune of the
Smashing Pumpkins and with full music video accompaniment, big, bloody
holes appear in Arquette's wrists.  The shots of Arquette writhing in
pain are accompanied by close-ups of nails being driven into the wrists
of a crucified man to make sure we get the point:  Arquette is being
afflicted by the stigmata, the representation of the Five Wounds of
Christ on the cross.  (I count seven, but who am I to argue?)
There are four such scenes in the movie, with Arquette getting wounds on
her hands, head, feet, and back in slow motion.  (She's wearing platform
shoes in the scene where here feet are pierced, which makes for a
particularly silly vision.)  After the second such attack, Gabriel Byrne
shows up to investigate.  Byrne's character, a priest / organic chemist,
is the Vatican's answer to the Men in Black.  Or, if you like, he's the
keeper of the Catholic version of the X-Files.  His role is to
investigate paranormal happenings and either disprove them
scientifically or hide the evidence.  (One imagines him traveling to New
Mexico and surreptitiously scarfing down tortillas with Christ's image
on them.)
Anyway, Byrne reads about Arquette's stigmata through the Vatican's
press clipping service (one wonders if they get Weekly World News).  He
investigates briefly, initially dismissing the idea that the irreligious
Arquette could have stigmata.  However, after seeing the spirit of the
dead Brazilian priest possess Arquette in a rain-slicked alley, he
becomes a believer.  Things get even sillier from here, as the plot
begins to turn around a long-lost Gospel that has severe implications
to... er... the value of the Vatican's real estate holdings.  And it
gets even sillier when the plot threatens a romance between Byrne and
Arquette.
The problem with Stigmata is that it doesn't have any sense of humor to
balance out the sheer overwhelming preposterousness of the story.
There's a scene, late in the movie, where Arquette is possessed by a
demon, and it's almost exactly like a similar scene in Ghostbusters.
One almost expects Arquette to whisper huskily to Byrne, "Do you want
this body, sub-creature!"  But there's no levity to leaven the movie, no
sense by the actors that this is all just a colossal joke.
Stigmata is not a bad movie, in the sense of having bad acting or
production values or a lifeless, boring script.  But it's not good,
either.  Stigmata is a trashy, violent, witless movie, beset with a
deeply confused notion of the supernatural and a defiantly dumb ending.
It has a little, tiny bit of guilty-pleasure entertainment value, but
it's not worth passing by either Miller's Crossing or True Romance on
your video-rental shelves.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
"The question we need to ask: Is our children learning?"
    -- Governor George W. Bush

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)

Towards the end of Dogma, Bethany (Linda Fiorentino) gets to ask God a
simple, profound question:  "Why are we here?"  She doesn't get much of
an answer, really, which shouldn't be much of a surprise.  Most of the
great questions are unanswerable, whether they be "Why do bad things
happen to good people?" or "Why can't we all just get along?" or "Why
can't the Rangers score runs against the Yankees pitching staff in the
post-season?"
Dogma has an unanswerable question of its own:  "Why do good things
happen to bad movies?"
Dogma is a bad movie, no two ways about it.  It seems to be deliberately
designed to shock and offend as many people as possible (not that any of
the twentysomething slackers who made up the audience I went to seemed
to be shocked or offended by much of anything).  And it's not just the
anti-religious posturing, or the frenzied Catholic-bashing you've heard
so much about.  More than any other movie in recent memory, Dogma takes
unbridled glee in killing.  (Like Fight Club before it, Dogma seems
destined to spawn copycat incidences of violence.)  There's almost as
many laughs generated by scenes of mass bloodshed in Dogma as the Austin
Powers movies get out of potty humor.  (Not that there isn't potty humor
in Dogma, and of a particularly repulsive kind.)  The story, such as it
is, ambles on slowly to a predictable ending, slouching towards New
Jersey, if you will.  To top off the awfulness, Jason Mewes provides a
monumentally stupid appearance that seems destined to win a nomination
for this year's Fran Drescher Award for Most Annoying Performance.
(Jar-Jar Binks appears to have the trophy sewn up.)
And yet, just as Christian theology demands that we hate the sin but
love the sinner, it is possible to hate the horribly bad things about
Dogma and celebrate the good things, namely, five outstanding
performances out of Dogma's large ensemble cast.
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck appear here together for the first time since
they vaulted to fame, fortune, and Oscar success in Good Will Hunting.
Their performances here as fallen angels are nowhere near as good in
Dogma as they were in Good Will Hunting, but their friendship and easy
rapport with each other give life and sparkle to their comparatively
dull religious dialogue.  They've got an energy and verve that
counterbalances their purpose in the film -- which is, to kill a lot of
people for no good reason.  (One of the things about Dogma that will
cause many people offense is the way that it -- literally -- shoots the
"Touched by an Angel" stereotype of angels right in the head.)  Damon
and Affleck are a lot of fun together, and they seem to be having a lot
of fun, but one can't help hoping that they got together after filming
was done and got to work on their next screenplay.
The third and fourth remarkable performances are by Chris Rock and
George Carlin, two of our greatest comic geniuses.  Both, however, are
smart enough to keep their schtick marginally toned down here.  Carlin
has the smaller role as the Catholic bishop in charge of marketing the
Church to Generation X.  Rock has the showier part, as the 13th
Apostle.  They're both parts that could have been handled in a
completely over-the-top fashion, like so much of this movie.  But Carlin
and Rock both are able to just tone down their characters to fit the
satirical mode of the movie.  Rock, especially, is almost reflective and
gentle at times.  It's a side of him we don't get to see often enough.
And the fifth performance, for me, tips the Celestial Scales in Dogma's
favor.  Alan Rickman gives what may be my favorite performance of the
year as a sardonic angel.  From his first appearance as a pillar of fire
to the end of the movie, Rickman is a wry, sharp delight.  The script
wisely gives him huge chunks of the ridiculous exposition, which he
manages to leaven with a world-weary grace.  And when the time comes for
him to lay on the really bad news to Linda Fiorentino's human character,
he manages a surprising, almost heavenly tenderness.
Dogma will almost certainly offend many viewers and enrage still
others.  Catholics will be unhappiest, naturally.  Protestants (like
myself) will have less to complain about, but will still find some
scenes shocking.  (Jewish and Buddhist and Muslim folks will probably
leave the theater scratching their heads somewhat.)  But communicants of
the Church of Movies will be glad to find solace in the good work
displayed by most of the Dogma cast, which redeems much of the awfulness
that suffuses the movie.  In the end, to mix a religious metaphor, the
acting provides just enough karma to keep Dogma from getting run over by
the critics.  (Yes, I know it's a bad joke, but thank you for reading
this far anyway.)
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Oh, if life were like the movies, I'd never be blue."
    -- Alan Jackson, "Here In The Real World"

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
As Good As It Gets is the best American comedy of 1997, which may or may
not be a compliment.  The competition so far has been sparse, not to say
nonexistent.  In a movie season that has brought us Father's Day, Magoo,
Beautician and the Beast, two Joe Pesci comedies AND two Tim Allen
comedies, As Good As It Gets is, uh, well, as good as it gets.
At first glance, As Good As It Gets doesn't appear to be anything more
than a big-screen version of Seinfeld, with Simon (Greg Kinnear) playing
straight man to Jack Nicholson's Melvin Udall, the wacky neighbor.
(Kinnear's character is a gay artist, so maybe "straight man" isn't the
proper terminology, but you understand what I'm trying to say, right?
Good.)
Early on, Melvin shoves Simon's yappy little dog into a garbage chute.
Wackiness ensues when Simon ineffectually confronts Melvin.  Melvin
delivers an eloquent stream of mean-spirited insults to a mortified
Simon, and then slams the door.  Wacky, right?
But then...  we see Melvin lock the door. Then unlock it, then lock it
again, then unlock it, then lock it again... and then repeat the process
on the deadbolt lock.  One-two-three-four-five.  And then Melvin
retreats to the bathroom, opens a new cake of soap from his stash, and
washes his hands again and again.
As Good As It Gets is a comedy that dares to go beyond shallow,
stereotypical characterization and treat its characters as real,
three-dimensional human beings with problems.  On the surface, Melvin
Udall is a bitter, angry, sarcastic and bigoted bully -- but he's also a
man struggling with obsessive-compulsive disorder, trapped inside a set
of bizarre routines and fixations.
To its credit, As Good As It Gets is not a sappy disease-of-the-week TV
movie, either.  Although we understand the reason behind Melvin's
weirdly inappropriate behavior, Melvin is so creepy and twitchy that he
never comes off as sappy or tragic.  Melvin's OCD is played for laughs
throughout the movie, especially his terror of stepping on a crack in
the sidewalk.  (The set designers regularly confront Melvin with tiled
floors.)  Where a lesser movie might turn sentimental or weepy, As Good
As It Gets strikes right for the comic jugular and never lets go.
The part of Melvin was written for Jack Nicholson, and there's not
another actor alive who could have made the character believable and
charming.  He hasn't had a part this meaty since Batman, and he makes
the most of his opportunity.  Helen Hunt, as the waitress who is
alternately charmed and tormented by Melvin's antics, is superb, showing
a surprising amount of range and depth that wasn't present in Twister.
The script takes Hunt's character through the emotional wringer, but
she's always charming, always believable, and always compelling.  I
hadn't seen Greg Kinnear in anything other than TV's Talk Soup, and his
performance here is genuinely good. Although he's not in the same acting
weight class as Nicholson or Hunt, Kinnear is sympathetic without being
sappy, and manages to be sad and depressing without being pitiful and
annoying.  Cuba Gooding Jr. turns in a slick extended cameo as the most
kickass art dealer in Manhattan, and Yeardley Smith (of "The Simpsons")
has one painfully funny scene where she has to use notecards to brief
the injured Kinnear on his financial situation.
All honor and credit goes to director/producer James Brooks for this
fine movie.  Brooks is a voice crying in the creative wilderness that is
Hollywood.  He has consistently produced grown-up comedies with real
people dealing with real-life situations (Jerry Maguire, Broadcast News,
War of the Roses) while the rest of Hollywood relies on rubber-faced
antics and bathroom humor.  I encourage you to see this movie -- not
just because it's very good and very funny -- but because you'll be
casting your vote for quality entertainment and against the dreck that
gets passed around like leftover fruitcake this time of year.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Lawyers have a saying that goes something like this:  "The most
important thing you can do in a courtroom is show sincerity.  If you can
fake that, you've got it made."
Matt Damon stars in The Rainmaker as Rudy Baylor, a young, sincere,
idealistic lawyer fresh out of Memphis State Law School, entering the
cutthroat world of the legal profession.  He begins his career with a
golden opportunity:  a lawsuit filed by the Black family, who are
struggling with an evil, heartless insurance company for coverage of a
bone-marrow transplant for young Donny Ray Black.  The movie -- minus
some extraneous subplots -- is about how this inexperienced David
battles the mind-numbingly evil Goliath of health insurance.
The Rainmaker, adapted from the John Grisham novel, occupies a
black-and-white moral universe.  On one side, you have the brave family,
let by the gallant Donnie Ray, and represented by the young, sincere,
idealistic Baylor.  On the other side, you have the insurance company,
represented by a cadre of high-powered lawyers (led by Jon Voight).
Both the insurance company and the law firm occupy huge, well-appointed
office buildings, paid for by the poor, neglected policy holders who
spend good money on worthless health insurance.
The problem is that it's all a sham.  I don't care how much you hate
your HMO, but these conditions don't exist in the real world, they just
don't.  The Rainmaker has this problem:  its hero is a plaintiff's trial
attorney.  Attorneys -- especially plaintiff's personal injury lawyers
-- are not your standard heroes, they're much too flawed for that.  But
in order to make the hero likable, to make the audience root for him,
the script gives Damon all of the good moral qualities that there are,
and demonizes the opposition to the point of caricature and beyond.
Damon is good to his elderly landlord, his physically battered and
emotionally scarred girlfriend (Clare Danes), and sympathetic to his
clients.  But he's too good for his own good.
Damon has proven, with Good Will Hunting, that he's a fine actor, full
of passion and intensity.  Here, he's not given any opportunity to
shine:  his character is required to be sincere and polite, and that's
all.  There's no spark of energy in his performance:  he's singularly
listless.  The only clue that we get to what's going on in his head is
the voice-over narration, and even that's flat and dull.  Damon's not
bad in the movie -- he even gets the Southern accent down pat -- but
he's the victim of a one-dimensional screenplay.  I would have liked The
Rainmaker a whole lot better if Damon had been able to cut loose -- to
experiment with being bad and unethical and tempted by the Dark Side of
the law.
The other lawyers aren't much better.  Jon Voight is the lead trial
attorney for the evil insurance company -- which makes its money by
systematically denying every single claim on principle.  Voight is fine
as a sleazy, oily lawyer in the negotiation and discovery sequences, but
when he gets into the courtroom, he's as bad as he can be.  He foolishly
goads one of the jurors (Randy Travis) into attacking him during voir
dire.  He is harsh and angry to the grieving Mrs. Black (Mary Kay
Place).  He blusters and makes bad objections during the course of the
trial.  When the insurance company's CEO (Roy Scheider) makes a damaging
admission, he acts like someone has hit him in the solar plexus with the
butt end of a pool cue.  And finally, he delivers the worst closing
argument in the history of cinema film.  But he's not the worst lawyer
in the film:  Mickey Rourke, as Damon's sleazy employer, is a poorly
drawn cartoon of the worst lawyer stereotypes ever.
What saves The Rainmaker are two fine performances from veteran actor
Danny DeVito and veteran director Francis Ford Coppola.  DeVito supplies
the charming roguishness that Damon isn't allowed in this movie.  He
instructs the shocked Damon in the fine art of ambulance chasing, makes
sure that their battered office is swept for bugs, and generally applies
a counterpoint to the oppresive sense of decency and goodness that Damon
is forced into portraying.  When he spots a little kid with his arm in a
cast on the street, DeVito does the only thing he knows to do:  he hands
him his card just in case there's a possible lawsuit brewing.
Coppola really saves the day, though, by providing a pervasive sense of
presence.  The movie was shot on location in Memphis, and there was a
lot of careful thought that went into the places where the movie was
filmed and the casting of extras.  Rourke's combination law office and
honkytonk is a wonderful visual sight gag.  The down-at-the-heels houses
where Damon and the Black family live look like real people actually
live there.  The casting choices are excellent, too.  Mary Kay Place is
just right as as the beleaguered Dot Black.  Danny Glover has a couple
of nice moments as the trial judge.  The jury looks like a real jury,
the lawyers look like real lawyers, and Memphis looks like something
more than an anonymous concrete canyon.
Even the cars are just right.  There's a beat-up 50's vintage junker in
the back of the Black house where the father (who "ain't right") sits
and drinks.  Damon drives an equally junky hatchback filled with his
worldly possessions (it's a dead ringer for the one that I drove in law
school) -- and then moves up to an elderly blue Volvo.  (The opposition
lawyers drive sleek, German luxury cars -- another sign of their evil.)
The old adage in Hollywood used to be:  If you want to send a message,
call Western Union.  The Rainmaker is a "message movie", plain and
simple.  But if you're going to send a message, it might as well be on a
Hallmark card, right?  The Rainmaker is lucky to have actors like DeVito
and Damon, and especially lucky to have a director like Coppola, who
obviously cares enough to send his very best.  Unfortunately, it's not
quite good enough to save The Rainmaker from itself.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
 by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Imagine a movie with this premise:  After years of struggling with his
private law practice, a young Southern lawyer gets an opportunity to
work for a large New York law firm.  The work is absorbing, he feels the
need to prove himself to his partners, he likes the money -- so he
spends more and more time at work.  His wife, on the other hand, hates
New York, hates leaving her family and friends back home, hates the
people her husband works for and the New York social scene in which she
feels pressured to participate.  As her husband becomes more and more
engrossed in his job, she sees less and less of him and becomes lonely,
isolated and depressed.
The husband is handed the case all of New York is talking about, a
triple homicide committed by a wealthy and evil real estate developer.
As the evidence against his client mounts, however, the lawyer's wife
begins to deteriorate.  She begins to have hallucinations --
specifically, that the people her husband works with are possessed by
demons.  The lawyer must choose between the fame and fortune that will
come if he gets his wealthy, guilty client acquitted or dealing with his
wife's fragile mental health -- and then is forced to watch as his
choice goes tragically wrong.
Sounds like a great movie, doesn't it?  And it almost got made, too.
Unfortunately, this is not the movie we're reviewing today.  What we
have is The Devil's Advocate, starring Al Pacino as the Devil.  Pacino
is the senior partner at the New York law firm of the aforementioned
young lawyer (Keanu Reeves), and is trying to use the power of a
high-dollar silk-suit New York law firm to wreck the world.  (Not a bad
choice of tools, either.)
Reeves still can't act, and is not at all believable as a slick young
lawyer -- and especially not as a slick Southern lawyer (he never
masters the accent).  Let's not talk about him.  The heart of this movie
is two great performances, one from Pacino as Satan, and Charlzie Theron
as Reeves's neglected wife.  Both actors do a fine job -- however, their
hard work is ultimately wasted because somebody thought it would be a
good idea to put them both in the same movie.
Pacino is good in this movie because Pacino is good, period.  In the
climactic scene, where Pacino is revealed to be Lord of Hell, Pacino
gives a screaming, ranting polemic against God.  And he does such a good
job, and is so effective in the role, that it's not until after the
movie that you realize that what he's saying didn't make a word of
sense.  (I felt the same way about his rant at the end of Scent of a
Woman as well, if that tells you anything.)  Pacino isn't the best
screen Devil -- that would be Jack Nicholson in The Witches of Eastwick,
in my opinion -- but he's enjoying himself, he's a pro, and ultimately,
he's Al Pacino.
If Pacino is just living up to our high expectations, Theron surpasses
them.  We first see her as a Southern party girl, drinking, dancing and
romancing with her lawyer husband.  Later we see her as abandoned and
alone in an eight-bedroom apartment... and still later, heading down the
slippery slope to madness.  She goes from being completely superficial
and annoying to being heartbreakingly tragic in the course of this
movie.  It's an impressive performance in a very well-written part.
What makes The Devil's Advocate a flat failure is that it cheapens
Theron's performance.  By placing the blame for her collapse on Pacino's
diabolical schemes and manipulation instead of on Reeves, the filmmakers
have turned a potentially decent tragedy into a theater-of-the-absurd
black comedy.  There's a wonderful, haunting shot of Keanu Reeves
silently wandering down a digitally emptied New York street that should
have been the last shot in the movie.  Instead, it's just a segue into
the final supernatural confrontation with the Devil that's nothing more
than an excuse for Pacino to chew the scenery.
It's a shame that a really good performance by Theron, a really good
premise, and a really good town like New York (which looks wonderful)
gets wasted in a dumb, useless, John Grisham wannabe movie like this. I
suppose the filmmakers could say that "the devil made us do it", but I
doubt that he needed the help.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
When you say the words "Frank Capra" and "Christmas movie", most of us
are hard-wired or one response:  It's a Wonderful Life.  But there is
another Frank Capra Christmas movie that gets overlooked as a result;
Meet John Doe, starring Gary Cooper.
Cooper plays a down-on-his-luck baseball pitcher, suffering through the
Great Depression.  A newspaper reporter, who has fabricated a populist
political column under the name of John Doe, hires Cooper to play the
part.  Cooper ends up doing too good of an acting job, and finds himself
at the head of a political movement -- which is soon sabotaged by rich
and powerful forces.
I mention the movie partly because I really like it and recommend that
you rent it, but mostly because Kevin Costner has remade it, and called
it The Postman.
There are lots of bad things about The Postman:  enough bad things that
you could argue that it deserved every bad review it got -- and it got
plenty.  However, I'll confess that I enjoyed The Postman, not for what
it is, necessarily, but for the sake of what it tries to be.  Costner --
who directs, produces, and stars -- may have created an overlong vanity
picture, but at least it's a well-intentioned overlong vanity picture,
and that's worth a good review.
The Postman's premise is that some nameless calamity has destroyed the
cities, leaving the plague-infested population to cluster in small
towns.  The only political power is the power of the Rod and the Axe,
wielded by a group of paramilitary white separatists led by General
Bethlehem (Will Patton).  (The group is called the "Holmists", and a
misunderstanding had me scratching my head through the first half of the
movie -- why are they calling themselves "the homeless"?)  Itinerant
actor Costner is captured by Bethlehem's band of raiders, and is
indoctrinated in their merciless political philosophy.
Costner manages to escape Bethlehem's rag-tag army, but has the bad luck
to do so during a snowstorm.  He finds shelter in an abandoned postal
truck, and once morning comes, he appropriates the uniform and letters
he finds inside, seeking to trade them for food.
What happens next is straight out of Meet John Doe:  he starts telling
lies for food.  Costner tells the impoverished and news-starved Oregon
small-town residents that he's a postman, a representative of the newly
restored government, and that a new President and Congress have been
elected.  Just as in Meet John Doe, the lies are believed
enthusiastically.  And just as the hope-starved Depression populace in
Capra's fable starts a string of "John Doe Clubs", the restless
teenagers of the post-apocalypse start their own postal routes, in
imitation of their legendary hero, The Postman.  It's at this point that
the narrative starts to go all to pieces, and the movie disintegrates
into a predictable contest of good versus evil.  But there are a few
good moments, where an utterly dumbfounded Costner tries to address his
troops, and where he tries to keep them from saluting him all the
time.
Costner is a fine actor, combining Gary Cooper rectitude with Jimmy
Stewart charm -- and he needs every atom of talent he possesses to help
dig The Postman out of the ditch.  He's a much better cinematographer
than a director, though.  Just as in Dances With Wolves, the scenery is
diverse and fantastic, but the interactions between characters are weak
at times.  Patton, sporting a Civil War general's beard, is blustery and
good as the murderously efficient General Bethlehem.
As for the rest of the movie -- well, it's a mess.  The other characters
aren't well written, and the performances are uninspired.  There are a
couple of scenes that have absolutely no purpose whatsoever than to make
Costner look like a hero -- and for some reason, these scenes include
Costner friends (Tom Petty, in a cameo) or family (two of the Costner
children find roles.)  And where the no-way-out ending of Meet John Doe
was touching and romantic, the ending of The Postman is as bad as it can
be.
I'm not a fan of movies ripping off other movies.  I think it's a
mistake for Hollywood to spend more time on overbudgeted ripoffs like
The Jackal or Blues Brothers 2000 while making it difficult for original
films like The Apostle or Good WIll Hunting or As Good As It Gets.  But
if you're going to rip off another movie, I think you at least ought to
pick a movie that's worthy of the homage.  The Postman is at least
ripping off one of my favorite movies, and I've got to give Costner
credit for that.  (But be sure to rent Meet John Doe, OK?)
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"There's one thing that is forbidden on journeys by sled,
and that is whimpering.  Whining is a virus, a lethal,
infectious epidemic disease.  I refuse to listen to it."
  --  Peter Hoeg, "Smilla's Sense of Snow"

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
By it's very nature, Tomorrow Never Dies is a film that invites
comparisons.  The film itself with earlier Bond pictures, Pierce Brosnan
with Sean Connery and Roger Moore, the Bond car and gadgets of today
with those of yesteryear...  the list goes on.  And I think it's a fun
game to play, if you're into that sort of thing.
But if we're going to make comparisons...
Is Tomorrow Never Dies a better film than The Peacemaker?
I think that's a fair question.  All of the Bond heritage aside, we
still have to judge Tomorrow Never Dies on its merits rather than on its
illustrious predecesors.  By that standard, Tomorrow Never Dies is a
middle-rung action movie, nothing more.
Tomorrow Never Dies employs the same basic plot foundation as The
Peacemaker -- an irresponsible madman has control of a nuclear device
and plans to explode it to further an irrational agenda.  (Given the
relative stability of geopolitics nowadays, this seems to be the most
popular plotline going.  Mission: Impossible and True Lies used similar
nuclear plots, and  it's even used, in a backhanded, satirical way, in
the current Wag The Dog.)   However, the villian in Tomorrow Never Dies
is a megolamaniacal news tycoon (Jonathan Pryce) whose true enemy is, in
fact, CNN.  His ultimate weapon is a "stealth boat" which can't be seen
on radar, has video teleconference capability, and is much bigger on the
inside than the outside.  And he's trying to start a war between Great
Britain and China to increase TV ratings.  And...
I'm sorry, the plot is just too ridiculous for words.  It really is.
There's just so much about it that's implausible and quite a bit that
doesn't make any sense whatsoever.  It just ambles along with motorcycle
chases and car chases and whatnot until the final confrontation between
Bond and this Rupert Murdoch guy. (I won't tell you who wins.)
Tomorrow Never Dies is a formula movie.  And there's nothing
intrinsically wrong with that, mind you.  It's just that if you're going
to make a formula movie, it needs to have something extra to
differentiate it from the other formula movies out there -- and by
itself, vodka-martini-shaken-not-stirred dialogue and Pierce Brosnan's
suave performance don't cut it.  To its credit, Tomorrow Never Dies does
try to shake up the formula by adding Michelle Yeoh, best known in the
States as a Jackie Chan sidekick. (Or "sidechick"?)  Unfortunately,
she's not given nearly enough opportunity to flex her kung-fu muscles,
and the one scene where she does get to stomp some bad guys looks
tacked-on.
All that aside, though, this is still a James Bond movie, which means
that things are done with class.  Brosnan's 007 has made everyone forget
about Timothy Dalton -- and maybe even Roger Moore.  The chase scenes
are well-done, although they're not compelling.  The plot is nonsense,
but it's well-photographed and well-staged nonsense.  The Bond support
team (M, Q, Moneypenny) do a workmanlike job, as does Teri Hatcher in a
brief role.
So, to answer my question, is Tomorrow Never Dies better than The
Peacemaker?  Let's put it this way:  does anybody want to see George
Clooney in seventeen sequels?
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
When I was in law school, we once argued the moral effect of the
economic calculus that A Civil Action presents us with.  Plaintiff's
attorney Jan Schlichtmann (John Travolta) explains to us via voiceover
that a client with a disability is "worth more" than a client who is
dead.  This is because a person with a disability can be expected to
rack up costly bills for health care and personal assistance, where a
dead client can't incur any more bills from the grave.  A civil action
(as defense lawyer Robert Duvall explains, later in the movie) is
about money -- compensating the injured party -- so it makes sense to
give parties who survive their injuries more money than those who
don't, then, doesn't it?
However, this leaves you with a moral problem.  The professor put it
this way: if I run you over with my car, but I don't kill you, isn't
it in my financial self-interest to back over you and make sure that
you're dead?  I'm going to get sued whether you live or die -- at
least this way, I can cut my losses.
A Civil Action doesn't quite reach that wicked little googly, but it's
a commendable attempt to inject concepts of decency and morality into
the questionable realm of tort law.  A Civil Action just happens to be
about a lawsuit filed by eight families in Woburn, Massachusetts, who
allege that the dumping of chemical solvents into the local aquifer
caused their children to develop leukemia and die.  While this is a
tragedy for the plaintiffs, for the audience, it's almost incidental.
The movie could have been about almost any case, up to and including
that poor woman who spilled coffee on herself and sued McDonalds.
What we care about, and what the movie ultimately cares about, is the
duel between Travolta and Duvall, and that duel is much more about
pride and money than it is about the families and their dead children.
Travolta is Jan Schlichtmann, a silk-suit attorney with a kamikaze
boutique practice in Boston.  His style is go-for-broke.  He focuses
all his time and talents on one case at a time, hoping to score a
multi-million dollar settlement.  We don't see Schlichtmann taking the
routine slip-and-fall cases against the mom-and-pop liquor store,
instead, his target is high-dollar deep-pocket corporations.  He's not
a shark -- a shark will eat anything in its path.  He's a fisherman
looking to hook a deep-sea monster.  And when the orphan case of the
Woburn families appears on his desk, he's quick to dismiss it -- until
he finds that corporate giants Beatrice Foods and Grace have plants
nearby.  When Travolta sees the Beatrice logo on the side of a plant
truck, he gazes at it as if it were an undiscovered country of riches,
or as if he were Captain Ahab looking at the white whale for the first
time.
Duvall gets the plum role of Jerome Facher, counsel for Beatrice Foods
and senior partner at a big rich Boston law firm.  Facher is a real
person, supposedly a brilliant trial technician, obviously smart
enough to get to teach at Harvard, but he's the sort to put his light
under a bushel.  Since we don't get to see his talents much (the
three-month trial takes up less than three minutes on the screen),
Duvall shows us Facher's quirks, and it's a broad repertoire.  When
confronted early on with an annoying phone call from his co-defendant,
Duvall leans back in his chair, throws a tennis ball against the wall
like he's Steve McQueen from The Great Escape, and pretends not to
understand a word his cohort is saying.  It's a hell of an acting job,
and Duvall should take the Oscar here he should have won for The
Apostle.
Both actors are fortunate enough to get roles that match their
strengths.  Duvall is stable where Travolta is flashy, quiet where
Travolta is intense, disciplined when Travolta is raving.  Duvall wins
the acting duel, but it's Travolta's movie, and he's the one that has
the responsibility of carrying it.  Travolta takes A Civil Action as
far as it can possibly go and then some.
The story of A Civil Action isn't the technical twists and turns of
the trial.  Some of the technical stuff is wrong (but you'd only know
that if you spent three years in law school).  The story is about
Travolta, and how a smart, calculating trial lawyer gets destroyed by
greed and obsession... and maybe something else.  As the trial
continues, the costs escalate, and Schlichtmann and his partners must
risk everything they have on their abilities to reach a verdict.
How this happens is the meat of the movie.  Why it happens isn't
clear.  Schlichtmann is an enigmatic character, and Travolta keeps his
acting cards close to his chest.  Is he really concerned about
justice, or dreaming about a billion-dollar payday?  Is he fighting
for the families or his own sense of price?  It's a fascinating
discussion (I vote greed) and makes A Civil Action well worth the
price of admission.
If I have a complaint about this movie, it's that we don't see enough
of the lesser characters that populate Jonathan Harr's great book that
the movie was based on, or the great character actors who play them.
Kathleen Quinlan plays the leader of the families, an elementary
school librarian who lost her son and a good part of her soul to
leukemia.  She's chillingly effective -- the scene where she talks
about the "back left corner" will floor you even if you're waiting for
it) but she's not given enough time.  Likewise, Tony Shalhoub is all
but wasted as Travolta's partner -- if Shalhoub had been given half
the screen time that he received in The Siege, A Civil Action would be
the better for it.  John Lithgow just blends into the background as a
judge.  Only William H. Macy is given any time at all as the harried
accountant struggling mightily to pay bills and serve as the voice of
reason.
Audiences play lots of roles in different movies.  Here, we are the
jury in the case of Jan Schlichtmann, attorney at law.  We get to
examine his motives, try his character, and sit in judgment on his
decisions.  A Civil Action is the best jury duty you'll ever sit
through, and (unless you live in New York) you probably won't have to
pay for parking.  (And big-screen lawyers are much cooler than
real-life ones are, trust me.)
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The opening moments of Star Wars:  The Phantom Menace brought back some
memories for me, as it probably will for you.  I remember sitting in my
dad's beat-up Chevy station wagon and watching the first Star Wars movie in
the parking lot of Texas Stadium.  (They set up a drive-in theater in the
parking lot during the summer to make some money when the Cowboys weren't
playing.)  I remember using my toy light saber as a flashlight to read
comic books in bed.  I remember standing in line for the second and third
movies at the theater in the Forum Mall in Arlington, looking up at this
big Star Wars mural they had painted in the lobby.
But when I walked out of the movie, I was reminded most of this Pop Art
exhibit they had at the Dallas Museum of Art a couple of years ago.  There
were the requisite comic book panels, of course, but there were quite a few
paintings that were these big close-ups of brushstrokes, great big smears
of color that I enjoyed, in an abstract way.  (A little art humor there.)
What I really liked, though, was this Roy Lichtenstein sculpture of a
chair.  The sculpture was comprised of the same kinds of brushstrokes I'd
seen in the paintings, just as though they'd been lifted of the
two-dimensional canvas and given new three-dimensional life.  The sculpture
was dependent on the earlier paintings -- it wouldn't have made sense
without that context -- but converting the brushstroke images to actual
shapes caused the sculpture to transcend its origins and become a stronger,
better work of art.
Star Wars was a great movie.  Star Wars: The Phantom Menace is not a great
movie.  Instead, it's a sublime work of art that's based on a great movie,
that uses bits and pieces of the earlier movie to fashion a new visual
masterpiece.  Just as Lichtenstein transferred his imagery from painting to
sculpture, George Lucas has transferred his imagery from film moviemaking
to digital moviemaking.  All of the elements are present -- light sabers,
droids, the Force -- but they're just the frame for an awesome,
unprecedented work of art.
Star Wars:  The Phantom Menace is best described as an infinity of
dreamscapes.  To mix a sci-fi metaphor, George Lucas boldly takes us where
no man has gone before:  to the rolling plains of Naboo, the underwater
refuge of the Gungans, the twisted desert landscape of Tatooine, the
soaring towers of Coruscant, to a vast array of space battles and pod races
and laser swordfights.  The Phantom Menace offers us an array of sights so
wonderful, so gorgeous, so jaw-droppingly amazing, that it's almost
impossible to describe them.  (The people who do audio description for
moviegoers who are blind have their work cut out for them.)  The
backgrounds are lavishly illustrated and ornately detailed, and the
foreground is filled with exciting, hyper-kinetic action and impressive new
creatures from the Lucas alien bestiary.  This is a work of art to be
experienced on the huge silver canvas down at your local multiplex.
If you set Star Wars: The Phantom Menace next to groundbreaking special
effects movies like Titanic or What Dreams May Come, it emerges head and
shoulders above its competition.  It's a superlative example of the
emerging new genre of computer animated movies, and art directors will be
copying from it for years to come.  But The Phantom Menace is a Star Wars
movie, first and foremost, and it will ultimately be judged by the
yardstick of the three prior movies rather than on its considerable
artistic achievement.  And based on that yardstick, The Phantom Menace
falls slightly short of the mark.
The Phantom Menace starts off full of promise, with audiences cheering the
return of the classic logo and the initial plot crawling slantwise up the
screen.  Apparently, the peace loving planet of Naboo is being menaced by
the Federation, an alien race responsible for collecting taxes on Galactic
trade.  The Federation is what the Internal Revenue Service would be like
if it controlled a vast army of robots, and one hopes that nobody at the
IRS gets any ideas.  Jedi Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan
Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) are dispatched to the planet to rescue the Queen
(Natalie Portman), fighting duckbilled androids and giant fish and Dark
Lords of the Sith along the way.  The Jedi run across the young Anakin
Skywalker / Darth Vader (Jake Lloyd) at a pit stop on the desert planet
Tatooine, discover his innate Jedi abilities, and make plans to train him
in the ways of the Force.
The plot is not the problem with the movie, so I won't give any more of it
away than I already have.  And the action scenes are on a par with anything
in the previous movies.  What's missing here -- what's been lost in the
translation from adventure movie to work of art -- is the chemistry that
the characters have with each other and with the audience.
Neeson is fairly good as the elder Jedi statesman, but there's something
reserved in his portrayal of Qui-Gon.  Neeson is at his best when he's
playing characters that have a fierce inner spark of motivation (Oskar
Schindler, let's say, or Rob Roy).  That spark isn't really present here.
Neeson projects inner peace and Jedi self-discipline, but it might have
been more fun if he had some of the roguish qualities of Han Solo.
McGregor is given much less to do as Obi-Wan than you might think, although
one would imagine him to have a prominent place in the second and third
installments.  He's a student here, not a teacher, and he has a subordinate
and passive role most of the way in.
Instead of Luke and Leia, we've got two very good young actors in Jake
Lloyd and Natalie Portman, but they don't do much for the overall chemistry
either.  Lloyd, playing the six-year-old who is destined to grow up to be
Darth Vader, shows exceptional maturity and self-assurance in his role.
(If anyone out there is still interested in bringing Orson Scott Card's
novel Ender's Game to the screen, call this kid's agent.)  Portman has all
the gravity and imperial bearing a Queen should have and does a fine job
behind her ornate costumes and makeup.  (The dead-white makeup looks pretty
cool, but one hopes that it won't give Whoopi Goldberg an excuse to show up
at the Oscars in whiteface again.)  But both actors are pretty reserved as
well.  They don't bring with them any of the childish enthusiasm or passion
that made Star Wars so enjoyable.
Compared to their Star Wars predecessors, the characters of The Phantom
Menace seem stiff and lifeless.  Even Darth Maul, the much-hyped super bad
guy, can't hold a candle to any of the formidable Star Wars villains.
Additionally, the obligatory cutesy alien, a floppy-eared amphibian named
Jar-Jar Binks, doesn't do a thing to help matters.  Binks looks as though
he was designed by the same malevolent committee that allegedly built the
camel on Earth:  he's got an incomprehensible computer generated lisping
Caribbean accent, lame dialogue straight out of Wayne's World ("Ex-squeeze
me?") or worse, Full House ("How wude!"), and an innate clumsiness we
haven't seen since Martin Short stopped doing Ed Grimley.  I kept hoping
that Chewbacca would show up and pummel him.
These flaws exist, and they keep The Phantom Menace from being as
thoroughly fun and enjoyable as its predecessors.  However, it would be
wrong to call the movie a disappointment, no matter how annoying or
pervasive the hype has been.  The Phantom Menace is worth seeing, worth
marveling over, worth enjoying both as entertainment and as a luminous work
of art -- not to mention its considerable value as a passport back to
childhood.  (Where did I put that old light saber, anyway?)

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
Movies cheat, everyone knows that.  There's a whole industry dedicated
to special effects, the smoke and mirrors filmmakers need to create
whatever illusions they need to tell their story.  However, we've gotten
so used to looking at the visual effects that sometimes we forget the
other tricks of the Hollywood trade.  Simon Birch has no visual
gimmickry to speak of.  The only special effect used is not a model or a
CGI bluescreen computerized image but an idea -- the idea of destiny.
Unlike giant cruise ships or frothing tyrannosaurs, destiny is cheap.
All you have to do is write the script so that you tip the audience off
to what's going to happen.  It's called foreshadowing -- and if
foreshadowing were eyeshadowing, Simon Birch would look like Tammy Faye
Bakker.
The movie starts off in a graveyard, (in a town called Gravestown, no
less) with narrator Jim Carrey standing over the graves of his mother
(Ashley Judd) and his childhood friend Simon Birch (Ian Michael Smith).
You would think that would be enough to inform us of the fate of the
characters, wouldn't you?  Well, you'd be wrong.  When the time comes
for the mother to die, it's set up by more earnest, serious narration
(yes, it's that Jim Carrey) and an agonizingly tedious slow motion shot
of the errant foul ball that hits her in the head and kills her.  In
fact, it's so slow that the dimmer members of the audience could be
heard to say, "Hey, that lady's gonna get hit in the head with that
baseball."
And if the clunky foreshadowing of the plot weren't enough, we are left
with the character of Simon Birch.  Simon is a tiny little boy, with
thick Coke-bottle glasses, hearing aids, and a whiny, annoying voice --
"like strangled mice", we're told.  He is the movie's chief
standard-bearer for the idea of destiny.  He tells everyone that he is
God's chosen instrument, and that God has destined him to be a hero.  He
is called on to make oracular pronouncements from time to time -- he
tells poor Oliver Platt that he doesn't think he has long to live, just
as if he's read the script.  Predictably, this attitude gets annoying.
In fact, I could start the next twelve sentences with the word
"predictably", because so much about the plot is predictable -- and
what's not given away in the storyline is given away by the narration or
the background music.
Having said that, it's still possible to make a good movie that's
predictable, just as it's possible to enjoy a trip to somewhere you've
been a thousand times.  Simon Birch ends up being a decent movie, even
if it can't overcome the limitations of its script. The heart of the
movie is the relationship between Simon and his best friend Joe (Joseph
Mazzello).  They're both very gifted actors who happen to be under
voting age.  When you think about it, it's a little odd.  You have
big-time Hollywood producers forking over millions of dollars to make a
movie and placing their trust in two kids who can't drive.  The best
thing about Simon Birch is that Smith and Mazzello prove that they're
worthy of such trust.
The first thing that I noticed about Smith was that he wasn't on the
movie poster.  The poster depicts a small baby being held out of a pool
of water by two disembodied hands.  Smith is about 3 feet tall, with
teeth jutting out at ninety-degree angles, and while he's no poster boy,
we're constantly reminded that he's "cute, like a little doll".  And he
is cute, the audience likes him, and that goodwill is enough to carry
him through some very odd moments -- such as when he stands up in church
and asks, "What do coffee and donuts have to do with God?"  Smith does a
superb job in a role that would be difficult for an actor of any age.
Mazzello's part isn't as showy -- he's basically a nice kid getting
picked on by life.  (It's sort of like a Wonder Years episode where Fred
Savage's mom dies.)  On the surface, there's not a lot of emotional
depth to his character -- but what there is, he brings out.  Mazzello
does himself proud in his first major leading role
In comparison, the adult parts are drab.  Ashley Judd is luminous as the
doomed mother, but she's not onscreen long enough to make any kind of
impression.  Oliver Platt is the designated Good Guy, and he's given
little to do other than be good.  Only David Strathairn makes any kind
of impression as the erring New England minister.
If life is, as Forrest Gump tells us, like a box of chocolates, Simon
Birch is a Hershey bar.  You know what you're going to get -- but it's
good and sweet and something of a guilty pleasure, and can be enjoyed
for what it is.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
There's a scene, late in Amistad, where lawyer Roger Baldwin (Matthew
McConaughey) is trying to explain the American legal system to his West
African client, Cinque (Djimon Hounsou).  Cinque, having never heard of
the appeals process, is enraged when Baldwin tries to explain that the
Supreme Court will now have to decide whether Cinque and his fellow
African refugees will go free or be executed for revolting against their
captors.  Baldwin explains that Cinque is "almost" free, which prompts
Cinque to scream, "Almost!" again and again in rage and frustration.
(At least that's what I think he's saying, as almost all of Cinque's
lines are in the Mende dialect.)
Amistad is a well-made, exceptionally well-acted, and skillfully
directed film about a great historical story, but it's a victim of its
own quality.  Amistad is a good movie, an Oscar contender, even, but
with its pedigree, with its starpower, with the resonance of its story,
you would expect this to be a great movie.  And it's almost a great
movie.  While that word -- almost -- is not as frustrating for you and
me at the movies as it is for Cinque and his pirate crew, it's
frustrating enough.
Amistad is at its most powerful in depicting the voyage of Cinque to
America.  After a brutal kidnapping from his village, and harrowing and
murderous journey  from West Africa on the a Portuguese slaver, Cinque
manages to break free of his chains on the slave deck of the Spanish
ship La Amistad, kill his oppressors, and attempt to steer the ship back
to Africa.  The action sequences are powerful and deeply disturbing,
evoking all the horror and pity of slavery.  Unforunately, the real meat
of the movie takes place ashore, in a series of courtrooms and legal
manuevers.  It's sort of like Perry Mason meets Roots.
Now, don't get me wrong, here.  I'm a lawyer.  I love this kind of
stuff.  And for me, anyway, it's a bonus to see Matthew McConaughey in
the courtroom again after his performace as Jake Brigance in A Time to
Kill.  But there is just so much courtroom wrangling and arguing and
cross-examination that it detracts from what the movie is really about.
Even the resolute Cinque, who disrupts one trial by shouting, "Give us
free!", over and over again, is reduced by the end of the movie to
quizzing lawyers Baldwin and former President John Quincy Adams (Anthony
Hopkins) about jurisdictional questions.  And by the climax of the
movie, a quirky, overlong speech by Adams, we're all as tired of the
legal process as Cinque is.  (It's a measure of the screenplay's
awareness of the legal process that former Justice Harry Blackmun was
tapped to play the part of the Chief Justice.)
The problem with Amistad is that it tries to do too much and leaves too
much left undone.   Amistad spends, for example, a lot of time on
historical political intrigue.  While pertinent to the legal
back-and-forth, it isn't very interesting, and wastes the talents of
fine actors David Paymer, Anna Paquin, and Nigel Hawthorne -- not to
mention that America's Finest Actor, Morgan Freeman, is given a
suprisingly slim role as a Boston abolitionist working towards Cinque's
freedom.  There's also a surprising amount of time spent on John Quincy
Adams and his supposed struggle with the memory of his father, President
John Adams -- which doesn't quite ring true.  (John Quincy Adams, while
a mediocre President, was one of America's most accomplished diplomats,
possibly America's greatest Secretary of State, and served ably in the
House of Representatives after his term in the White House.)
Amistad is at its best when Djimon Hounsou is on screen. McConaughey's
character calls Cinque "the greatest man living in chains", and
Hounsou's indominitable Cinque exudes greatness and dignity, even in
chains.  In a world all too quick to write him off as a savage, Cinque
gives us an example of courage, humility, strength, and resolve.
Hounsou plays his role brilliantly, especially considering that we don't
know what the heck he's saying most of the time.  (Amistad is stingy
with subtitles for some reason.)  But we always know what Cinque is
feeling and thinking, thanks to Hounsou's expressive performance.
Amistad's chief failure is that it takes the focus of the movie off of
Cinque and on the legal and political issues.
Alexander Solzhenitsyn, in relating the story of his arrest in The Gulag
Archipelago, asked why, exactly, the Russian people never rose up and
fought the KGB agents that came to arrest them in the middle of the
night.  He sadly concluded that "we didn't love freedom enough."
Amistad, by telling the story of one man's fight against slavery,
reminds all of us that freedom is precious, worth fighting for, worth
dying for.  It is a noble effort by a great director to deliver a
powerful message.  However, just as Cinque's efforts at freedom were
hampered and delayed by legal and political manueverings, Amistad is
hampered in telling its tale by the memory of those same maneuvers.  A
good movie, yes, and almost a great movie.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
It wasn't all that long ago, you'll remember, when they announced the
casting for The Bonfire of the Vanities.  Those of us who were fans of
the Tom Wolfe novel cringed:  Tom Hanks as Sherman McCoy?  It was clear
to me, at least, that William Hurt was the best choice -- the only
logical choice -- to play the part of the antihero stockbroker.
Fortunately, the casting gods were on watch when Hurt was cast in the
Macon Leary part in The Accidental Tourist, two years prior.
I mention this to say that casting is hard.  I realize that.  But it
doesn't take a casting god to see that Lost in Space would be a much,
much better movie with someone else as Professor Robinson instead of
William Hurt, someone who wasn't as good of an actor, someone who could
contribute to the movie's high-camp style.  Lost in Space is not a
William Hurt movie, it's a Matt LeBlanc movie -- nonserious and
superficial.  By casting the serious and laconic Hurt in the lead, the
movie makers do Hurt and themselves a disservice.
Hurt is not the only thing wrong with Lost in Space, but he's a good
starting point.  I can see William Hurt in an intelligent, well scripted
movie about space travel -- like Contact, let's say.  Unfortunately,
that's not what Lost in Space is.  This is a strictly for fun movie -- a
silly, over-the-top sci-fi effects fest, with very little in the way of
plot or storyline or coherence.  The movie is at its best when it's at
its dippiest -- when the crew is fighting evil mechanical spiders or
hurtling through hyperspace.  Most of the performances add to the
overall silliness:  Lacy Chabert as a pouting teenager, LeBlanc as the
gung-ho Tom Cruise wannabe fighter pilot, Gary Oldman as the
cowardly-yet-evil Dr. Smith.  All these people are guilty of overacting,
yes, but at least they've picked a movie where overacting is an asset
rather than a problem.  LeBlanc is a great deal more entertaining in his
meaty part than anyone had a right to expect, and Oldman is creepily
effective as Dr. Smith.  (The other two main actors, Mimi Rogers and the
luminous Heather Graham, have characters that are so underwritten that
they don't get a chance to overact.)
The problem with Lost in Space is that it's not consistenly silly.  The
plot is simple enough:  Robinson family gets lost in space and
encounters wacky adventures.  But apparently the scriptwriter felt
guilty about writing such silliness and decided to add some depth --
exploring the relationship of Hurt's Professor Robinson character to his
dead father and brilliant son.  There's entirely too much time spent on
these irrelevant subplots and not enough time on action and wackiness.
And the action and wackiness sort of bog down in the last reel as it is,
as the plot throws in some meaningless mumbo-jumbo about time travel.
The last thing we see in Lost in Space (before the horrid
seizure-inducing end credits, the worst thing about the movie) is the
image of eight-year old Will Robinson on the bridge of the Jupiter 2
saying, "Cool."  Lost in Space works when it's cool, when it speaks to
the inner eight-year-old in all of us that likes explosions and
mechanical spiders and eye candy.  I know it sounds weird to be
criticizing a movie for not being completely superficial and mindless,
but there you go.  Lost in Space is Dumb, but it should be Dumber.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
EDtv is the story of a man named Ed (Matthew McConaughey) whose life is the
subject of a television show that runs all day, every day, across the
nation, up close and personal.  And if that sounds familiar, keep reading.
Ron Howard's EDtv was unfortunate enough to follow the similarly-themed The
Truman Show into theaters, and as a result, it may never find as wide of an
audience or as generous a critical reception.  What a pity.  EDtv is
everything that The Truman Show isn't:  funny, smart, entertaining,
sophisticated, and wry.  The Jim Carrey effort is as monolithic, grandiose,
and pretensious as the giant dome of its soundstage, and as bland as its
population of Stepford extras.  EDtv is as quirky and funny as the streets
of San Francisco where it's set, and is populated by a small, diverse
universe of off-beat characters who would be quickly shooed out of
Seahaven.
It helps that the protagonist of EDtv isn't making any great acting
stretches.  Where Jim Carrey was straining to talk out of his mouth instead
of his butt in Truman, all McConaughey has to do is play a good ol' boy
from Texas transported to San Francisco.  Ed is, perhaps, the only
thirtysomething video store clerk in California who's not working on an
independent movie -- the only thing he's working on is the beer he has on a
leash around his neck.  He's picked almost by accident to be the star of
the new show on the "True TV" network, and accepts the idea of having the
cameras watch every detail of his life because it pays pretty good, and
hey, how else is he ever going to be on TV?
Whether by design or accident, Ed turns out to be an ideal personality for
live TV.  He's got a good up-and-down relationship going with his brother's
ex-girlfriend (Jenna Elfman) and a riotous family led by his dimwit brother
(Woody Harrelson) and his elderly stepfather (Martin Landau, who gets
laughs every time he opens his mouth.)  The funniest scenes in the movie
are the ones that highlight these relationships, primarily because the EDtv
show allows them to keep tabs on Ed through their Trinitrons.  EDtv does a
wonderful job of setting up these relationships and using the TV show as a
vehicle to transform them.
And McConaughey's easygoing charm and appealing smile don't hurt one bit.
Ed seems like a guy you'd want to hang out at the pool hall with, and
McConaughey never makes him annoying, never mugs for the camera, never uses
his newfound celebrity to push people around.  You couldn't ask anyone to
do a better job in this role than McConaughey does.
To have a good TV show, though, you have to have more than just a good
star.  For one thing, it helps to have an audience.  The audience was one
of the annoying conceits of The Truman Show was the audience.  Every once
in a while, the story would cut away to someone watching -- nay, staring --
into their television set, watching the antics of Truman Burbank with rapt
attention.  The Truman Show audience was wise to every nuance of the show,
schooled in the protagonist's history, and seemingly is unable to move from
their couches.  This may not be all that different from your typical
television audience.  To be honest, it's not all that different from what I
do on a Sunday afternoon watching the Cowboys play the Giants.  But the
constant image of millions silently staring at flickering screens,
enraptured by the life of a tremendously boring insurance salesman, did
nothing but accent the annoying smugness of The Truman Show.
The audience is a part of EDtv, too, but it's a different audience, and a
better one.  The pretensious Truman Show would have us believe that it's
the number-one show, worldwide, has been for years, will be forever.  EDtv
executives know better:  all they need to be successful is to have people
watch for five or so minutes, two or three times a week.
It's a smaller audience, and a busier audience.  We see people watching
EDtv while going about their daily chores, exercising, chopping bell
peppers, what have you.  Only the teenagers and college kids are watching
closely (which tells you all you need to know about the types of shows that
are on TV nowadays).  It's a smarter audience, too.  The EDtv show runs
sixteen hours a day, with the network wisely deciding that no one really
needs to see Ed sleeping.  But most importantly, the EDtv audience, unlike
The Truman Show audience, is actually being entertained.
Both EDtv and The Truman Show make the same assumptions about our culture,
or significant lack thereof.  As our technology explodes, making more and
more bandwidth available, the quality of programming has imploded.  What
we're left with is an even vaster wasteland than we've ever had before,
populated by "irritainment" and least-common-denominator programming.  EDtv
and Truman are the reductio ad absurdum of this line of thinking, but at
least EDtv realizes that even the most absurd of shows has to entertain on
some level.  The scene where Ed trims his toenails is more entertaining
than anything we see in The Truman Show.  More than that, EDtv is a more
realistic look at television, and as such, has more success as a satire.
Compare the harried, frenetic workplace of the TrueTV headquarters to the
serene, Godlike lair of Ed Harris and tell me what's the truer picture of
entertainment today.
I can't say for sure, but I think EDtv works better as a movie because its
creators have more television experience.  (If anyone in this country has
grown up on TV, it has to be Ron Howard.)  Howard wisely decides to forego
the highbrow approach and make a well-written middlebrow comedy -- higher
quality than you get on Must See TV, but in the same spirit.  Most of the
supporting actors are best known for their TV roles:  Ellen DeGeneres as
the harried True TV producer, Rob Reiner as her boss, Woody Harrelson as
the steroid-crazed brother, Jenna Elfman as the pouting girlfriend.  (Not
to mention Howard's Happy Days buddy Donny Most as a colorless network
yes-man, and brother Clint Howard as the harried man-behind-the-curtain
directing the show.)  TV types don't get a lot of respect in Hollywood for
some reason -- witness Oscar shutouts for Howard's Apollo 13 and Reiner's A
Few Good Men -- but the hilarious, well-crafted EDtv demands a level of
respect at least equal to that of you-know-what..
In fact, forget I ever said anything about The Truman Show.  Remember
Splash?  Tom Hanks and John Candy and Darryl Hannah as the mermaid?  It's
like that:  a good, funny, warmhearted Ron Howard comedy, as welcome as
bluebonnets in the Texas springtime.  Go see EDtv and forget you ever heard
of a movie called...
Wait a second... forget... I forgot something... dangit, what was it...
Oh, yes!  Fellow members of the Elizabeth Hurley Admiration and
Appreciation Society, front and center.  Our Liz has just but a short role,
but it's well worth the price of admission... especially if you can catch
the Entrapment trailer with Catherine Zeta-Jones.  Enjoy.
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The greatest thing about Mr. Nice Guy is the anticipation.  We at one
point see a mass biker wedding, complete with great big balloons and
this huge giant wedding cake.  This shot is intercut with the usual
footage of Jackie Chan being chased by an army of gangsters.  And for a
moment, we see the biker wedding the way that Jackie Chan, filmmaker,
sees it, as a grand and glorious opportunity for comic chaos.  And sure
enough, Jackie gets one of the balloons airborne, the bad guys shoot it
down, and he falls splat in the middle of the cake while the biker
grooms do some damage to the party-crashing gangsters.  Even better, we
see the splashy, trendy house of the chief gangster (who gets in a snit
if people track in dirt) and we know, we just know, that there is going
to be some major remodeling done before the movie's through.  It's
exactly the same sensation you get when you see a table filled with pies
in a Three Stooges movie.
There are people who don't like Jackie Chan movies, and I'm not
surprised.  You can always find someone to criticize things that are
pure and good and fine.  There are people out there who don't like Dr.
Pepper and drink carrot juice or coffee or some other nasty beverage.
There's a percentage of people that will watch old people play golf on
TV while the Cowboys play the Packers.  I know people who don't like
peach cobbler.  The criticism of the good things in life by some ought
not to discourage the rest of us from enjoying them.
You will hear people say that Jackie Chan movies are poorly dubbed.
This problem has been (mostly) solved in Mr. Nice Guy, where all the
action takes place in Melbourne and everybody (even the Australians!)
speaks at least some English.  You will hear people say that Jackie Chan
doesn't speak English very well.  So what.  You will hear people say
that the movies are repetitive and formulaic.  What's your point?  So
are most of the movies coming out of mainstream Hollywood nowadays.
You will hear people say that Jackie Chan movies don't have a plot.
Does a Roadrunner cartoon have a plot?  A plot would only spoil things.
This outing, the fifth Jackie Chan movie placed in wide release in
America, accidentally places Jackie in possession of a tape showing a
drug deal by two rival gangs.  The gangs chase Jackie all around
Melbourne (which looks like a neat little town, someone call my travel
agent) in pursuit of the tape.  Unfortunately, Jackie's cop friend's
kids swipe the tape -- so since Jackie can't produce the tape, he gets
chased some more until the movie ends.
(The tape is hilarious, by the way.  It's ostensibly shot by two
repoters hiding upstairs, but when we see the tape, it looks like it's
been shot from three different angles -- including an angle which shows
the tape being made.)
The whole purpose of a Jackie Chan movie is to let Jackie show off his
impressive kung-fu skills and his impeccable comic timing.  Jackie is
fast with his fists, but he knows that he can't whip the entire gangster
army with his bare hands.  So he uses his brain and his quick feet and
the things he finds around him -- a portable cement mixer, a parked
18-wheeler, wooden pallets, the emergency brake -- to beat up the bad
guys and make them look foolish so we all have a good laugh.  More than
anything else, it's the sheer inventiveness that Jackie brings to the
fight scenes that makes the movie work.
The only thing lacking in Mr. Nice Guy is the climactic scene, which
features Jackie's duel with a giant earth-moving machine.  It's a
perfectly good bit, but it pales in comparison to the climactic chase
scene in Supercop, or the hoverboat chase in Rumble in the Bronx.
However, there's a lot for Jackie Chan purists to like -- for example,
when Jackie proves that, yes, he can beat up bad guys with his arms and
legs tied behind his back.
If you've still decided not to like Jackie Chan movies, I can't change
your mind.  But if you haven't ever seen one -- and most of you haven't
-- at least try one, OK?  Jackie Chan is a great talent, he's always
watchable, and there's never a dull moment in his movies.  Now, if he
just had a big budget and a decent supporting cast for a change....
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Three Kings is the story of Major Archie Gates (George Clooney), Army
Special Forces, and his role in the Gulf War.  When Major Gates hears
that three recruits have found a treasure map embedded in the derriere
of an Iraqi prisoner, he takes immediate action.  He confiscates the map
from the recruits, telling them that it's a matter of national
security.  Then, with the aid of a company of airborne infantry troops
and three Apache headquarters, he leads a daring raid to capture the
stolen Kuwaiti gold and return it to its rightful owners, thereby
earning the thanks of Congress, a promotion, and a Silver Star.
Well, OK, so that's not how the movie actually goes.  But maybe it
should have.
Three Kings is showing up on a lot of year-end top ten lists now, for
reasons that I just can't fathom.  My difficulty in liking Three Kings
stems from a pivotal disagreement I have with a central premise of the
movie:  that soldiers are stupid.
Three Kings has almost a Clintonesque loathing for the American
military, and its prejudice against men in uniform shows up most clearly
in the stupid things that its characters are made to do.  Clooney's
character is supposedly a Special Forces soldier, which should imply a
high degree of training and intelligence.  However, the script has him
team up with three incredibly green reservists on a mad dash through
enemy territory to steal several tons of gold... without a thought as to
the logistics of the thing.  (How do you get that much gold in a
Hum-Vee?  How do you get it home?)  Gates apparently expects that the
Iraqis will hand over the gold -- and such is the irrationality of the
script that that's what happens.
Gates's compatriots don't have much going on upstairs themselves.  Mark
Wahlberg, young and naive and clueless in Boogie Nights, has the same
characteristics here, except that he gets to keep his clothes on.
Wahlberg's character attempts to call for help at one point on a
captured cell phone, and can't remember the name of his unit.  "You
know," he tells the operator.  "The big army.  Out in the desert."
Director Spike Jonze is saddled with a character that's sub-moronic
(the movie's one truly funny scene shows Jonze back in civilian life,
blowing away stuffed animals with a shotgun) and and accent that is
supposed to be Texan but is not.  Ice Cube's sergeant is the most level
headed of the crew, but he nearly makes a fatal error when the crew
comes under chemical attack.  And these are the soldiers that Major
Gates has watching his back.
Here's a further example:  on the way out of camp, the recruits so some
skeet shooting with Nerf footballs.  This, you would think, would not be
the best way to start a mission that's supposed to be covert.  Clooney
recognizes this as silliness, and proceeds to try to train his troops.
To do this, he uses a dairy cow... which just happens to be wandering
around alone in the desert... and no one thinks that it just might be
booby trapped.
Three Kings superficially resembles The Blair Witch Project, with a
small band of unprepared innocents heading out into the great unknown to
seek out an evil  There's a lot of handheld camera work in Three Kings,
and some of the scenes are even shot using a really cheap camera.  (The
desert sunshine washes out the colors on the cheap film.)  But instead
of twig figures and piles of rocks, the symbols of evil in Three Kings
are garish, amateur murals of Saddam Hussein plastered on the walls of
the various bunkers in the movie.  One even shows Saddam wearing an
incongruous mortarboard, just as if he had graduated from the Baghdad
Institute for Evil Dictators.
But the filmmakers, again displaying their liberal prejudices, spend
much more time reviewing the supposed evils of the United States.  The
US is as much of a Great Satan in Three Kings as Saddam.  Characters
continually wonder what the purpose of the war is.  President Bush is
(with the advantage of hindsight) repeatedly excoriated for his failure
to support the Iraqi rebels in a coup attempt against Saddam.  The whole
"blood for oil" slander is repeated, graphically, by an Iraqi terrorist
pouring motor oil down Mark Wahlberg's throat.  (To its credit, however,
the movie allots at least some of its satire to the silliness of the
news media -- an easy target if ever there was one.)
There haven't been a great deal of Gulf War movies made.  The only one I
can think of offhand was Courage Under Fire, which celebrated the
heroism of a female helicopter pilot (Meg Ryan) whose memory was under
attack by chauvinist brutes.  Likely, we won't see many more.  The Gulf
War was such a shattering triumph for America and its allies that it's
difficult for Hollywood liberals to use it to denigrate the American
military and American values.  Three Kings accomplishes that difficult
feat to a degree, but that's a reason to bury it, not to praise it.
This boring, overlong, pretentious movie does a disservice to the
American soldier and the American audience alike.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"JANUARY 1, 1000:  This was the historic day that humanity celebrated
the dawn of our current millennium. The occasion was marked by feasting,
dancing, and the public beheading of a whiny, tedious group of people
who would not stop insisting that, technically, the new millennium did not
begin until January 1, 1001."  -- Dave Barry

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
What Armageddon has going for it is The Tears.  "The Tears" is the
chapter in Tom Wolfe's novel The Right Stuff that describes John Glenn's
heroic Mercury orbital flight in 1961 and the stunning, overwhelming
reception that he received on his return.  "That was what the sight of
John Glenn did to Americans at that time," Wolfe writes.  "It primed
them for the tears.  And those tears ran like a river all over America."
The Mercury astronauts, Wolfe writes, were glorious Single-Combat
Warriors sent into space, armed only with their holy righteous stuff to
fight the good fight of the Cold War in space.  In Armageddon, the only
Russian menace is a leaky space station.  The astronauts of Armageddon
have "the wrong stuff":  they're a relentlessly eccentric rabble of oil
field roughnecks.  Instead of the rigorous training that the Mercury
Seven received, our nation's newest heroes are given a whirlwind
orientation through astronaut school, in what's meant to be a gentle
parody of the film version of Wolfe's novel.
But... they are on a Mission.  A holy Mission worthy of the True
Brotherhood itself!  Yes!  There is this asteroid or comet -- anyway,
this huge big rock -- that is going to smash poor Dayton and Buffalo and
Atlanta and the whole comprehensible world all to flinders.  And the
mission is to stop it, blow it apart so that the halves don't reach
earth... and to do that, you have to launch two next-generation shuttles
at the same time.. and refuel at the aforementioned space station... and
make a sharp hairpin around the moon...  and actually land on this
heaving, spinning hurtling rock, full of sharp pointy stalactites... and
somehow drill a hole through the iron crust of the rock...  and take off
again before a white-hot nuclear bomb blows the thing apart and... Yes!
Save the planet!  And the poor, grateful world watching on CNN while
eating their popcorn and Junior Mints... well, what can they do but
offer up The Tears at this glorious exhibition of the holy righteous
stuff?
The problem with Armageddon is this:  The sight of Bruce Willis and his
oil field Dream Team boarding the space shuttle, risking life and limb
on an uncertain outcome, should, in and of itself, be enough to bring on
The Tears.  Add in the image of the heart-breakingly beautiful Liv
Tyler, watching her father (Willis) and her fiancee (Ben Affleck) take
off in the heavens, and you've got emotional gold.  But for some reason
-- and it's the hallmark of the film -- it isn't enough.  You've got a
perfectly good story here, a perfectly heart-wrenching scene, and it
isn't enough for the moviemakers.  No, they've got to add in a lot of
quick edits of Kodak moments from around the world, they've got to try
to blatantly manipulate the audience to bring on The Tears, when the
moment was emotionally strong enough to begin with.
The motto of Armageddon is:  More is Better -- either that, or the old
MTV motto, Too Much Is Never Enough.  When deep-core driller Harry S.
Stamper (Willis) is authorized to bring his crew aboard the space
station, naturally, they're not waiting patiently for him back on the
oil rig.  No, the FBI has to chase them down with helicopters.  It's not
enough that the astronauts are in plenty of danger on the asteroid,
Armageddon has to engineer a showdown between the roughnecks and the
shuttle pilot (William Fichtner, looking for all the world like a young
Christopher Walken).  All through the movie, the director and
screenwriters suffer from a lack of faith in the quality of their story,
and try to embellish it needlessly.  You get the feeling that if
producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Michael Bay were in charge of
Apollo 13, that they'd have Tom Hanks and his crew fighting off ravenous
space serpents on the way to the Moon.
The only person in Armageddon who is completely true to the sense of
Mission is Bruce Willis.  Although Willis is allowed to display some
charm and let loose some wisecracks in the early going, once he arrives
at the Johnson Space Center, his performance is all business.  For some
reason, Willis has been trying to put his old happy-go-lucky
performances in Moonlighting and Die Hard behind him lately, and that's
a shame.  Here, Willis is in "deep blue hero" mode the whole way through
-- stoic, confident, leadership.  He does a good job -- especially in
letting his emotional veneer crack at the very end -- but a lot of what
makes him a special actor is lost in Armageddon.
Billy Bob Thornton plays the leader of Mission Control, and it's very
refreshing to see him be given a normal part for once, after years of
playing Southern grotesques.  He has the same role here that Morgan
Freeman had in Deep Impact:  he is there to explain what's going on, and
he does a good enough job that it's fair to compare him to America's
Finest Actor.  Thornton makes up for a lot of the movie's charm deficit,
and so does Ben Affleck, who is Willis's primary foil.  Affleck, for
some reason, reminds me a lot of Adam Sandler -- he's got the same sort
of innate goofiness about him -- but he manages to be effective as both
the romantic lead and the action sidekick.  All Liv Tyler is given to do
is hang around Mission Control and look dewy-eyed, and this she
accomplishes tremendously.  Will Patton redeems himself for his part in
the debacle that was The Postman with a strong, sad-eyed performance,
and Peter Stormare and Steve Buscemi from Fargo team up again to provide
much-needed comic relief.  (One wonders what the Coen Brothers would
have done with this budget and this storyline.)
But setting all of the above aside, the real question about Armageddon
is whether it delivers the goods as an action movie.  The answer to that
question is YES, in big Day-Glo orange letters.  Armageddon fulfills
your every desire for high-quality special effects and top-notch
action.  In every male reptile brain, there's a longing for thrills and
spills and things that go boom and major monuments getting wrecked, and
Armageddon specifically and joyfully caters to that basic hunger.
However, you've got to have more than that to make a great movie, and
Armageddon is so blatantly manipulative and action oriented that it's
hard to put it in that class.  But if you can't be great, you can at
least be entertaining, and Armageddon is mainstream Hollywood
entertainment at its finest.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Title
Review for Rear Window (1954)
The term "disability" is often used to apply to a certain set of people
who have severe impairments of one form or another.  It is, however, a
more common experience than you might think, and it's something that
most people have to deal with, sooner or later.  My disability
experience, if you can call it that, is limited to a few weeks in
midwinter, when my hometown of Austin, Texas is blanketed in mountain
cedar pollen.  Cedar trees grow wild all over the Hill Country north and
west of here, and the prevailing wind blows literally tons of pollen
into the River City every year. "Cedar fever", it's called, and lots of
people get it and feel miserable for weeks. Sneezing, congestion, red
eyes, the works.
Cedar fever is not the same as having a disability, of course, but if it
lasts long enough, you experience a little taste of what it's like for
some people.  Loneliness, sure, and depression, and if you're not well
enough to go to work, you get a degree of alienation and isolation to go
along with it.  
This is Jimmy Stewart's situation in Rear Window.  Stewart is laid up
with a broken leg, he's a risk-taking photographer who got a little too
close to a speeding racecar. You'll hear the phrase "confined to a
wheelchair" in most Rear Window reviews, which is a phrase that makes
real wheelchair users wince; they're not "confined" to their wheelchairs
any more than you're "confined" to your Toyota in rush hour. In
Stewart's case, though, the tired old trope is accurate. He sits in his
wheelchair as though  he were nailed there. (He'd have to navigate three
steps just to get out of his apartment, and I bet the doors to the
kitchen and bedroom are too narrow for his chair, and there probably
wasn't one single curb cut in New York City in 1954.)  He's feeling
isolated and depressed, much as you or I would.  
Anyway, we all know what happens next. (At least anyone who watches The
Simpsons knows what happens next; they did a wonderful satire.)  Stewart
gets bored to tears and starts looking out the window at his neighbors
as they live their lives.  (It's summertime, before air conditioning,
and everyone has their windows open.)  One's a composer, one's a
sculptor, one's a ballerina, one is severely lonely and depressed, and
one is maybe a murderer. Stewart picks up a clue here and a clue there
and concludes that the salesman on the second floor killed his wife, and
drags all of his friends into his obsession.
The plot ought to be familiar to all of you by now, and if you've not
seen it, then I won't spoil it for you, choosing instead to concentrate
on the overall excellence of the acting. For my money, Jimmy Stewart
turns in one of the most impressive acting performances of all time.
There's one scene where he's in his wheelchair, and Grace Kelly is in
his lap. They're kissing, but the script requires him to keep talking
about the murderous neighbor across the way. Stewart does this like it's
the most natural thing in the world, and is perfectly convincing as the
sort of man who could ignore Grace Kelly to concentrate on a pointless,
voyeuristic hobby. That's acting.
Kelly herself is no slouch in the acting department. The script really
doesn't require her to act, just lounge around Stewart's apartment in
those fetching Edith Head costumes and look like a knockout. But act she
does, and her breathy voice gets wrapped around some great lines. She
and Stewart trade dark one-liners back and forth at first, until she
becomes convinced of the neighbor's guilt as well.
The wonderful thing about the acting in this movie is that so much of it
is silent, that so much of it has to be transmitted through body
language and expressions and gestures. We only hear the things Hitchcock
wants us to hear, the rest is drowned out by the music from the
composer's apartment or other sources. All of the actors in the
apartment building across the  street do a wonderful job of letting
Stewart, and us, know exactly what's
going on.
For example, there's a newlywed couple across the way that keep their
blinds down. Every once in awhile, the husband will come out, stand by
the window, get some fresh air, and smoke a cigarette. This will last
three seconds, until his wife notices that she doesn't have all of his
attention. We see this in just one little tiny span of time, and yet his
body language and his expression speak volumes.
The actor from the other building who has the most to do is the
suspected murderer, Raymond Burr. (He looks for all the world the way
Russell Crowe did in The Insider, and has the same amount of bottled-up
rage.) The thing about Burr, throughout his work as Perry Mason, was his
voice, stern and authoritative. Most of the time he's onscreen, though,
we can't hear what he's saying, but he's compelling and good and
wonderfully ambiguous in his actions, which speak louder than even his
booming voice.
Of course, the main reason to see Rear Window isn't the acting, it's the
Hitchcock suspense. Actually, there isn't that much of it, most of the
suspense is concentrated in the last reel. What's there, though, is
first-rate, worthy of the master.
http://www.txreviews.com/
http://lonestar.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
____________NetZero Free Internet Access and Email_________
Download Now     http://www.netzero.net/download/index.html
Request a CDROM  1-800-333-3633

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Six Days, Seven Nights is one of those movies that give critics a bad
name.  Movie critics like originality.  Critics -- even inexperienced
ones like myself -- have seen so many, many movies that original movies
stand out more in their minds.  Movies that aren't original tend not to
get reviewed very well.
Six Days, Seven Nights is not an original movie.  It thumbs its nose at
originality, it picks its teeth at originality, it uses its keys to
scratch the paint job on originality's car.  Six Days, Seven Nights
happily, gleefully, rips off everything from Casablanca to The African
Queen to The Fugitive (Harrison Ford breaks the all-time career record
for jumping off impossible heights and surviving).  That's just the part
with Ford and Anne Heche stranded on a remote tropical island:  the
subplot involving the hapless David Schwimmer is lifted completely out
of a Friends episode.  The plot is so thin and transparent you could use
it to wrap compact disks.
It would be fair to call Six Days, Seven Nights a shallow, unoriginal,
uninspired, summer popcorn feature.  But it would not be fair to call it
a bad movie.  Although the criticism aimed at Six Days, Seven Nights is
well-earned it misses the point.  This is a fairly good movie that
manages to be entertaining and fun despite its obvious failings.
The best thing about Six Days, Seven Nights is Harrison Ford, who almost
single-handedly redeems the movie from the depths of badness.  Ford
displays a dry, cynical wit reminiscent of his Indiana Jones
performances.  I've always felt that Ford is at his best playing a rogue
and that his recent roles as Jack Ryan and as the President in Air Force
One haven't really allowed him to display that side of his character.
It's nice to get to see him play someone disreputable, and his role as a
scruffy cargo pilot gives him the opportunity.
Anne Heche has equal billing with Ford and deserves it.  The only thing
I didn't like about her earlier effort in Wag the Dog was the short
shrift that the movie gave its supporting characters.  Heche was
convincing as a ditzy press aide in that movie, and it's good to see her
given more screen time.  She knows what to do with it, too, holding her
own with Ford in the comic banter that ensues when Ford's plane crashes
on a spectacularly beautiful South Pacific island that looks to be the
size of Michigan.  Heche manages to be cute and funny even when her hair
is completely wrecked -- a rare thing in Hollywood.
Much has been made about the relationship between Ford and Heche in Six
Days, Seven Nights.  What I liked most about the movie was that their
conversation almost seemed improvised, as if the individual who wrote
the script sort of left blank spaces for the actors to pencil in
whatever lines they wanted to.  The dialogue between Ford and Heche is
the best part of the weak script, and it's nice to picture the actors
making up dialogue as they go along.
Critics are people who look at movies and say that the glass is half
empty, rather than half full.  However, there's just enough in this
particular glass to give a positive recommendation to Six Days, Seven
Nights, a movie that manages to be fun and entertaining in spite of
itself.  Relax, kick back, and pass the popcorn.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
In 1992, actor John Malkovich appeared as a clown in a Woody Allen movie
called Shadows and Fog.  Veteran British actor Donald Pleasence, best
known for his role in The Great Escape, played a doctor in that movie.
Pleasence played a preacher in a 1968 movie called Will Penny, with
Charlton Heston in the title role.  (With me so far?)  In 1995, your
humble reviewer met Charlton Heston at a Republican fundraiser in
Dallas.  This, therefore, gives me three degrees of separation from John
Malkovich.  (Your mileage may vary.)
The conceit of Being John Malkovich is that you can reduce that "Six
Degrees of Separation" we're all supposed to have down to one.  For two
hundred dollars, we're told, you can enter a portal leading into the
brain (consciousness?) (soul?) of John Malkovich for fifteen minutes.
You are with him as he eats breakfast, or rehearses a play, or catches a
cab.  After your time is up, you fall into a drainage ditch on the New
Jersey Turnpike and have to hitchhike back to New York.
Now this... this is a brilliant idea, no mistake.  In our fantasies
about writing the Great American Screenplay, this is the kind of idea we
wish we all had.  It's an idea that's just beyond the cutting edge of
reality while still being instantly comprehensible to everyone.  It
gives you a lead character that everyone knows and recognizes.  And its
one sentence summary -- evoked by John Cusack as "You see the world
through John Malkovich's eyes, then after about 15 minutes, you're spit
out into a ditch on the side of the New Jersey Turnpike!" -- may be the
best pitch since "Arnold Schwarzenegger and Danny DeVito are twins."
And, of course, with this wonderful, creative idea as the backbone, you
can do pretty much whatever you want.  You can assemble all sorts of
characters, put them in almost any setting you want, slide them through
the portal, and see what they're like on the other side. You can,
literally, do anything with this idea.
This is the promise of Being John Malkovich, but it is also the danger.
C.S. Lewis noted that the problem with great ideas like this is that
they exploit themselves spontaneously.  Lewis, talking about his big
idea in The Screwtape Letters, said that his demonic correspondence,
like a runaway horse, "would run away with you for a thousand pages if
you gave it its head."
What happens to Being John Malkovich is that writer Charlie Kaufman and
director Spike Jonze give their imaginations free rein, and the movie
runs away on them.  Being John Malkovich is less like a runaway horse
than it is like a runaway carousel, with horses and bodies flying around
at top speed in dizzying arcs.  But there's no centripetal force to keep
the movie from spinning wildly out of control.  Being John Malkovich
spits out eccentric, inventive ideas at a mile a minute.  Each of the
ideas isn't really bad, in and of itself, but there are so many of them,
piled one on top of the other, that the whole movie is a walk through
Bizarro World.
Take the characters, for instance.  John Cusack is a quirky puppeteer
whose idea of puppet shows is Heloise and Abelard instead of Punch and
Judy.  Early on, he gets beat up by a critic, which apparently happens
often.  Cameron Diaz plays his wife, who's sort of a cross between a
young Geena Davis and Dr. Doolittle.  (She's got the funniest line in
the movie, which I won't share with you, as it changes the course of the
movie.)  Catherine Keener plays his co-worker and partner in the
burgeoning business of sharing slices of Malkovich's life.  She seems
perfectly normal for a while until she becomes a walking icon of lust.
(Really.)  It says something about Being John Malkovich that the only
character who looks and acts normal the whole way through is Charlie
Sheen.
But despite all of the layers of self indulgent weirdness, Being John
Malkovich has three fantastic, wonderful elements that make it a must
see.  The first, and most obvious, is the performance of Malkovich
himself.  Malkovich may not win Best Actor, but he's the Best Sport of
the year for even agreeing to participate in this project.  It's easy to
imagine what would have happened had he said no -- we might have gotten
something skin-crawlingly godawful like "Being Fran Drescher" -- but
Malkovich shows us all why this movie is only possible with an
undeniably great actor in the title role.  Part of the role is an
inspired self-parody, part of the role shows off the best possession
scenes since Steve Martin in All of Me, and part of the role is his
participation in two of the weirdest sequences ever shot on film.
These are the other two reasons to see the movie.  Twice, we're
transported into John Malkovich's subconscious, and these two scenes
completely redeem the movie.  All of the bizarre and odd things that
infest the movie come together in two thrilling, jaw dropping moments
that are completely original while being completely unlike each other.
The key thing to remember about Being John Malkovich is that the whole
concept of the portal is a misdirection.  The audience isn't really
being sucked into Malkovich's brain, it's being sucked into the
imagination of Charlie Kaufman and Spike Jonze.  This is not a
comfortable place for everyone, and when you get dumped out of the
theater, you may feel disoriented and dizzy.  But the high points of
this thrill ride are well worth the price of admission.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
In 1986, British police officers changed the face of law enforcement
forever. Baffled by two brutal rape-murders, the police decided to take
blood samples from every young man in the area. The search for the
murderer, dramatized in Joseph Wambaugh's "The Blooding", ended in the
apprehension and conviction of a suspect based solely on genetic
identification.
The same concept is carried to a fare-thee-well in "Gattaca", a
cautionary fable about the dangers of genetic discrimination. Our hero
is Ethan Hawke, a genetically disadvantaged social climber trying to
join the genetically perfect elite in a futuristic society where it's
not what you know, or even who you know, but who you are that counts.
The only "network" you use to get a job at Gattaca, Inc. is the
double-helix network of your DNA strand. Like a light-skinned
African-American "passing" for white in a racist society, Hawke is
forced to live a precarious double existence, buying tissue and blood
from a disabled person with superior gene structure (Jude Law) and
living in what looks like a Danish modern genetics lab. When the murder
of a co-worker puts the law onto Hawke's genetic trail, a game of
cat-and-mouse ensues.
The futuristic trappings aside, the plot of "Gattaca" doesn't differ
from "The Blooding" in any appreciable way. Hawke, innocent of the crime
of murder, has committed the crime of genetic impersonation, and it's
just a question of how long he can evade the constant genetic probes
before his own genetic structure gives him away. That's not interesting.
The characters aren't interesting, either. Hawke plays his
poor-man's-Tom-Cruise part to the best of his abilities, but he does
nothing to hold the audience's interest. Uma Thurman is wasted as a
genetically superior ice princess. The supporting cast isn't much
better, with a raft of refugees from NBC's Thursday night schedule (Tony
Shalhoub, Ernest Borgnine, Blair Underwood) and not much else. All the
performances are strictly room-temperature, save for Jude Law's turn as
the sarcastic wheelchair-bound tissue donor.
My question is this. You're parents, right? You can make your kid into
anything you want to be, whether he's a pianist with twelve fingers or a
prototype NFL quarterback. You would think that billions of different
people would make different choices, right? But in "Gattaca", it looks
like everyone has bought the same showroom model -- the Yuppie LX. (The
set design looks just like an Infiniti ad.) The "Gattaca" employees are
bland, dull, Organization Men in identical designer suits. Looks as
though they've edited the gene for non-conformity right out of the
genome. If this is the point of the movie -- and it may well be -- it
may not be worth making.
And if they're going to show one side of the coin -- the genetic elite
setting orbital patterns in a Bauhaus office complex -- I think the
filmmakers have an obligation to show the dark side of genetic
tampering. I was driving down Guadalupe Avenue in Austin this evening
and got a good look at what the GenX college students are doing as far
as hair color and tattoos -- I wonder what would happen if they gave
these kids their own gene splicer to play with? But there's no
subversive cyberpunks anywhere to counterbalance the bland conformity
that is "Gattaca".
"Gattaca" (the name, by the way, derives from the letters G, A, T, and C
in genetic coding) is a serious, almost humorless movie. To it's credit,
the film does a good job in raising questions about the intersection of
human rights and genetic technology, almost before they've been asked.
But as entertainment, it's a snooze, and as a thriller, it's a flat out
disappointment.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
The title begs the question:  Why the mask of Zorro?  "Zorro" would have
been a perfectly good title, save that this movie has actually two
Zorros -- Anthony Hopkins as the legendary bandit and Antonio Banderas
as his young protege.  "The Sword of Zorro" would have been all right as
a title -- there is enough swordplay to delight the heart of the most
avid Errol Flynn fan.  "The Horse of Zorro" would have been a cool
title, too -- Zorro's black stallion Tornado is a source of occasional
slapstick.  For those more interested in the physique of Banderas, you
could have "The Pants of Zorro" -- or, contrariwise, "The Plunging
Neckline of Catherine Zeta-Jones" -- both of which get ample screen
time.
But, no, it's the mask that's most important.  The mask allows Zorro to
do the dashing and dangerous things that he does, while still allowing
him access to the society of Old California.  But like everything else,
in life, the mask isn't so simple.  All the main characters in The Mask
of Zorro wear masks of one sort or another -- save the lovely Ms.
Zeta-Jones, for whom a mask would only hide her sensuous beauty.  It's
the masks that give The Mask of Zorro a little bit of psychologial
resonance and lift it above its origins as a costume swashbuckler.
Hopkins appears first as Zorro, mask and all.  To its credit, The Mask
of Zorro figures that we already know who Zorro is -- there's no
explication of his origin, how he came to wear the mask, or any of that
stuff.  There's just a great action sequence (it would be the climax of
a lesser movie) which sets up the legend and the relationship between
Zorro and chief baddie Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson).  However, no
mask is perfect.  Hopkins is unmasked, his wife is killed, and his
daughter kidnapped by Montero.
The action restarts 20 years later, as Montero returns to California
with Zorro's daughter (the aforementioned luscious Zeta-Jones) at his
side.  Wilson has to wear a mask, too -- he has adopted Zeta-Jones as
his daughter, and must hide his dark, scheming heart behind a veneer of
courtliness and gentility.  Wilson is much better than this than, say,
Alan Rickman in Kevin Costner's Robin Hood movie.  It's a quality
performance in a quality movie.
The titular mask, though, belongs to Banderas, and he wears it nobly.
We first see Banderas as an unlettered Mexican bandito, picked by
Hopkins to be his instrument of revenge.  We see a training sequence
where Banderas learns to fence and tumble, and there's a gloriously
goofy comic sequence where he tries to steal a horse and fails
miserably.  But the bandit's mask isn't all Banderas has to wear.  He
has to impersonate a Spanish don so that he may get intelligence from
Don Rafael -- and not incidentally, dance a passionate tango with the
beauteous Zeta-Jones.  (We are spared a lot of the Eliza Doolittle
business that must have gone on between the elder and younger Zorros --
who wanted to see Hopkins dancing with Banderas, anyway?)
While all this is going on, Hopkins has to wear yet another mask -- as
the humble servant to Banderas's ersatz don, which leads to a couple of
very touching scenes.  All of the masks everyone wears gives the movie a
strong psychological dimension that would be lacking if this was a
straight action movie.  Not that the action isn't great -- it's just
fine, with some great swashbucling scenes -- but the real action is of
the mind and the heart.  The Mask of Zorro succeeds because it's driven
by good performances and a good story.  It's clearly a sword slash above
this summer's mindless action films.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I don't think that the rich are necessarily different from you and me,
but I think that people in the public eye are.  When these people are
out in public, they have to play the role, whether it's Handsome Actor
or Charming Politician or Beauty Queen, that we've assigned to them.
But the role is often a lie, which in turn breeds a curiousity about
their private lives.  This is why whenever you meet a celebrity, your
friends and neighbors want to know, "What's he really like?"  This is
why the National Enquirer stalks these people as they carry out their
private lives.  We all want to get a look behind the mask so that we can
see if these people are as we expect them to be -- and all too often,
we're disappointed.
In a small town, the preacher is in the public eye as well.  And just as
a short, vain actor can hide behind a likable screen persona, the pulpit
can hide all sorts of shortcomings and flaws.  And that's the initial
burden that Robert Duvall's The Apostle carries.  Duval plays a preacher
named Sonny who's a bit of a showman, a real "spirit-filled Holy Ghost
preaching machine", and immediately we're reminded of the Elmer
Gantry-style televangelists we're all familiar with.  There's a montage
that's supposed to establish Sonny as an evangelist.  We see him
traveling around the South, holding tent-meting revivals and speaking to
conferences.  He's wearing flashy clothes and he's more than a bit
over-the-top.  (There's a creepy bit in this montage where Sonny's
addressing a group of African-American men, and they're chanting
"Jesus", while doing the Black Power salute.)  But even though we see
who Sonny is and what he does, we don't know him.  We don't learn
anything about him from his first appearance on screen, where he stops
his car at the scene of an accident to lead two young victims to Jesus.
Is he grandstanding?  Is he doing this to tell the story to his
congregation?  Or is he really and truly sincere?  What's he really
like?
What makes The Apostle great is that we find out.
Sonny finds out that his wife (Farrah Fawcett, who delivers an
effective, subdued performace in an unglamorous and thankless role) is
having an affair with an assistant minister at his church.  It doesn't
take too long for Sonny's world to collapse.  He loses his wife, his
children, his church and his temper.  He has a screaming match with God
loud enough to wake the neighbors, and  vents his holy wrath on the
hapless assistant minister -- at his son's Little League game, in front
of the whole town.  He drives away, pausing just long enough to sink his
long white car into a Louisiana bayou -- but is it a sacrifice, the act
of a madman, or a means to keep the police from tracking him down and
filing assault charges?
The meat of the movie is Sonny's rebaptism and resurrection as "The
Apostle E.F.".  He shows up in a small Louisiana town, refusing to give
any other name, and opens a church.  And it's here that we learn about
Duvall's character and what sort of man he is when he's not behind the
pulpit.
To say more would be to spoil the experience, and this is a movie that
should be experienced.  This is Robert Duvall's movie -- literally, he
wrote, directed, and financed it himself -- he's in almost every frame,
and he's garnered a well-earned Oscar nomination for it.  He's almost
spookily effective as the Apostle.  He's got every nuance of the
character down, from the rapid-fire Pentecostal pulpit ranting to the
sweet way he deals with his congregation.  And in the movie's climax, a
fire-and-brimstone church service, he's hypnotic enough that he almost
draws the audience down the movie theater aisle to the mourner's bench
when "Softly and Tenderly" plays during the invitation.
Complimenting Duvall's star turn is an excellent supporting cast.  This
is one of those movies where the no-name actors upstage the name
actors.  Miranda Richardson puts her light under a bushel as the
Apostle's love interest, and Billy Bob Thornton looks as though he's
wandered in from another movie in a brief cameo.  But the Apostle's
congregation (interracial, and joyfully so) is a wonderful group of
people, from the retired black preacher, to the mechanic who lets the
Apostle sleep on his couch, to the bickering "sisters", to the
radio-station owner who moves from cynicism to spirituality.
The Apostle is a totally absorbing look at a man of faith and his
congregation.  It's extraordinarily well-written and acted.  It takes a
position on religion -- especially Southern evangelical religion --
that's honest, and not satirical or overly spiritually maudlin.  For any
serious communicant of the Church of Movies, The Apostle qualifies as a
singular miracle, crafted by the strong hands of Robert Duvall, Patron
Saint of the Character Actor.  If only the rest of Hollywood would go
forth and do likewise.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
In the interest of being generous, I want to start this review with the
scene that I liked in Meet Joe Black.  Sir Anthony Hopkins, playing a
super-rich media mogul, has gathered his family around him for dinner.  His
oldest daughter (played by Marcia Gay Harden from Millers Crossing), who
has been obsessively planning his sinfully extravagant birthday party,
presents him with three superbly decorated little cakes, which are supposed
to be scale models for his big birthday cake.
The daughter asks Hopkins to pick the one he likes.  Hopkins, frustrated by
the weight of planning for the whole elaborate affair, does what any man in
his position would do:  he punts.  Whichever one you like, dear, he says.
And the daughter does exactly what any woman in her position would do:  she
cries.
I liked that scene for two reasons.  First, the cakes looked really cool.
Second, it was, perhaps, the only scene in the movie where people acted as
you would expect people to act.  Meet Joe Black is chock-full of odd
performances, people doing things for no discernible reason at all, and
doing them in slow motion over the course of three hours to boot.  It's
easy to watch Meet Joe Black for the abundant eye candy of the palatial
homes and the beauteous Claire Forlani, but it's even easier to sleep right
through it (two people on my row managed it quite nicely).  The difficult
part of the movie is understanding the characters and their motivations and
why someone thought three hours was an appropriate length for this
overwrought mess.
I know my audience had problems with the movie, because they thought it was
a comedy.  Case in point:  Everyone should know by now that Brad Pitt plays
the Angel of Death in this movie.  However, the first we see of him is as a
young lawyer in a coffee shop hitting on the glamorous Claire Forlani.
(It's not clear from the movie whether you need a law degree to become the
Angel of Death, but it makes a certain kind of sense.)  It shouldn't take
long for the observant moviegoer to realize that Bad Things are about to
happen to Mr. Pitt.  And indeed they do (after a hideously prolonged
sequence where Pitt looks over his shoulder at the retreating Forlani and
Forlani looks over her shoulder at the retreating Pitt), because Pitt walks
into the road without looking and suddenly gets squished.  Well, when that
happened, the audience howled with laughter, and continued to laugh at
every comment that was remotely humorous.  So, if you think that sudden
violent death and sarcastic drawing-room humor are funny, I encourage you
to go see Meet Joe Black immediately.
Anyway, the deceased lawyer's body, no worse the wear from its massive
injuries, is possessed by the Angel of Death and Brad Pitt takes over that
role.  The idea is that Death (given the pen name of Joe Black, so as not
to disturb others) wants to take a holiday and experience the world.  If
this weren't Hollywood, we might get an interesting metaphysical discussion
of life and death, but since it is, we get scene after scene of
fish-out-of-water humor, just as if Death is George of the Jungle or
Crocodile Dundee or some other poor schmuck who's wandered in from the
jungle or the outback or whatever and doesn't know how to act in our
society.
It also doesn't help that the character of Death is written so
inconsistently.  He claims to be on vacation, but he never does anything
except hang around the seriously attractive Claire Forlani (just try to get
your travel agent to book that one).  He speaks very slow and halting
English but perfectly fluent Jamaican patois.  He knows everything about
some characters, nothing about others.  And as played by Brad Pitt, he's
not especially menacing or charming or glamorous or intriguing, he's just
there.  It's as if someone told Pitt, "Never mind about acting in this
picture, son, just stand there and look pretty."  It's as if Pitt is doing
his Keanu Reeves impression throughout the movie.
I've used the phrase "Angel of Death" in this review very deliberately to
contrast Pitt's performance with this year's best angel performance,
Nicolas Cage's in City of Angels.  Where Pitt is cold and unfeeling, Cage
is as warm and empathetic as the situation allows.  Where Cage is genuinely
curious about the nature of man, Pitt is aloof and arrogant.  Cage struck
instant chemical sparks with co-star Meg Ryan, where the chemistry between
Pitt and Forlani is only understandable if you accept the notion that
Forlani's character is so shallow that she can't see beyond Pitt's good
looks.
The movie's other top name is a much better actor, but that doesn't save
Meet Joe Black.  Sir Anthony Hopkins isn't given much better material to
work with, unfortunately.  He plays one of these good-hearted
multimillionaire media moguls that only exist in Hollywood.  (One wonders
what might have happened if they had made Hopkins's character more
realistically evil.)  Hopkins is marked for death due to a bad ticker, but
Death steps in and grants him some extra time in exchange for being his
guide in the world.
Of course, no one can be sure of how they will act when Death taps on their
shoulder.  But I have to wonder (and in this movie, you have a very long
time to wonder) how you or I would act in a similar situation, especially
if you or I were a multimillionaire.  Hopkins pretty much goes to the
office -- and the major subplot revolves around who will control the
corporation.  Fans of corporate intrigue will be fascinated, I'm sure.
I stayed awake all the way through Meet Joe Black, and I'm asking myself
why.  Movies about Death should encourage you to live life to the fullest,
which is what I'm going to do now.  Go spend time with your family, go
volunteer for a local charity, heck, go take a nap.  Don't go see Meet Joe
Black, because all it will do is move you three long hours closer to death.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Before I say anything negative about Wild Wild West, I want to take a
moment and remind you that Kevin Kline can act.
Remember the scene in A Fish Called Wanda where Wanda (Jamie Lee Curtis)
and Otto (Kline) are preparing to double-cross their partners and nab the
look from the safe where it's hidden?  Otto cracks the safe open and...
surprise... it's empty.  Kline stands up, empties his pistol into the safe,
and screams: "I'M DISAPPOINTED!!!"
Well, Wild Wild West has Kevin Kline.  And Mr. Summer Movie himself, Will
Smith.  And Kenneth Branagh, the greatest Shakespearian actor of our time.
And the babelicious Salma Hayek. And Ted Levine from The Silence of the
Lambs.  And It's directed by Barry Sonnenfeld, who directed Get Shorty, and
was the cinematographer for Miller's Crossing, one of the best movies ever.
Wild Wild West is as bad as a movie can be without actually having Richard
Gere in it.  It's an action movie with no action to speak of, a comedy
movie with no laughs, a buddy cop movie with no chemistry between the
leads.  The only person who comes out of this debacle with anything close
to honor or dignity is George Clooney's agent, who saved his client from an
embarrassing debacle.  A Newsweek critic called Wild Wild West this year's
Hudson Hawk, which is an insult to Hudson Hawk.  (Hudson Hawk at least had
Sandra Bernhard screeching maniacally and Danny Aiello and Bruce Willis
singing show tunes -- there's nothing even that diverting in Wild Wild
West.)
This is the part of the review where you're supposed to recapitulate the
plot, but I can't.  It's too painful.  Instead, what follows are a few
brief observations:
1.  Never, ever, EVER again make another movie from a Sixties TV series.
The Avengers should have served as a warning to everyone in Hollywood:
don't ever do this again.  Please, please, please, stay away from Hogan's
Heroes and The Prisoner and, er, I don't know, Gomer Pyle.  Placing the
successes of movies like The Fugitive and Wayne's World aside, maybe a
Congressional ban on recycling TV shows might be worth looking into.
(Consider that Twin Peaks, the best show of the 1980's, was made into an
indescribably wretched movie.)
2.  Wild Wild West has a lot of special effects, but it comes at a time
when we're becoming more blase about special effects.  Remember how neat it
was in Forrest Gump when the filmmakers used computer graphics to make Gary
Sinise look as if he had no legs?  Branagh's character also has no legs,
and they use the same tricks, but it's not nearly as cool now.
3.  In a summer chock-full of tasteless movies, the offensive attempts at
humor in Wild Wild West really stand out.  Charles Krauthammer did an
excellent piece in the Washington Post about how the portrayal of Branagh's
character (who uses a steam-powered wheelchair) is insensitive to people
with disabilities.  The racial jokes aimed at the Will Smith character are
just as bad.  I don't have any problem with casting Will Smith in the Jim
West role -- he does a pretty good job, given what he had to work with --
but the smart move would have been to ignore his race in the screenplay.
Instead, we get things like lynching jokes that are so far from being funny
that you'd have to stand in line for a passport to get there.
5.  Salma Hayek is given nothing to do in this movie but stand around and
look pretty.  This might have been OK if she had gotten a fair amount of
screen time, but she doesn't even get that.
6.  Kevin Kline imitates the President at one point in the movie, which he
did in Dave.  (Dave is a lot better movie.)  I think Robert Conrad was
rumored to want the President Grant part, but a kind fate intervened and
saved him from embarrassment.
7.  The black-white buddy-cop thing has officially been done to death now.
So has the bit about the villain falling to his death from a high place.
Wild Wild West doesn't have a car chase, thankfully, but it has a train
chase that's not all that interesting.  (One could wish that the filmmakers
had seen Narrow Margin for hints on how to do a train chase, or even the
Under Siege sequel... and yes, it says something about the quality of Wild
WIld West when I can compare it unfavorably to a Steven Seagal movie.)
8.  Another note about the casting:  One can't help but wonder if the movie
could have been better if Kevin Kline were the villain and Kenneth Branagh
were the Artemus Gordon character.  Kline makes no impression whatsoever as
Artemus Gordon:  he's shallow, fussy, vain and condescending.  And Branagh
just mucks the supervillain thing up awfully, really, it's pathetic for an
actor of his skills.  Kline would be a much better choice for the villain:
he'd bring a certain class to the role that's completely missing from
Branagh's performance.  And Branagh could do the Artemus Gordon part in his
sleep.
9.  Even if the casting switch wouldn't have worked, it certainly couldn't
have made things worse.  There's no way of making things worse in the Wild
WIld West short of bringing in a giant army of Ewoks to trip over the giant
metal tarantula or something godawful like that.
I could go on, of course, but slinging invective makes my arm tired.  Don't
go see the Wild Wild West, but if you do, don't be surprised if you hear
people walking out of the theater yelling, "I'M DISAPPOINTED!!!"  Don't be
surprised if you're one of them, either.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Steven Spielberg is, perhaps, the greatest technical moviemaker of our
time.  He has made us believe in dinosaurs, extra-terrestrials, and that
the Ark of the Covenant could melt Nazis.  The hallmark of Spielberg
movies is that he makes you believe you are there -- whether it's a
ruined Egyptian temple or a concentration camp in Poland or a
raptor-ridden tropical island.  Every scene, every shot, tells us that
this is happening, right now, for real.  Only the best Hollywood
illusionists -- say James Cameron's painstaking recreation of the
Titanic, or Ron Howard's extraordinary weightless Apollo capsule -- can
be ranked with Spielberg in terms of sheer technical prowess.
However, just as someone can make a great cabinet without there being
anything inside, someone can be a great technical moviemaker without
making great movies.  And Spielberg's last two movies weren't great.
Although the dinosaur action in The Lost World was better rendered than
in Jurassic Park, the plot was a lifeless retread of the original
dino-classic.  Both the historical detail and the action scenes in
Amistad were outstanding, but the plot bogged down in legalistic
courtroom psychodrama.  From a technical standpoint, there wasn't
anything wrong with either of these two movies -- but they didn't live
up to the high standard that Spielberg has set for himself.
There was every reason to anticipate that the opening scene of Saving
Private Ryan -- the invasion of Omaha Beach by the Third Ranger
Battalion on June 6, 1944 -- would be a technical masterpiece.  And so
it is.  Veterans who were there say that Spielberg does a good job in
recreating the horror and agony of the Normandy invasion, and there can
be no higher praise.  Spielberg conveys the heroism and the confusion of
the landing spectacularly well, even recording some of the shots himself
with a hand-held herky-jerky camera.  With the resources of his own
studio behind him, and with Tom Hanks to serve as a visual anchor,
Spielberg has created one of the great war scenes in film history.
The "cabinet" of the movie is great.  The war scenes, while less
spectacular than the Omaha landing, are intricate and stunningly
well-designed, just as if Spielberg had personally placed every chunk of
rubble and debris in its proper place.  The set design is fantastic --
they even manage to recreate an authentic World War II glider, although
the originals were mostly smashed to bits on landing.  But what makes
Saving Private Ryan a great movie isn't the box the movie comes in.
This movie turns out to be bigger than its box.  Saving Private Ryan is
special because the story outshines even the quality of the filmmaking.
The story is simple:  Private James Ryan (Matt Damon) has lost two
brothers in the Normandy landing, and a third in the Pacific the week
before.  He is to be found and taken home to comfort his grieving
mother.  However, Ryan dropped behind enemy lines with an Airborne
division which was scattered behind enemy lines like so many spilled
needles.  Hanks, his top sergeant (Tom Sizemore) and a small crew must
infiltrate the German lines, find the lost soldier, and return him
safely home.
The quest for Ryan is accompanied by a long string of philosophizing
about the mission, punctuated by small-scale combat.  Hanks and his crew
don't like their task and don't appreciate the implication that Ryan's
life is somehow worth more than theirs.  This makes the movie sound a
bit talky, I know, but Saving Private Ryan frames its discussion of
these issues as real-life morality plays:  What's the duty of a soldier
to non-combatants?  Is it OK to shoot prisoners?  Is one man's life
worth sacrificing your own?
In doing so, Saving Private Ryan focuses on the Big Issues -- life,
love, sacrifice, honor, courage (and cowardice), death, defiance, and
duty.  By focusing on these issues, Spielberg transcends the conventions
of the war movie -- both as action movie and as horror movie.  Although
some of the excitement of combat and most of the horror of war are
displayed, the movie really isn't about either.  It's a celebration of
values -- and war movies should be about values, because the strains of
war places those values in sharp relief.
(And one of the things that separates Saving Private Ryan from the other
summer blockbusters it is that we can argue what the movie is really
about.  Try doing that with Armageddon.)
One thing that no one will argue with is the quality of the
performances.  Damon, so good as the cocky genius Will Hunting and the
sincere fledgling trial attorney in The Rainmaker, has a limited role,
but he doesn't allow the symbolism of his character to interfere with
his effective portrayal of a scared Iowa farmboy.  Sizemore is not so
much of an actor as he is a medium, bringing back the shades of all the
sergeants from every World War II movie ever put on celluloid.  The rest
of the squad seemingly falls into patterns -- wise guys from Brooklyn,
sharpshooter farmboys, sensitive writer -- but the young actors breathe
new life into all the old stereotypes.  The images of these actors --
the frozen, heartbroken countenance of Jeremy Davies, the hard stare of
Edward Burns, the cracker drawl and sharp eye of Barry Pepper -- are the
ones that will stay with you long after the last reel ends.  (Especially
Adam Goldberg, who confronts a line of German prisoners with the mocking
call, "Juden!  Juden!" as he fingers his Star of David.)
And Hanks?  If his competition so far is Jim Carrey's leaden performance
in the dismal Truman Show, we can declare the Oscar race over now.
There won't be a better performance this year by anybody.  The American
soldier is first and foremost a citizen, and Hanks uses his Everyman
quality to fill this ideal perfectly.  He's a hard-bitten combat veteran
with the eyes and spirit of a scared recruit -- but he's a formidable
and brave leader.  He's able to exhibit a fuller emotional range here
than he did as the muffled Forrest Gump or the steely-eyed missile man
of Apollo 13, which contributes mightily to the power of the film.
Saving Private Ryan is a fitting tribute to the virtues we hold dear and
to the men of our armed forces who exhibit these virtues in war and
peace.  As I said, no higher praise is needed.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
I came away from The Siege as a big proponent of martial law.  Not because
of anything that took place on the screen, mind you, but because of the
people sitting behind me at the theater.  They didn't talk throughout the
whole entire movie, but they did interject annoying little comments at
every suspenseful moment.  I wouldn't have minded one little bit if a squad
of Green Berets had dragged them out of the theater and placed them in one
of the mini-concentration camps we see in The Siege, where they would be
condemned to watch Hudson Hawk over and over again to make them properly
respectful of the movie-going experience.
Given the opportunity to command, I think we'd all like to use the nation's
military in creative, fun ways.  Elderly drivers on the interstate would be
less of a problem if "Slower Traffic Keep Right" was enforced by tanks.
Marine guards stationed at ATMs would discourage those who habitually take
more than a minute to make a withdrawal.  If the Corps of Engineers can
control flooding, surely they can fix my dripping faucet.
The concept of martial law is a powerful temptation, and the makers of The
Siege  have given wholeheartedly.  What they have done is take a perfectly
good police procedural movie -- Law and Order writ large -- and turn it
into a movie about the inappropriate use of military officials.  Although
General Bruce Willis and his merry band of soldiers do nothing more
creative with their military firepower than block the Brooklyn Bridge with
tanks and torture terrorist suspects, they manage to derail The Siege and
twist it into nothing more than a civil libertarian's paranoid fantasy.
The Siege starts off oh-so-promisingly with Denzel Washington leading a
team of FBI counterterrorism experts through New York City in pursuit of
Palestinian terrorists fond of wearing plastique underwear.  There really
isn't anything bad to say about the first half of the movie -- plenty of
explosions, plenty of good police work, all the elements of a good action
film.  The Siege is pretty good about busting up some of the action-movie
cliches, although one expects that a really smart terrorist group would
have at least considered blowing up the obligatory post-arrest party at the
local cop watering hole.
Washington does his usual, effective job as the FBI's top man against
terrorism.  He's charming when he has to be, tough as nails, honest yet
capable of some trickery.  However, this is his third or fourth movie where
he's played a cop -- Fallen, most recently -- and it just seems that he's
wasting his time and talents here.  (No one really wants to see Denzel
typecast the same way that Sidney Poitier and Yaphet Kotto are, do they?)
Denzel's foil throughout is Annette Bening, who plays a CIA officer who
knows a whole lot more than she's telling -- which is nothing.  Bening was
a very brave choice for the casting director, who could have put a Demi
Moore clone in the role -- someone who would have played rough and tough
with the big boys.  Instead, Bening is smart, vulnerable, a little ditzy,
and completely believable.  However, the great surprise of this movie is
Denzel's partner, Tony Shalhoub.  Those who have seen him only on TV are in
for a treat.  He delivers laughs with deadpan humor, but he also handles
the emotional scenes well after his son is kidnapped by the Army later in
the movie.
The real problem The Siege has is that it can't invent an effective way for
the police to counter terrorism.  This, of course, isn't just a movie
problem, and it's probably not the fault of the filmmakers that they can't
figure out a good way for their characters to hunt down terrorists.  (The
movie starts with the real-life bombing of American military barracks in
Saudi Arabia, another terrorist crime that hasn't been solved.)  With the
lack of anything else better to do, The Siege brings in the troops to scour
Brooklyn and round up Arab-Americans.
And it is at this point that The Siege stops being a good action movie and
starts becoming a preachy lecture on constitutional rights and why they are
good.  I'm hopeful that Americans have, by now, internalized the notion
that concentration camps and military rule are Bad Things, and that the
message presented by The Siege really isn't necessary.  What we're left
with is Willis and Washington screaming at each other, time after time, in
a debate that isn't even remotely realistic.  Even the last action sequence
falls flat, as the Law of Economy of Characters catches up with the
movie.
Terrorism is a crazy, mixed up phenomenon, and it shouldn't be surprising
that The Siege is a crazy, mixed up movie.  To its credit, it deals with
the issues of terrorism on a more intellectual level than conventional
action movies dare to do -- and in coming with a half-baked, poorly thought
out solution, maybe it isn't far wrong in its analysis of the problem.
It's an admirable effort that falls just short of being good, which, I
suppose, is not a crime.
At least, it's not a crime in the same way that talking during a movie is a
crime.  Where are the Green Berets when you really need them, anyway?
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The great Yogi Berra was once hanging out with his Yankee drinking
buddies when one of them suggested going to see a porno movie.  "C'mon,
Yogi," one of them said, "let's go see a dirty movie."
"I don't know," Yogi replied.  "Who's in it?"
By their very nature, pornographic movies don't spend a lot of time on
character development or acting ability or costumes or, well, anything.
Boogie Nights is a real movie, with the goal of showing the audience the
personalities and the lives of the otherwise anonymous naked people
working in the 1970's  pornography industry.  It spends time on all of
the things that the dirty movies leave out, and its attention to the
details of the period and to the development of its characters make it a
very watchable and sometimes gripping film.
This is a movie that walks a narrow knife blade.  If this was a movie
devoted to romanticizing and glamorizing its characters, people would
have stayed away in droves.  The subject matter is not the stuff of high
tragedy, and the characters who populate the film are a little too
sleazy to merit overly dramatic treatment.  At the same time, it
wouldn't have taken much of an effort to turn this script into a piece
of comic fluff as insubstantial as Burt Reynolds's hairpiece.  The
1970's setting, the sexual content, and the essential dimness of the
characters, if handled improperly, could have landed this film into the
straight-to-video "Wild Comedy" shelf at Blockbuster.  Boogie Nights is
a balanced movie, walking the knife blade steadily, and almost without a
slip.
The center of the Boogie Nights universe is the San Fernando Valley
mansion of stag film director Jack Horner (Reynolds).  It's sort of a
low-rent Playboy Mansion, complete with string bikinis, a hot tub, a wet
bar, and a basement studio where (apparently) all the movies are
filmed.  And almost everybody we see in the movie is down in that
basement at one time or another, running the cameras, checking the
lighting, taking off their clothes...  it's an odd setup, and could have
been interpreted as a hedonist's Valhalla or a moralist's Sodom and
Gomorrah.  Boogie Nights only works because we get a third perspective:
the creative perspective, where the details of lighting and sound and
storyline are actually taken seriously by a dedicated team of people who
are sincere about their desire to make better dirty movies.
The movie is ostensibly about the rise and fall of Dirk Diggler (Mark
Wahlberg), a young busboy-turned-video matress dancer.  Wahlberg does a
better acting job than anybody had a right to expect -- unless he's just
naturally dim and earnest by nature.  If the Dirk character is ever --
for one second -- unlikable, or if the audience ever takes his macho
posturing seriously, the movie is doomed.  A movie like this is a heavy
load for a young, untried actor, but Wahlberg carries the movie like a
veteran.
He is aided by a spectacular supporting cast.  I'm not convinced that
the performances of Julianne Moore and Burt Reynolds are Oscar-caliber,
but Moore is sweet and affecting as the earth-mother porn-star Amber
Waves, and Reynolds's sleazy charm is made-to-order for his role.
Heather Graham is luminous in the thankless role of Rollergirl, whose
ever-present rollerskates are one of the movies many sight gags --
speaking of which, William H. Macy's hairstyle and drooping mustache
accentuate his brief part as a hangdog assistant director and unloved
husband (whose wife has the movie's signature line).
The unsung hero of Boogie Nights is Don Cheadle, best known for his role
as a district attorney on TV's Picket Fences.  He plays Buck, the only
member of the porno crew to have an independent existence outside the
industry -- as a low-rent stereo salesman, aspiring to open his own shop
with low wholesale prices.  He must have done something in a past life
to earn the enmity of the costume shop, because they're unmerciful to
him, dressing him in everything from Roy Rogers cowboy outfits to a Pat
Boone white suit.  Neverthess, Cheadle has one scene that defines the
movie.  He is (for once) dressed in a conservative suit, and is in a
bank looking for a loan to open his shop.  The bank manager denies
Buck's loan application on the grounds that he's a "pornographer".
"It's not fair," says Cheadle, and the great thing about this movie is
that we the audience agree with him.  We're relating to Buck as a person
and not a piece of meat.  We know his hopes and ambitions, we know
they've been crushed, and we identify with him completely -- just as we
identify with Julianne Moore as she loses custody of her son, just as we
identify with Burt Reynolds as he's forced to give up his pretentions of
being a filmmaker.  Without that identification, without that
relationship, Boogie Nights would sink like a stone -- but the acting is
so good that we're rooting for the characters, even as their worlds come
crashing down around them.
Boogie Nights also boasts superb set design and costume work.  Having
spent the latter part of the 1970s at Lyndon B. Johnson Elementary
School in suburban Texas, I am not qualified to judge whether or not
director Paul Thomas Anderson has successfully recaptured this era, but
it certainly looks that way.  The movie looks like a whole squadron of
UCLA cultural anthropology students have spent the past twelve months
digging through the flea markets and bargain bins of Los Angeles just to
find the appropriate Cheryl Tiegs poster to put in Mark Wahlberg's
bedroom, or the appropriate 8-track hi-fi for stereo salesman / porn
actor Don Cheadle to sell, or the just-right platform shoes and
"imported Italian nylon" costumes. By making the audience chuckle at the
bell-bottoms and disco balls that abound in Boogie Nights,
writer/director Anderson keeps them from taking the story too seriously,
and also allows the set design to carry the burden of the humor.
Dirk Diggler tells us that everybody has "one special thing" (his being
the size of his manly region, a running joke throughout).  Boogie Nights
is fortunate to have at least two special things:  the excellence of its
set design and the quality of its actors. If it's not a great movie,
it's an exceptionally well-crafted movie, and these days, that goes a
long, long way.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I walked into the second Austin Powers movie prepared to write a scathingly
bad review.  I was ready to deploy my army of poison pens -- er, make that
poison pixels -- in opposition to the overwhelming, shattering avalanche of
stupidity I knew to be coming.  I entered the theater totally prepared for
a never-ending cycle of potty jokes, sniggering references to body parts,
and gags drawn out far enough past their normal life expectancy to make an
actuary cry.  And I wasn't a bit disappointed.
Most people who liked the first Austin Powers movie won't be disappointed,
either.  Mike Myers dons the geeky glasses, the dead-weasel hairpiece, the
horribly bad bridgework, the fake chestal hair, the frilly lace cravat and
the velvet suit to duel Dr. Evil and save the world yet again.  Along the
way -- and this is the sort of movie where "along the way" matters more
than anything else -- Austin mugs, grimaces, shags, cavorts around naked,
and generally acts annoying.  Alternatively, the movie presents Myers as
Dr. Evil, who combines the worst features of Ernst Blofeld and Ed Sullivan.
I am not inclined to argue with people who think these characters are
funny, and will merely state that this sort of thing ain't my bag, baby.
If the Powers and Evil characters share one trait, it is their mammoth,
gargantuan narcissism. The real battle in The Spy Who Shagged Me isn't
between the forces of evil and good, it's between Myers's ego and his
generosity.  This movie could easily have been a Mike Myers extravaganza of
self love, with all other comic possibilities squeezed out.  Fortunately,
though, the forces of good make some inroads here that weren't made in
Austin Powers:  International Man of Mystery.  The Spy Who Shagged Me is a
better movie because Myers is a little more willing to share the wealth and
spread out the good lines more evenly.  This allows the focus to be taken
off the Powers/Evil duality occasionally and allows a little bit of genuine
humor to sneak in now and then.
Consider the treatment of the female leads in both movies.  Elizabeth
Hurley was perfectly cast as Austin's sidechick in the first movie (she's
the perfect casting choice for every movie she's ever been in) but the
spotlight wasn't really ever on Our Liz.  Hurley shows up momentarily in
The Spy Who Shagged Me and is generously given one of the truly funny lines
in the movie -- not much, but one more than she had before.
In comparison, the lovely Heather Graham as CIA agent Felicity Shagwell
redeems the entire movie.  In a movie season replete with special effects,
the sight of Heather Graham in a micro-miniskirt is still the best piece of
eye candy around.  Felicity is smart, dangerous, absolutely ravishing, and
has a way with the sexy one liner.  "You're light on your feet," Austin
raves as they dance.  "I'm pretty light off my feet, too," says the
shagadelic Felicity, in a tone calculated to make a man's knees turn to
jelly.  This is Heather Graham's happening, baby, and it's groovy, man.
Seth Green had a marginal part in the first movie as Scott Evil, but he
stole the show with his criticism of his old man's megalomaniacal ways.
Green gets a little more time to shine here, imparting a little bit of
Generation X common sense to the Sixties silliness. There's still too
strong of a strain of whiny brat in his performance, but he's got the
adolescent sneer down pat.  When Dr. Evil dubs his newest plan to destroy
the world "The Alan Parsons Project", Green is there to poke wicked fun; "I
can't wait for Project Bananarama."
Unfortunately, the wealth isn't shared all that equally.  Rob Lowe, who was
so good in Wayne's World, is well-cast as a young Robert Wagner but gets
little to do.  (One wishes that Wayne Campbell would make a cameo
appearance, if only to remind us how babelicious Heather Graham is.)
Kristen Johnson disappears in the second reel, which is too bad -- she's
got the Natasha Fatale accent down pat.
I thought The Spy Who Shagged Me was quite a bit funnier than the
original.  Most of the comedy takes place below the waist, but now and
again there's a funny bit that provides a respite from the onslaught of
bathroom and sex jokes.  It's still not that great, though.  (The biggest
reaction I heard from the audience was when Austin's own Willie Nelson
showed up in a cameo.)  Your inner fifteen-year-old will be happy to see
see The Spy Who Shagged Me, but those looking for more sophisticated humor
should stay away and avoid further disappointment.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I don't say this about many movies, but I am really hoping there's a
sequel to The Truman Show.  The concept of the movie (in case you missed
the commercials and the trailers) is that Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is
the star of the world's most popular TV show -- where his whole entire
life is being filmed and broadcast worldwide to a slack-jawed group of
voyeurs, 24 hours a day, around the clock.  At the end of the movie -- I
promise you, I'm not giving away any plot points -- Truman reaches the
end of the impossibly gigantic soundstage and leaves forever.
And wouldn't that be a cool sequel?  You have this man who has been
trapped in a 1950's sitcom hell for his whole entire life.  He escapes
to find that he's monumentally popular, but with no idea whatsoever how
to function in normal life.  Hey, it might not be that great, but it
would probably be better than The Truman Show.
The heart of The Truman Show is the show-within-a-show that's broadcast
via satellite on one of those 500 channels we're all supposed to have
one day.  We see a lot of the TV show in the movie.  In fact, great big
chunks of the movie appear in what might be called Trumanvision -- from
hidden cameras placed in odd or oblique places.  (Would they really need
a camera in the back of a vending machine?)  Truman Burbank is an
insurance salesman (we never see him do a lick of work, though) who
lives a thouroughly hum-drum, drab and normal life on an island off the
Florida coast which he can never leave.  The most colorful thing about
him is his clothes -- tweed jackets worn over sweaters worn over
brightly colored striped shirts, with odd-looking plaid casual wear --
all presumably available for purchase in the Truman Show catalogue.
The mantra of sitcom creation is that your characters have to be
likeable.  I don't myself agree with this approach -- see Seinfeld and
the better British comedies for examples -- but its the path that the
creators of The Truman Show have taken.  Truman is utterly, totally,
likeable in every way, and it's just disgusting.  You'd think that with
Carrey playing the role of Truman, there's be some satiric comic edge to
the character -- but there just isn't for most of the movie.  There just
doesn't seem to be enough comedy or drama in the script to sustain the
TV show as entertainment.  We see people around the world caught up in
the show -- there's even a theme bar for some reason -- but with no
understanding of how or why anyone would be able to watch the show.  And
because the TV show takes up so much of the movie's running length, the
movie ends up being flat and unentertaining as well.
The Truman Show, like any poorly-written TV-show, suffers from what
might be called Jessica Fletcher's Disease.  Anyone who's watched
Murder, She Wrote can tell you about this evil sickness:  there'll be a
point in the plot where the murderer is supposedly unmasked, and Angela
Lansbury will say, "Well, there's still something bothering me."  What's
bothering her, of course, is that there's still twenty minutes left to
the end of the show.  Just as Murder, She Wrote must end with the
murderer being caught, The Truman Show must end with Truman figuring out
his predicament and escaping.  Which it does, but it takes forever, and
there isn't much of anything along the way to compensate for the long,
drawn out ending.
You want comedy?  Well, outside of Truman's wardrobe, there isn't much
of that.  Carrey has a couple of moments where he's loopily staring into
the hidden camera behind his bathroom mirror, and he has a frenzied
escape-attempt scene that looks like it was penciled in to showcase his
manic style briefly.  Laura Linney plays Truman's wife, Meryl, whose
frozen-faced features highlight her role as part-time wife, part-time
infomercial hostess:  she's funny, if you think annoying is funny.
You want drama?  There's a couple of decent dramatic scenes in The
Truman Show, but they don't seem to mesh.  Without giving away plot
points, they come one right on top of the other and involve major
changes in his family structure.  We jump from this to an interview with
Ed Harris, the show's creator, who interjects a long defense of the show
and his place as Truman's protector.  And then we jump back to the
show... which continues as before, with Truman seemingly unaffected by
all the turmoil in his life in the past twelve hours.
If there's no comedy, and little drama, why see The Truman Show?  Maybe
there's a message or something, like there was in writer/producer Andrew
Niccol's previous work, the lifeless genetic fantasy Gattaca.  In
Gattaca, like The Truman Show, Niccol comes up with a great movie
concept but does a lackluster job of fleshing it out and making it
real.  As Gattaca plods on to its inevitable resolution, it leaves us
with a message -- don't discriminate against people based on their
genetic coding.  Fair enough.  The message from The Truman Show is...
what?  It's not nice to imprison people on soundstages and transmit
their lives?
I know there are people out there who loved this movie.  Fine.  I'm glad
you enjoyed it.  Me, I'm waiting for the sequel, and I hope that it's
better than The Truman Show.  It would almost have to be.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
In a Hollywood culture that tries again and again to (in William
Goldman's words) to recapture past magic, Toy Story 2 was, perhaps,
inevitable.  Few movies have been as magical, as original, as
groundbreaking as the first Toy Story.  The sheer technical wizardry of
John Lasseter and the Pixar team, the sterling voice talent, the
inimitable Randy Newman soundtrack, the charm of the characters and the
sheer ingenuity of the story combined to create a truly astonishing
piece of work.
And, of course, Toy Story was a truly profitable piece of work, all but
guaranteeing a sequel.  And as a sequel, Toy Story 2 labors under some
disadvantages.  The first Toy Story sent a high standard for technical
excellence that the sequel must equal or better.  The audience would
expect to see new things, meaning that much more of the story would have
to take place outside of Andy's room.  New characters would have to
appear, including a new villain.  The Buzz Lightyear character -- whose
grandiose, deluded personality was so central to the first movie --
would have to be reexamined.  The friendship between Buzz and Woody the
Cowboy would have to be as interesting as their rivalry was.  And so
forth.
Toy Story 2 tries very hard to overcome these disadvantages and
generally succeds.  On a technical level, the movie is an overwhelming
success.  The "sets" (for want of a better word) are nothing short of
spectacular, especially in the final action sequences.  Trees spread in
green canopies, with every leaf digitally rendered.  A scene where Woody
must navigate a minefield of cheese doodles shows every doodle in
astonishing detail.  One scene, where the toys use a remote control to
click through an infinity of cable channels, practically begs for close
frame-by-frame analysis.  The wizards at Pixar have done it again.
As far as the characterization goes, Toy Story is fortunate to have a
large ensemble cast of familiar voice talent that needs little
introduction.  (The first Toy Story had a wide range of toys doing many
different things; the sequel has fewer toys doing more things, which
more or less evens out.)  Even the villains are familiar, with Wayne
Knight voicing the geeky toy collector, and Kelsey Grammer reprising his
Sideshow Bob role from "The Simpsons".  The only real new character is
Joan Cusack as a spunky cowgirl with a heart of gold -- who has the
movie's heartrending moment, complete with the superlative voice of
Sarah
McLachlan.singing "When She Loved Me".  (Which should finally get Randy
Newman an Oscar, by the way, and it's about time, too.)
Tom Hanks has the lead role of Woody the Cowboy, and it's hard enough
imagining anyone doing a better job.  Hanks has taken so many serious
roles lately that having him play a role that reminds of the comic,
childish side he sow famously showcased in Big is a real treat.  (Hanks
even gets to sing "You've Got A Friend in Me" from the first movie.)
Tim Allen has the less showy role this time, but the story allows him to
relapse into the old Buzz Lightyear persona from time to time, which is
a hoot.
The problem with Toy Story 2, however, is that it doesn't have the same
interplay between Hanks and Allen that was the source for much of the
humor in the original movie.  To compensate, Toy Story 2 is packed
instead with references and allusions to other movies.  Sometimes this
works.  The Jurassic Park reference is a scream, and there's a combined
reference to The Empire Strikes Back and Field of Dreams that's very
funny.  Sometimes it doesn't work.  The whole last half of the movie, at
times, plays like a retread of the first two Die Hard movies.  Overall,
the pop-culture references are neat, and they serve to keep parents
interested (in much the same way that Robin WIlliams did in Aladdin).
But the constant gags seem to indicate a lack of trust in the Toy Story
source material, and a lack of originality in the storytelling.
The ultimate question with Toy Story 2, I suppose, is whether it
succeeds in its mission to recapture the past magic of the orginal.  It
succeeds spectacularly on the technical side -- a a credit to Team Pixar
and their technological bag of tricks.  However, the story of Toy Story
2 isn't as strong (though it has its compensations).  Toy Story 2 isn't
a great, groundbreaking picture by any means, but it does its best to
cultivate the ground broken by Toy Story, and that is enough.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Oh, if life were like the movies, I'd never be blue."
    -- Alan Jackson, "Here In The Real World"

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
She asked me what kind of movies I liked, and I couldn't answer.  "All
sorts of movies," would have been true, but it wouldn't have been an
answer.  Say "action movies" and she'll think you're just some typical
guy who would drag her to Jean Claude Van Damme kickboxer movies.  Say
"science fiction movies" and she'll think you're a member of the
geekhood, some sort of inane loser who can't match his socks.  Saying
"Quentin Tarantino movies" or, God help you, "Jackie Chan movies"
wouldn't help matters on that front, either.  "Independent movies?"
Please.
It's not any better to go the other way, either.  Say "gushy romantic
movies", and there's not telling what she'll think of that, probably not
anything good.  (I think I ended up saying something about how I didn't
see a lot of foreign movies, and changing the conversation to how good
Being John Malkovich was.)
Of course, at that time, I hadn't seen The Green Mile.  I wish I had.
That way, I'd have a ready-made answer:  "I like movies like The Green
Mile." And I liked The Green Mile for... oh, well, for several reasons.
* I like movies with Gary Sinise in them.  Nitpickers will point out
that Sinise is in The Green Mile for only a moment, and his performance
is hardly the most stirring in the picture.  Fine.  I like Gary Sinise.
I especially like it when he hooks up with Tom Hanks.  The Green Mile
isn't quite in the same neighborhood as Forrest Gump or Apollo 13, but
the caliber of acting is just as high.
And, you know, when you think about it, there are a lot of actors in
this movie who have the same high acting ethic as Sinise.  Consider the
work of David Morse and James Cromwell, two talented actors who have
spent a lot of time lately playing heavies.  They're both here in
second-banana roles, as a prison guard and a prison warden,
respectively.  Fortunately, instead of playing the bad guy, both Morse
and Cromwell get roles where their inner decency gets to shine through.
It's fun to see tough-guy actors play vulnerable for a bit -- the same
tough-but-vulnerable style that makes Sinise such a great actor.
(Hanks, of course, has perfected tough-but-vulnerable, and gets another
shot at playing Henry Fonda here.  And the lumbering, humongous Michael
Duncan has the archetypical tough-but-vulnerable role as inmate John
Coffey.)
*  I like movies with realistic Bad Guys in them.  I'm sure you've
noticed that, lately, every Bad Guy in the movies is some kind of
supergenius.  This trend reached its culmination not too long ago with
Con Air, featuring an all-star cast of supersmart crooks.  (Perhaps,
given the recent advances in law enforcement, you have to be pretty
smart to get away with crimes.)
But evil wears a thousand faces, and the supergenius villain is just
one.  One of the things I liked about The Green Mile is how we get to
see a lot of those faces.
You'd expect to see a lot of facets of evil in a prison movie, anyway.
Most of The Green Mile takes place in Cellblock E of the Louisiana State
Penitentiary, known as the "green mile" partially because of the green
linoleum floors and partially because it's the death row, the "last
mile" before execution.  It's not a homelike place, but it's not a
brutal, evil place, either.  (Morse's character is nicknamed "Brutal",
but that's just irony.)  The guards have the attitude that the death
house is more of a long-term intensive care ward, and are treated well
in return by the prisoners.  Graham Greene plays a silent-but-proud
inmate.  Harry Dean Stanton shuffles through the movie as a prison
trusty.  Michael Jeter makes a strong impression as a pathetic,
broken-down Cajun lifer.  (Jeter usually annoys me a great deal, but
it's nice to see him in a good role.)
The banality of evil is illustrated by Sam Rockwell as new prisoner
"Wild Bill" So and So.  Rockwell gets to chew up nearly as much scenery
here as he did as the red-shirted crew member in Galaxy Quest.  His
antics liven up the soggy midpart of the movie -- especially when he
gets into a pissing contest with the guards -- but one believes that, if
he stays on the Green Mile long enough, that he'll get just as
broken-down as the rest of the cellblock.
But the real evil inside the prison walls isn't in a cell.  The real bad
guy on the Green Mile is a guard, one Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchison).
Percy, you see, just happens to be the Governor's nephew, which means in
Depression Louisiana that he can get away with about pretty much
anything he pleases.  He is vain, petulant, and casually cruel, both to
the inmates and to his fellow guards.  Not only does Percy have the best
personality in the movie, it is he -- far more than Hanks's bland prison
guard or the inarticulate John Coffey -- that keeps the motor of the
movie humming along during its three-hour length.  It's his character
that shows the true subtle face of evil.  Percy manages to commit the
most evil act of the year in movies, but even this act is subtle and
understated.  More than anything else, The Green Mile reminds us that
evil isn't always over-the-top.
*  I like smart storytelling.  Finally, the best thing about The Green
Mile is the story.  Frank Darabont pulls off another bravura performance
in his second adaptation of a Stephen King prison novel.
The Green Mile is nowhere near the movie that The Shawshank Redemption
was, of course, and it would be unfair to make such comparisons anyway
were they not inevitable.  (My theory is that Shawshank is rooted much
more strongly in the problems of the heart and the triumph of the spirit
than The Green Mile, with its emphasis on the supernatural, can be.)
What both films share, though, is a great story expertly told.
Shawshank is a better story, but it depends on one shattering moment
that changes our perception about the movie.  The Green Mile is the
lesser tale, but it is told more artistically, with the story threads
carefully stacked up one by one.
My boss does these three-dimensional jigsaw puzzles, and she brought one
into the office the other day that was a representation of Mount
Rushmore.  The puzzle is just some irregularly shaped pieces of
cardboard, none of which look like much of anything.  Instead of locking
together, these pieces stack one on top of the other, and a shape forms
around the contours of the edges.  The Green Mile is built in much the
same way.  One piece stacks on top of another piece with artistic
precision.  And even if you think you know what piece is next, there are
lots of other pieces that have to be put in place first -- with the
final result looking quite different than what you might expect at first
glance.  Instead of one big surprise, The Green Mile has lots of little
surprises that add up in time.  (The original novel, as you may
recollect, was published in serial form, which could account for the
Dickensian structure of the screenplay.)
Of course, there are things I didn't like about The Green Mile (namely,
the bookend structure of the beginning and ending which apes the
structure of Saving Private Ryan) and things that I liked, but not well
enough to include in the review (the Barry Pepper performance, let's
say, as long as we're on the topic of Saving Private Ryan).  There will
be things about the movie that, should you see it, you will like more
than the things I have enumerated here.  And that, finally, is the best
recommendation I can give for The Green Mile.  If this is the kind of
movie you like, you should go and discover its good points for yourself.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html

Title
Review for Go (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I caught Go on the rebound.  My chosen movie for the evening was Lee Marvin
leading The Dirty Dozen, playing at Austin's Paramount Theater
(www.theparamount.org) as part of their summer classic movie series.
Unfortunately, when the MGM lion appeared at the start of the movie, he
didn't roar.  The Paramount's sound system was missing in action.  After a
couple of false starts, the theater manager announced that they couldn't
get the sound rolling, and that re-admit passes would be waiting at the box
office.  (Note to film preservationists:  According to the Paramount
people, this is the only 35mm reel of The Dirty Dozen in existence, and
what I saw of it looked badly faded.)
I had two dollars in my pocket -- drinks and popcorn at the Paramount are
reasonably priced, thank goodness -- which meant that the only available
cure for cinema interruptis was a trip to the dollar movie, where Go looked
like the best of a mixed bag. In one of the opening scenes, three
supermarket clerks are sitting in the back of the store, playing a "Dead
Celebrities" word game, and one throws out the name, "Lee Marvin".  I was
in the right place.
Go's cinematic origins, though, have less to do with Lee Marvin and more to
do with Quentin Tarantino.  Go actually starts in a small cafe with a young
man and a young woman chatting about nothing, a conversation that is
recapitulated in the last third of the movie.  Pulp Fiction fans will
recognize this homage, and will feel right at home with Go's interlocking
tripartite narrative.  Go takes place in the same seedy underbelly of Los
Angeles that houses the Tarantino universe, but its characters are younger,
hipper, and less cynical.  Nobody in Go eats Big Kahuna Burgers or hangs
out at Jackrabbit Slim's or reads Modesty Blaise on the can.  They're too
busy dancing at rave parties and worrying about how to pay the rent.
Unlike the businesslike hitmen in Pulp Fiction, the characters in Go are
likable and spunky:  there aren't any bad guys in this movie to speak of.
To reveal much of the twisty plot of Go would be to spoil it entirely.  As
the movie's theme song suggests, Go is a Magic Carpet Ride, whizzing up,
down, and all around, back and forth through time and space, with all the
plot points intricately woven together in a tight-knit pattern. The
narrative skips from a dumpy Los Angeles supermarket (one almost expects
The Dude from The Big Lebowski to shuffle by in his bathrobe) to the Strip
in Las Vegas to a Christmas Eve rave party in an abandoned warehouse.
Oddball characters abound, from a pair of blissed-out Vegas bridesmaids to
a supermarket checker who gets stoned to the point where he can hear cats
talk, to a police couple with... shall we say... outside interests.
Since I can't talk about the plot much -- other to say that it's a hoot --
I'll concentrate on the first-rate job by the ensemble cast.  The two most
familiar faces belong to Jay Mohr and William Fichtner.  You will remember
Mohr as the rival super-agent Burt Sugar from the sainted Jerry Maguire,
where he spent the movie stealing scenes and clients from Tom Cruise.
Here, he's struggling young actor Zack, who we first see planning a
pre-rave partner with fellow actor Adam (Scott Wolf) that, apparently,
requires mass quantities of frozen concentrated orange juice.  Fichtner was
last seen as the shuttle pilot in Armageddon, whose job was to delay the
movie so that Bruce Willis could wait until the last possible second to
destroy the asteroid.  In Go, Fichtner graduates from being the poor man's
Christopher Walken up to the relatively-well-off man's Christopher Walken.
He's got the same role that Kevin Spacey had in L.A. Confidential,
policeman to the stars, and if he plays the part with less panache than
Spacey, he more than makes up for it in creepiness.
But the real stars of Go are the younger actors, and they get a splendid
chance to shine here.  The first third of the movie focuses on the
aforementioned supermarket clerks.  Sarah Polley is nothing short of
hypnotic as the supermarket checker who decides, almost impulsively, to
branch out into drug sales.  You don't see that many anti-heroines out
there, but Polley is everything you'd want in such a character, smart,
tough, streetwise, brave, ready to take a risk, and ready to bail out if
the need arises.  Her sidechick is Katie Holmes, who appears to be on TV in
something called Dawson's Creek that I've never heard of.  She's got the
movie's first, enigmatic lines, but she mostly tags along behind Polley's
character.  Nathan Bexton does some good scene-stealing work as their
stoned friend.
In the second third of the movie, Go shifts abruptly from twisty drug
intrigue to full-scale male fantasy movie.  Young British actor Desmond
Askew and Taye Diggs tear a wide swath through Las Vegas, getting into more
trouble in half an hour than most of us can manage all year.  Askew is
interesting as a second-generation Austin Powers, ineptly roaming the
casinos.  Taye Diggs doesn't get much screen time, but manages to leave an
impression of being the incarnation of cool.
There are a couple more things I could say about the movie, but Go is at
its best when it manages to surprise the audience -- and it does so with
style.  Go is a surprisingly good movie with some really exceptional
ensemble performances by some talented young actors.  (It's not The Dirty
Dozen, of course, but what is nowadays?)

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The joke goes like this:  What do you get when you cross a lawyer and a
mobster?  Someone who makes you an offer you can't understand.
What do you get when you cross a psychiatrist with a mobster?  Well,
instead of a clever punch line, you get Analyze This, with Billy Crystal as
the neurotic psychiatrist and Robert DeNiro as his patient, a gangland
leader suffering from anxiety attacks and difficulties in managing his
inner rage.  It's a cross between genres -- Goodfellas meets What About
Bob? -- and a cross between a legitimately funny movie and a dull, lifeless
plodding mess.  (Which makes it a double-cross, sort of.)
Analyze This is one of those movies where you don't need character
development.  Crystal is the same character here that he plays in his best
movies -- City Slickers, let's say, and Throw Momma From the Train -- an
ordinary, wise-ass schmuck carried on by circumstances he can't control.
DeNiro, on the other hand, plays his part like a cartoon character of his
previous performances.  (To be charitable, this is probably the best he can
do in a script that has him bawling at Merrill Lynch commercials.)  The
script even does us the favor of having Crystal recognize DeNiro from TV,
so their relationship doesn't need to go through the initial development
stage, either.
The good part of the movie -- the only good part of the movie -- is the
banter between Crystal and DeNiro.  It's sharp, funny dialogue between two
master actors.  It's great to see how they challenge each other, how they
try to outdo each other, and how they manage to make it funny.  At one
point, Crystal, in a hurry to get DeNiro out of his vacation, offers to see
him exclusively.  DeNiro considers this:  "You want me to clear your
schedule for you?"
And the whole movie is like that.  Crystal tries to use psychology to
control DeNiro, DeNiro tries to use force to control Crystal... it's a
great comic tug-of-war, and it makes Analyze This worth seeing, or at least
renting.
Analyze This forces us to ask the question:  What has happened to the
American comedy?  Can we make comedies in America anymore?  Have we lost
our comic heritage?  If Analyze This is the best comedy of the year -- and
it may well be -- is there hope for movie comedies, or must the comedy
genre disappear over the horizon like the Western?.
Think about it.  We're making three kinds of comedies in America right
now:  the Tom Hanks/Meg Ryan romantic comedies, the teenage gross-out
comedies, and Eddie Murphy comedies.  That's it.  Robin Williams and Jim
Carrey are busy doing introspective special effects movies, Steve Martin
and Bill Murray are doing small parts in smaller movies nowadays, and Mel
Brooks has dropped off the face of the earth.  The funniest actor working
in Hollywood right now may very well be Jackie Chan.  Think about it.
Because real comedies like Analyze This and In and Out and The Big Lebowski
are so rare these days, it's sad to see what happens when they fail.
Analyze This fails because it can't go far beyond the pairing of its two
top characters.  There's nothing to link the conversations between Crystal
and DeNiro together.  Half the movie is Crystal being pulled away from
whatever it is he's doing to have another conversation with DeNiro.  It's
almost as if Crystal is a yo-yo and the only suspense in the movie is how
far he will be able to get away before DeNiro tugs on his string again.
Although the movie elicits a good supporting performance from Joe Viterelli
as DeNiro's messenger, it wastes performances from Lisa Kudrow and Chazz
Palminteri as Crystal's fiancee and DeNiro's rival, respectively.
There's nothing really wrong with Analyze This.  It's a decent enough
comedy with two great comic actors strutting their stuff.  It's got a few
laughs, here and there, which is great.  The problem is that there aren't
enough laughs, anywhere, and that's a problem that one movie can't solve by
itself.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
I was talking with one of my reformed slacker friends about the movie scene
in Austin, when the subject of Robert Rodriguez (Desperado, From Dusk Till
Dawn) came up.  "He's a great guy," I was told.  "We were pretty good
friends when we were both living in Austin."
I asked, "Is it true that he got the money to film El Mariachi at
Pharmaco?"  Pharmaco, by the way, is (or was, they've renamed it) a
pharmaceutical research company that pays impoverished University of Texas
students to serve as guinea pigs in drug research.
If you know that story, you probably know the one about how Harvey Keitel
got hold of the script for Reservoir Dogs and gave Quentin Tarantino a hand
in finding the money to shoot the film with real actors instead of his
video-store pals.  Stories like these are to Generation X what the story of
Lana Turner getting discovered at the soda fountain were to an earlier
generation.  Being an independent film director/producer/writer is today
what being a movie star was to kids in the Forties, or what being a rock
star was to kids in the Sixties.  It is the coolest thing you could ever
hope to be.  (This side of playing quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys, of
course.)
The real legend of The Blair Witch Project has nothing to do with what may
or may not be lurking in the Maryland woods.  It has to do with novice
filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, and how they turned a few
thousand dollars and a few thousand feet of 16mm footage into the
multimillion dollar blockbuster that's got everyone talking this summer.
The story's familiar to anyone who's caught any part of the tremendous buzz
about this movie; directors Myrick and Sanchez recruited three actors,
equipped them with cameras and sent them into the woods for eight days with
little more than a promise that it might get a little scary for them alone
out there.  Combine this utterly unconventional approach to moviemaking
with the unprecedented positive word-of-mouth that the movie received on
the festival circuit and on the Internet, and it's the sort of story that
would make any aspiring wannabe director sick with envy.
The Blair Witch Project itself isn't as compelling as the story of how the
movie was made, but it's not far behind.  It's a taut, scary horror
thriller, one of the best of an increasingly bad lot of 1999 movies.  (It's
a bit too early to tap as an Oscar contender, but one wishes Oscar would
have a Rookie of the Year category.)
It begins in the most matter-of-fact way possible, with the now-famous
caption:  "In October of 1994, three student film makers disappeared in the
woods near Burkittesville, Maryland. One year later, their footage was
found."  And that's it.  No fancy opening sequence, no list of casting
directors or assistant executive producers, nothing to break the
verisimilitude that all this footage was shot by three kids wandering
around in the forest. (Which most of it was.)
The three kids are Heather, Josh, and Mike, played by Heather Donahue, Josh
Leonard, and Mike Williams.  They've checked out a couple of cameras and an
audio recorder from school, and they're on their way to the town of
Burkittesville (formerly Blair, we're told) to shoot some location scenes
for a documentary on the local legend, whatever it is.  One of the movie's
little conceits is that the trio carries two cameras for two different
purposes.  The actual scenes that they're going to use in the documentary
are shot in black-and-white on a 16mm movie camera.  They're also carrying
along some sort of color camcorder that they mostly use to goof off with.
So, the footage of Heather speaking to the camera in the town graveyard is
in black-and-white, and the footage of the cast relaxing in the
authentically cheesy motel room afterward is in color.
This conceit defines the look of the movie in three important ways.  First,
film from the two cameras is interwoven together, so the movie switches
back and forth from B&W to color more often than the shuttle bus that runs
between Kansas and Oz.  Since both cameras are hand-held most of the time,
the whole movie is herky- jerky enough to cause motion sickness in some
viewers.  And since cameras need light to operate, there are a lot of
scenes that take place either in total blackness or in the eerie glow of a
flashlight.
But the look of the movie isn't what you'll remember, isn't what will keep
you up until the wee hours of the morning.  The hyperbole about The Blair
Witch Project being the scariest movie ever aside, this is a movie that
will scare you.  It may not scare you sitting in the theater.  (Myself, I
didn't think I was all that scared, although it was comforting to have an
aisle seat just in case things got a little too scary.)  But there are
scenes that will stick in your memory, that will haunt you at odd moments
when you're alone in your car or trying to get to sleep or when you hear a
strange noise in the middle of the night.
The Blair Witch Project does not rely on surprise or gore, the two
mainstays of the Hollywood slasher movie.  Instead, it uses the rules of
the campfire ghost story.  Myrick and Sanchez know that fear is contagious,
and they scare their actors silly, knowing that they will transmit the fear
to each other and to the audience.  They also know that they don't need to
show a lot of really scary stuff in the movie, just set up a scary
situation and let the mind fill in the blanks.  (Next time you get the
chance to tell a ghost story at a campfire out in the woods to a group of
kids that hasn't seen the movie, tell the story of the Blair Witch and see
what happens.)
But The Blair Witch Project is more than just a spooky ghost story, thanks
to the work of actors Heather, Mike, and Josh.  There are some drawbacks to
their performance.  They're a bunch of Generation X twits, for one thing.
They wear plaid flannel shirts and whine and moan a lot.  Like Tarantino
characters, they seem to have only two modes of conversation, obscenity and
pop culture references.  ("Did you ever see Deliverance?" one of them asks
as they make their way into the woods.)
They're highly dependent on emotion.  As they wander through the woods with
only a compass, trying to figure out which direction civilization lies, one
of them asks, "How does east feel?"  The ordeal of being lost in the woods
drains them emotionally to the point that they have to stop walking and
have a good cry every once in a while.  (I kept imagining what would happen
if you placed the squad from Saving Private Ryan in a similar situation,
after Normandy, seeing piles of rocks and twigs might not be so bad.)
But these are minor quibbles.  The cast does a great, intense, powerful
job.  There's an unfakable genuineness and sincerity to their
performances.  We're not just being told that they're cold and hungry and
scared, we feel it along with them (the hungry part, especially, given how
much popcorn costs these days).   Their slow, linear descent into the
nether world of psychological disintegration is much scarier than the
things that go bump in the night.
Donahue is outstanding, taking a part that could have been nothing more
than a Jamie Lee Curtis scream queen role and taking it to the next level.
The movie's signature scene is hers, and her brittle, tense, unblinking
delivery will stay with you.  So will the last scenes of the movie, filmed
in this, um... well... place.... with this stuff everywhere... and... well,
I could describe it, but you'll want to see it for yourself without me
spoiling it.
One of the best things about The Blair Witch Project is that even though we
know (or think we know) that Josh, Heather and Mike are doomed, we're still
rooting for them all the way, hoping that they'll find their car and get
back home so Josh can call his girlfriend and so Heather can to turn in the
camera equipment on time.  And as we root for them, we're also rooting for
Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez, the young geniuses who started with
nothing but managed to spin straw (and twigs, and rocks, and slime) into
gold.  Box office aside, the real success of The Blair Witch Project will
be the hope and inspiration it will give to the next generation of
filmmakers, actors, and screenwriters seeking to become the coolest thing
you can ever hope to be.
Movie Reviews:  http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
"So how does a conservative movie reviewer, who doesn't want to spoil
the movie, write a review? The same way he takes the lamb chop from
rottweiller -- carefully. Another way is to fill two-thirds of the
column with irrelevant woolgathering about other topics so that you
only have room for a paragraph for the real review."  -- Jonah Goldberg

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Seth the angel (Nicholas Cage) and Maggie the surgeon (Meg Ryan) are
discussing tears.  Seth, who has never cried or wiped away a tear, wants
to know why people cry.  Maggie tries to explain it in medical terms:
the tear ducts overact for some reason, nobody knows why.  Seth knows
the real reason and says so -- there's too much emotion, and the body
just can't handle it and weeps.
Well, it could be that the review format just can't handle all the
emotion I feel about City of Angels.  This movie is too big for a
standard review, too majestic for the limits of this column.  In a
Hollywood that celebrates action and explosion and glamor, this is a
movie that's not afraid to embrace the important issues of love, faith,
loss and devotion that we face everyday. It is, superficially, about the
romance between the angel and the surgeon, but it reaches out past the
barriers of the love story to awaken the hearts and spirits of the
audience.
One of the many things that makes this movie so special is its treatment
of angels.  The movie is chock-full of angels, who appear wearing their
long black trench coats (in Los Angeles?!?), watching the world from
their perches on tall buildings, reading over people's shoulders at the
library, hanging around the beach at sunset, silently reassuring
skittish air traffic controllers, comforting the dying.  But instead of
introducing us to Seth standing atop one of the massive Los Angeles
skyscrapers, City of Angels opens at a very human level.  A mother takes
care of her sick daughter, unaware that Seth lurks invisibly, waiting to
take the child home.  It's a touching and wrenching moment, amplified by
Cage's soulful expression -- and it allows us to see the angels as more
than just icons or symbols of something else.  We feel Seth's pain, even
as he is not able to himself -- and we feel it because of Cage's
wonderful acting job.
And if Cage is wonderful, Cage and Ryan together are electric.  Their
early scenes are almost heartstopping -- actually heartstopping at
first, as their eyes meet over an operating room table after a heart
surgery gone awry.  The scenes where Seth is invisibly comforting Maggie
are silently eloquent, and when they finally talk, Cage speaks with such
understated passion and sincerity that it's hard to believe that this is
the same guy who said, "Put the bunny down!" in Con Air.  As an angel,
Cage is pensive and somewhat lacking in effect, but his rare smiles
light up the screen.  And as he falls to earth and becomes human, the
contrast between his previous reserved demeanor and his joyful
exuberance at being able to feel is intoxicating.
Ryan has a much less showy part, but is equally as effective.  Her
opening scene is similar to Seth's:  after a surgery scene straight out
of ER, she has to comfort the family but isn't able to do it.
Unfortunately, she's not given much opportunity to stretch her acting
muscles -- it's as if she's spending the whole movie reacting instead of
acting.  Nonetheless, she's got amazing chemistry with Cage, and there's
an image where golden light floods the hospital's dank locker room that
deserves to be put on a stained-glass window.  Ryan's main task is to
convince Seth of the charms of being human, and she succeeds
marvelously.
I haven't told you everything about this movie, and I'm afraid that I
can't.  I haven't even mentioned the stellar supporting work from Andre
Braugher and Dennis Frantz.  I haven't mentioned a thing about the great
work of the director and cinematographer.  This is a stellar movie,
worthy of much higher praise and analysis than I feel capable of, and I
encourage you to experience City of Angels for yourself.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
The James Bond movies are sometimes described as formulaic, but that's
not quite right.  A formula is more exact, more scientific.  You mix so
many cubic centimeters of one substance with so many milliliters of
another substance and you get the same number of joules or watts or
whatever-it-is every time.  Bond movies are a lot more like recipes.
You have the same ingredients every time, but if the ingredients are
stale or you have too much of one thing and not enough of another,
whatever it is you're cooking doesn't taste right.
Here, in The World is Not Enough, most of the ingredients are there for
a successful Bond movie.  In fact, you can almost run them down in a
checklist -- Roger Ebert did exactly that in his Chicago Sun-Times
review, in fact.  We've got Brosnan as the best Bond of the decade, the
redoubtable Dame Judith Dench as M, the new Iron Lady of the United
Kingdom, and the winsome Samantha Bond as Moneypenny in the front
office.  John Cleese joins Q (Desmond Llewellyn) in the gadget shop
(although the bad guys have the best gadget, a helicopter chain saw
thingy that can even deal with the titanium armor on Bond's BMW).  The
clever product placements are still around (including a Visa card that
gets Bond everywhere he wants to be).  The sultry Sophie Marceau, whose
only fault is that she is not Elizabeth Hurley, steams up the screen
quite nicely as the Bond Girl.  The chase scenes are here, too, but
they're nothing special.  An imaginative race inside an oil pipeline is
the best of them.
Only one ingredient is missing from the Bond recipe here, and it's
arguably the most important.  The Bond villain is, at least in my
cookbook, the key spice that makes the recipe work.  Without a
compelling bad guy to be Bond's foil, the movie doesn't work as well.
Take away the bad guy, and 007 might just as well spend the movie doing
paperwork.
The bad guy in The World is Not Enough is a schmuck.  His name is
Renard, (Robert Carlyle) and he has a bullet in his brain.  Apparently,
the bullet is destroying the part of his brain that makes him feel
pain.  One wonders, though, if the bullet also hit the part of his brain
that makes him interesting.  Sure, he can hold hot rocks in his hand,
and he has a cool scar, but he's got no charisma, and takes no joy in
his evil work.  Most Bond villains are over-the-top, but Renard is about
a hundred feet under the top and sinking fast.  He's supposed to be a
nihilistic terrorist, which should be interesting, but he's so blah and
dull that he might as well be a crazed accountant.  (Brad Pitt's
character from Fight Club would be a welcome relief in this part.)
A better bad guy would have added to the movie immensely by
counterbalancing some of the more ridiculous aspects of the movie --
that is, the plot.  The plot is dreadful -- not interesting enough to be
fun, just complicated enough to give you a headache.  And the
complications aren't there for any good reason.  Like the nonsense about
the Trade Federation at the start of the new Star Wars movie, the plot
is just there to stitch the action sequences together.
It is arguable that the victory of Ronald Reagan and Margaret Thatcher
and the West in the Cold War deprived James Bond movies of good plots.
I think it runs deeper than that, though.  The world today is still a
scary place, even without the Soviets.  But the scariness comes from
many different parts of the world, most of which we're not familiar
with.  (The World is Not Enough spends a lot of time in the former
Soviet republics of Azerbaijan and Kazakhstan -- and manages, somehow,
to make believe that Baku is the Russian Riviera, complete with casinos
and fancy villas.)  And the geopolitical scariness is of a different
order -- cyberterrorism and biological warfare and the like -- that the
Bonds of this world are ill-equipped to deal with.  It ought not to be
that much of a stretch to come up with some plausible way to blow up the
world, but the writers here can't figure it out.
The other flaws in the movie show up as well.  Denise Richards is not
given much to do as the second Bond Girl, and despite her supposed
status as a rocket scientist (insert joke here), she's just given
master-of-the-obvious lines like "The ship is flooding!"  (She's given
one line of Russian -- which I could actually follow, meaning that her
character has the same bad accent and poor grasp of Russian that I do.)
Bond is given a shoulder injury that only manifests itself when he is in
the clutches of the bad guys.  Robbie Coltrane, who would have made a
fine replacement of Q, is only marginally effective as Bond's ally in
the Russian Mafia.  The opening chase scene is dull and overlong -- so
much so that the credits seem out of place, almost as if Monty Python
were doing the editing.
Anyone who has ever tried to replicate their grandmother's stuffing for
Thanksgiving will sympathize with The World is Not Enough:  a good
recipe gone wrong.  This holiday season, James Bond has served up a
turkey.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"Oh, if life were like the movies, I'd never be blue."
    -- Alan Jackson, "Here In The Real World"

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The ancient wisdom reads, "If you're in a poker game, and you can't tell
who the pigeon is, it's you."  David Mamet's newest is not about a con
game rather than a poker game, but the ancient wisdom applies.  The
pigeon is Joe Ross (Campbell Scott), a mathematician at "The Company"
and inventor of "The Process".  "The Process" is a valuable calculus
formula (or something like that) that stands to earn Ross and "The
Company" millions, if he can hold on to it.
If you haven't seen a David Mamet movie, shame on you.  Go rent House of
Games right now.  Those of us who have know what to expect:  crisp
dialogue and Byzantine plotting.  The Spanish Prisoner doesn't
disappoint in these areas.  The rapid-fire, intelligent Mamet trademark
dialogue is on display here in all its glory.  The confidence game (when
we finally see it unfold) is slick and cunning, with a touch of purest
evil.  (I refuse to spoil the movie for you by giving away any details.)
And yet, for all the richness of its script and strength of its plot,
The Spanish Prisoner is a poor, weak shadow of previous Mamet efforts.
And it's a weak movie because it focuses on the Campbell Scott
character.  Part of it is that Mamet really isn't interested in Scott's
character or what he does.  Part of it is that Scott really isn't very
interesting as an actor -- he plays the entire movie like he's trying to
do a Harold Ramis imitation.  Scott gets called a Boy Scout a lot in
this movie (he even has a Scout knife that says "Be Prepared") and he is
brave, reverent and clean and all that, but God love him, he isn't
interesting.  And it's not fair to say that he's not interesting because
he's the pigeon -- the pigeons nesting outside my office are more
interesting than Scott is in this movie.
You would think that the supporting characters would help pull this
movie off, and you would be wrong.  Mamet favorite Ricky Jay makes an
appearance, but is sadly underused and does little more than spout
platitudes.  Steve Martin (unseen since Sgt. Bilko, can that be right?)
is a Dirty Rotten Scoundrel, sure enough, but he's done the con-man
schtick much better in the two aforementioned movies and in Leap of
Faith.  Ben Gazarra is in the movie but shouldn't be.
The saving grace of The Spanish Prisoner is Rebecca Pidgeon as Susan
Ricci, Scott's loyal secretary.  Mamet has put some odd, anachronistic
dialogue into her mouth ("Crikey!"  "Dog my cats.") but she is
impressive and convincing in a pivotal role.  She has a very odd
delivery which would be very annoying if she weren't spouting
tailor-made Mamet dialogue.  This is her first big movie role, and I
hope to see her again.
The movie's mantra is "The Process".  "The Process" is valuable,
precious, and will lead to controlling the market in some vague and
nebulous way.  And there's a process at work in The Spanish Prisoner,
too, and it is crafted by a masterful filmmaker.  But any process is
only as good as the people who implement it -- and in The Spanish
Prisoner, the implementation sabotages The Process.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The Big Lebowski opens with a wonderful sequence.  We see a bleak
nighttime Western vista, we hear the distinctive voice of Sam Elliott
over the cool Western harmonies of the Sons of the Pioneers singing
"Drifting along with the Tumbling Tumbleweeds."  And then we see a
tumbleweed, rolling gently along the desert plains, slowly moving this
way and that.  And then, all of a sudden, pow!  The perspective shifts,
and we see the lights of the Los Angeles basin below.
And if the whole movie were like that -- which it is not -- we would,
again, be standing in reverent awe at the talents of the Coen Brothers,
Ethan and Joel, creators of Raising Arizona, Millers Crossing, and
Fargo, and two of our great nation's national treasures.  Unfortunately,
the tumbleweed that opens The Big Lebowski is more than just an
arresting visual image, it's a metaphor for its lead character, and
ultimately, a metaphor for this shaggy, meandering movie..
The tumbleweed in question is known as The Dude.  The Dude is described
as the "laziest man in Los Angeles County" -- and therefore a leading
contender for laziest man in the world.  The Dude is a walking, talking
piece of Woodstock Nation twenty-five years past its shelf life.  He's
got no job, no money, and the ability to smoke more pot, bowl more
frames, and drink more White Russians than any six men.
The Dude spends the movie trapped inside a complex and twisty plot
involving the kidnapped trophy wife of a crippled millionaire.  It's the
sort of plot that you'll enjoy watching much more than I'll enjoy trying
to explain it, so I won't.  Let's just say that The Dude is blown by
chance all around Los Angeles, bumping into a stream of warped
characters the same way that the wind bumps a tumbleweed across the
Western prairies.
The plot structure is loosely akin to a Raymond Chandler noir thriller,
with The Dude roaming Los Angeles in the Phillip Marlowe role.  There's
even a cute little vignette where Coen Brothers veteran Jon Polito shows
up, playing a hard-boiled private eye, and assumes that The Dude is also
a detective.  The Dude is utterly bewildered by this comment, as well he
should be -- he takes a passive role throughout the movie, acting only
when necessary.  And in this fashion, he wanders through the movie --
the entire movie, let me add -- wandering around aimlessly, hardly ever
picking up speed.
At first glance, watching this movie circle around the screen like a big
shaggy dog looking for a place to lie down, I thought that The Big
Lebowski was the Coens subtly poking fun at Quentin Tarantino's Los
Angeles.  Then I decided that they were just poking fun at themselves
and their movies.  And then -- in the car, on the way home -- I figured
it out.  The Big Lebowski -- and I mean this as praise, not criticism --
is a two-hour Seinfeld episode.  It's a movie about nothing.
The Dude, of course, is the Cosmo Kramer of this ensemble.  Jeff Bridges
is The Dude, and it's hard to imagine anyone doing a better job.
Bridges owns this movie.  Where a lesser actor could have made The Dude
nothing more than a hippie dufus, Bridges brings a certain depth of
character to the role.  Since we're with The Dude the whole movie, it's
important that he be offbeat without being annoying, eccentric without
being inane.  Bridges is convincing throughout, whether he's delivering
simple truths ("The car is stolen.") or confused blather.
John Goodman is Walter Sobchak, the George Costanza of the group.
Walter's a rageaholic loser who is capable of simultaneously caring for
his ex-wife's Pomeranian and pulling a firearm on an erring bowling
opponent.  Goodman is the source of many of the film's best lines and
funniest belly laughs, and The Big Lebowski is his best film in years.
In contrast, Steve Buscemi is almost the opposite of Jerry Seinfeld.
Whereas Seinfeld is a sharp observational comedian, Buscemi's character
is a dim-witted bowler who has to be reminded every so often what is
going on.  It's a slight part, and Buscemi does only a slight acting
job.  Rounding out the ensemble is Julianne Moore as Maude Lebowski.
Moore is the best reason to see this movie.  She's only in three scenes
-- if you don't count one of the two dream sequences -- but she steals
the show as an embarrassingly frank performance artist with a Katherine
Hepburn accent.
Like in any Seinfeld episode, the plot is almost an afterthought.
What's important about The Big Lebowski isn't the wandering plot, it's
the little vignettes and character and jokes along the way.  This is a
comedy, full of sharp observational humor, a ton of the weird supporting
characters that is the Coen Brothers hallmark, and a couple of
astonishingly well-crafted shots.  As long as you don't go expecting
Fargo -- or The Hudsucker Proxy, for that matter -- The Big Lebowski is
a fun time at the movies.  Pity we don't get to say that too often.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Title
Review for Election (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
"Were the world perfect, it would always be wrong to trespass, but as
the world is not perfect, sometimes one must.  And when you do, you
live, you break free, you fly.  I know this is true, and the reason it
is true, I believe, is that the spark of transgression comes directly
from the heart of God."
Superficially, Election is about a student council election in a small
high school in Omaha, Nebraska.  I say "superficially" because,
really, little can be more superficial than a student council
election.  The biggest ovation (and the biggest laugh) is reserved for
the one character who points out the foolishness of the exercise and
promises to abolish the student government if elected school
president. Much of the comedy is directed at the mounting silliness of
the election and the grotesque awkwardness of the high school
experience, making it easy to pigeonhole Election as a typical MTV
Films coming-of-age movie.  Do not make this mistake.
It would be a little more accurate to call Election a smart, snappy
commentary on our electoral system, which it is.  Election's top
candidate is Pleasantville's Reese Witherspoon, playing consummate
overachiever Tracy Flick.  There's a scene early on that catalogues
Tracy's accomplishments -- student council member, French Club,
yearbook -- that's somewhat reminiscent of a similar scene in
Rushmore.  Both Jason Schwartzman's Max Fischer and Tracy Flick are
involved in a plethora of high school activities as a creepy
substitute for acceptance, but there are important differences.  Tracy
is bright, cheerful, and nauseatingly perky, where Max is confused,
difficult, and hyperactive.  Where Max is seeking to burrow to the
heart of his school. Tracy's activity is directed towards the outside
world.  Bit by bit, we see her slowly building her resume on a path to
leadership and eventual world domination.  Every piece of gum she
gives away, every poster she makes, every cupcake she bribes voters
with is just one more step along her predetermined path.
Of course, with people like this, any deviation from that
predetermined path is a problem.  Very early on, a younger version of
Jeff Spicoli swipes a double handful of Juicy Fruit from Tracy's
hallway election headquarters.  "ONE PIECE PER PERSON!" she yells, as
though the world had ended.  Anything that breaks her composure,
anything that ruins her perfect plan, threatens to send Tracy into a
violent, sobbing (and highly entertaining) rage.
What makes this political satire?  Well, keep in mind that
director/screenwriter Alexander Payne introduces Elizabeth Dole's name
into the discussion.  I'm not making any invidious comparisons here.
Really.  I'm not.
Anyway, one of the many things that disappointed me about
Pleasantville was the way that Reese Witherspoon's character
disappeared midway through.  Here, she's given almost the whole movie
as her personal private playground, and she turns in a sharp, funny
performance that's right on the mark.
But that still isn't what the movie's about.
No, Election is about the divine spark of transgression, the message
of temptation, the occasional powerful impulse to do something wrong.
Mostly, we control that spark and keep our evildoing to a minimum.
Some of us let that spark burn us up, others let it suffocate, but
everyone knows its irresistible power.
It is the spark of transgression that powers Election and raises it
from its unpromising lineage to become a genuinely good film.  That
spark is personified by Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick), three-time
teacher of the year at Carver High and all-around good guy, the sort
who would never... ever...  do anything bad or wrong or evil.
At first, it seemed cruel to me to cast Broderick in this role, and it
is a little sad to see Ferris Bueller teaching government class,
especially with graying temples that look for all the world to be
applied with Liquid Paper.  But the spark of transgression can light
up even the dullest, grayest life.  Broderick sees Witherspoon's
character as a mortal threat.  McAllister fears Tracy on a personal
level (she's already slept with, and ruined the life of, his best
friend) but he also fears the inevitability of her rise to power, or
merely wants to teach her a lesson.  Whatever the reason, McAllister
is sitting in his basement, drinking a Pepsi,
watching... well... let's just say he's watching TV... and the spark
of transgression hits him.  He decides to enlist football hero Paul
Metzler (newcomer Chris Klein) as Tracy's opponent.  And from there,
the sparks start flying, and don't stop until the very last scene.
These are the high points of the movie, and they make Election worth
seeing by themselves.  But such a review leaves out a lot of the
small, good touches that make Election special -- as well as the
annoying little freeze-frame and flashback sequences that make it
imperfect.  If Election were a perfect movie, such criticisms would be
superfluous.  Election is not a perfect movie, but it lives, it breaks
free, and every once in a while it even flies.

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
They didn't have a lot of the scenes I wanted to see in The Negotiator,
but there was one scene I particularly missed.  It was the scene where
Chief Deputy United States Marshal Samuel Gerard is sitting on his
couch, watching the mayhem of the movie on WGN.  I envision Gerard
putting his feet up, taking a puff on a confiscated Cuban cigar, and
intoning:  "What a bunch of amateurs."
The way this movie was advertised was as a cat-and-mouse game between
two professional hostage negotiators.  Samuel L. Jackson as framed cop
Danny Roman versus Kevin Spacey as outside negotiator Chris Sabian.  It
all looked so promising, with two of Hollywood's best actors going
mano-a-mano in a Chicago-themed action flick, just like in Jeb Stuart's
script for The Fugitive.  And throw in a bit of Stuart's Die Hard
script, with Jackson as the lone hero cop trapped in a tall building...
it looked very, very promising.  What a shame that The Negotiator is in
the hands of amateurs.
The premise of the movie is that it's a duel between the hostage
negotiators.  Jackson, wrongfully accused of theft and murder, snaps and
takes the police department's internal affairs department hostage.  He
calls on Spacey to serve as his personal negotiator (after a very funny
scene where he pokes holes in the confidence of the poor schmuck
originally designed to talk him down).  So, this ought to be a great
battle of wits, right?  Right?
The Negotiator would have us believe that the most important skill of a
good hostage negotiator is lying.  You can make a good movie about lying
-- say, House of Games or The Sting -- but it's hard to make a good
action movie about lying.  And especially here, where all the lying
concerns finding the evidence that will free Roman of the charges
against him.  We already know he's telling the truth, and we don't much
care about the scandal, so that's just not interesting.
What I would have like to have seen is a little more of the tricks of
the trade being displayed.  The only time we really see the Chicago PD
being sneaky is when they try to snake mini-cameras to view the hostages
-- Jackson sees them, as any reasonably observant person would, and
yanks them out.  There's nothing really improvisational or imaginative
about the whole setup.  (Contrast the imaginative hostage negotiation
between Bill Murray and Jason Robards in Quick Change.)  Throw in a
couple of unrealistic plot twists (totally unworthy of Sam Gerard or any
other law enforcement professional) and what you end up with is a mess
of a movie.
Jackson's best performances have always come when he has a character to
play that's basically unappealing.  For example, both Jules in Pulp
Fiction, and Ordell Robbie in Jackie Brown were both very bad, very
unlikable dudes -- but the audience was sympathetic to both of them, in
a way, because Jackson's sheer force of talent makes them magnetic.
Danny Roman is meant to be appealing -- the audience has to be on his
side the whole movie -- but he's never magnetic.  There's only one
little scene where Jackson is allowed to go over the edge into
unlikability -- and it's a cheat.  Not a great performance, although
it's many, many fathoms better than what we saw when he was at the
bottom of the ocean in Sphere.
If Jackson doesn't live up to his potential in The Negotiator, Spacey
steps all over his and grinds it into the mud.  Spacey is a great actor,
capable of a wide range of parts, and what they've done here is put him
on Macho Mountain without any rope.  Other than a too-long cutesy scene
between his wife and daughter that's completely contrived to establish
his credentials as a negotiator, Spacey is made to participate in scene
after scene of macho posturing.  He's consistently in screaming matches
with Jackson and the cops.  His voice must have been really, really
hoarse after production was completed.
The rest of the cast is a tribute to the majesty and power of
typecasting.  John Spencer, so good as Harrison Ford's cop friend in
Presumed Innocent, is the chief of police here.  The late, great J.T.
Walsh plays an oily creep who knows more than he's saying.  Ron Rifkin
plays a devious-but-bland cop in the same manner as his guest turn on ER
not too long ago.
Speaking of ER, here's a memo for Anthony Edwards:  make sure your agent
sees this movie, because you don't want to end up like David Morse.
Remember him?  He was the sensitive-yet-tough doctor who led the
ensemble cast on the hospital drama St. Elsewhere.  Unfortunately, he's
only able now to get parts as mindless toughs for some reason.
Something to think about, OK?
There really isn't much that wrong with The Negotiator, and I don't want
to talk you down from your stadium seat.  It's perfectly serviceable,
mindless summer movie entertainment.  But it could have been so much
better, and that's a shame.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
A few years back, they brought in my main man Quentin Tarantino to add a
little spice to the script of the submarine action flick Crimson Tide.
One of the scenes that bears QT's distinctive stamp is this:  Renegade
Navy officer Denzel Washington is trying to convince a communications
officer to fix a bit of equipment to contact the outside world.  Denzel
explains: OK, I'm Captain Kirk, and you're Scotty, and I need you to fix
this engine before the ship blows apart.  The crewman nods, fixes the
whatever-it-was, and Denzel saves the day.
I would have felt a little better about Sphere if they had acknowledged,
somewhere, that this was a Star Trek movie.  Because that's all it is.
And it's not a good even-numbered Star Trek film, either, but one of
those odd-numbered jobs.  Our captain is not Kirk, or Picard, but
tweed-blazered psychologist Dustin Hoffman.  The crew is a motley band
of scientists:  marine biologist Sharon Stone, mathematician Samuel L.
Jackson, physicist Liev Schrieber.  And their mission is to take our
$3.75 matinee price and bore us silly for two hours.
You'll notice that I don't mention character names, for the plain and
simple reason that I don't remember them.  Seriously.  Imagine that
you're watching, oh, let's say Star Trek 11:  The Search for the Voyage
to the Final Frontier, except that you've never, ever seen a Star Trek
episode or movie ever.  The characters are up on the screen, they all
know each other, they have a history, but you don't have the first clue
who they are or what they're all about or why they're wearing so much
makeup.  That's exactly the situation in Sphere:  All of the characters
know each other, some of them don't like each other, and the
characterization is so weak and so poor that we don't have a reason to
care.
And what's more depressing:  These are some damn good actors.  Dustin
Hoffman just got a Oscar nomination for Wag the Dog.  Samuel L. Jackson
deserved one for Jackie Brown (although I'm very glad that Robert
Forster got one, don't get me wrong).  But they're skating, phoning it
in, banking on the goodwill from past performances to carry them
through.  And it doesn't work.  The characters are so weak, the plot so
filmy, that it even these talented actors can't make it believable or
entertaining.  (Not to mention the disappointing performances of the
usually reliable director Barry Levinson and producer Michael Crichton.)
The plot is dumb, even by Star Trek standards.  There's a sphere on the
bottom of the ocean, and the away team has to investigate.  A couple of
minor "red shirt" crew members (Queen Latifah, for one, who deserves
better) die for the sake of moving the plot along.  The rest of the crew
are slowly killed off as a horrible secret manifests itself.  Will the
three highest-paid actors survive?
Special effects can save a bad movie like this (see The Lost World) but
that doesn't happen, either.  The major action scene involves an attack
by a scary giant squid.  But do we get to see the squid?  Nooo.  We get
to see the little eggs being laid, we get to see the undersea habitat
being shaken, but no squid.  (We do get to see Samuel L. Jackson reduced
to choking on a piece of fried calimari to establish that he's afraid of
squid, though.)
Rumor says that Levinson delayed filming on Sphere to finish Wag the
Dog.  May be true, I don't know -- but Sphere certainly plays like a
leftover or an afterthought.  Do yourself a favor, go rent The Abyss.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The Thin Red Line is a spectacular movie, intelligently written and
directed by supergenius Terrence Malick, and don't let anyone tell you
different.  Like no other film, it shows the passionate futility of war,
the dark side of mankind, and the stark, underappreciated beauty of
elephant grass.  Brilliantly acted, with haunting, eloquent voiceovers
supplementing the gritty, realistic pace, The Thin Red Line is a courageous
movie which will be studied by generations of film students.  Only an
ingrate, a person with no appreciation for truly great cinema, could ever
say bad things about this instant classic.  If a critic comes along who
doesn't like this movie, who doesn't appreciate its preeminent place in
film history, he should be forced to leave the country and eat taro root in
Guadalcanal until he regains his senses.
Or so the fans of this movie say.  Me, I'm packing my bags and wondering if
Tabasco makes taro root taste any better.  The Thin Red Line is
overserious, overlong, and over my head.  It is ostensibly the story of a
WWII infantry company fighting for control of Guadalcanal, but don't be
fooled into thinking that this is Saving Private Ryan in the Pacific
Theater.  The Thin Red Line is overlaid with symbolism and philosophy to
the point that it makes Platoon look like The Green Berets.  In this movie,
Higher Truths fly past faster than bullets.
This is not to say that I did not take any Higher Truths away from The Thin
Red Line.  I did.  Out of all the high-flown sentiment, all the stunning
visual jungle imagery, all the scenes of heroism, courage, and sudden
violent death, I left The Thin Red Line with one truth:  Don't take small
children to movies that have explosions in them.
Ha-ha!  And I could go on, poking cruel and heartless fun at Terrence
Malick and The Thin Red Line for the next three hours (or until some nice
person from the Miami Herald taps me on the shoulder and mentions that Dave
Barry is sick this week, and can I have a column ready by 5 this
afternoon?).  But it would be incredibly rude and mean-spirited of me to do
so.  (Although, come to think of it, that hasn't stopped me so far.)  The
Thin Red Line is a great movie whether I like it or not.  (So is Saving
Private Ryan, for that matter.)  It is a matter of taste, that's all, and
if my taste isn't broad enough to encompass this boring, pretentious,
pointless clunker of a movie, so be it.
Before going to see The Thin Red Line, you need to understand that it is
actually three one-hour movies all spliced together.  If you like at least
any two of them, you're going to enjoy the movie.  If you only like one of
them, however, you're in for a long stretch over some rough road.
The first movie is the one I liked best, and the one I was expecting.  It
is the War Epic, complete with all-star cast and on-location filming.  I
love war epics.  I love all the great epic WWII movies like The Longest Day
and The Great Escape and Bridge on the River Kwai and all of the others.
And this third of the movie is spectacular.  It has Woody Harrelson leading
his team in a desperate assault on a Japanese-held hill, only to make a
tragic error.  It has Nick Nolte in the John Wayne part, pushing the
company up that hill by force of pure will -- along with Elias Koteas as
the decent infantry captain who opposes him, not wanting to throw away the
lives of his troops.  And it has a lot of good, young actors playing in
minor roles, building their resumes.
There are two great scenes in The Thin Red Line that help put all of these
movies to shame.  There's a scene where an infantry squad (led by John
Cusack, of all people) has to take out a Japanese machine gun battery on
top of a hill.  The company has inched painfully up this gorgeous hill
covered in leafy elephant grass for a good chunk of the movie, but has
suffered a lot of casualties from the unseen machine gun nests ahead.  The
scene where Cusack's team charges up the hill and takes the nest is a
great, courageous, almost wordless piece of filmmaking.  You understand
exactly what's going on and where the armies are situated and the sheer
guts it would take for anyone to trot over to a machine gun emplacement and
lob in a grenade.  There's another great scene at the two hour mark where
the company overruns a Japanese barracks and hospital.  It is a scene of
terror and desperation, almost as good as Spielberg's D-Day landing, and
much more fast-paced.  Malick does an outstanding job in conveying the
chaos and fear that both sides must have experienced...  but it's the last
good scene in the movie, which still has an hour to run.
The second movie is, of all things, a nature documentary.  There are scenes
-- dozens of them -- that look for all the world like they were snipped
from a National Geographic special on Guadalcanal.  If you have cable, and
want to get an idea about what The Thin Red Line is all about, click back
and forth between The History Channel and The Discovery Channel and you'll
have some idea.  The movie's opening scene is an alligator sliding, slowly,
into a filthy pond.  And it looks great, from a purely visual perspective,
but a whole hour of such images gets to be a bit oppressive.  And it really
doesn't help matters that Malick is so good at his craft.  There's a shot
of some bats at one point, and I will concede that it may be the best, most
poetic, most lovingly crafted film rendition of bats ever made.  But --
ingrate that I am -- if I want to see bats, I can find better ways to
manage it than paying to see The Thin Red Line again.
The third movie stitches the other two together.  It is, at least partly, a
debate about philosophy -- how the beauty of Rousseau's "state of nature"
is destroyed and tarnished by a nasty and brutish Hobbsean war.  Whatever.
It is told largely by director Malick in a series of moody, pointless
voiceovers.  It is as though Malick is one of the angels in long black
leather coats from City of Angels, drifting around Guadalcanal the way that
Nicolas Cage drifted around Los Angeles, hearing the thoughts of the dying
and of brave men, hearing the ineffable music in the sunset.  What was
magical in City of Angels is, well, wretched in A Thin Red Line.  (Or vice
versa.  Like I said, it's a matter of taste.)  The voiceovers are overlong,
incomprehensible ramblings about life, death, nature, eternity, and some
blonde chick back home.  This all may be deeply profound, inspired
thinking, but I thought it was boring as hell.
A Thin Red Line is almost exactly like the Olympics, in one way.  You have
a great, exciting contest between men and teams of men, with national honor
at stake.  But every so often, when you're not paying attention, the
coverage switches to gymnastics or figure skating or women's volleyball or
some such other event.  It's not so much that the other events are bad or
evil or something worse than the complete waste of time that they are.
It's that every minute they're on the screen is another minute we're not
watching basketball or hockey or the decathlon.  And in The Thin Red Line,
every minute we spend listening to the deep inner thoughts of howler
monkeys or what have you is a minute that can't be used to show the Battle
of Guadalcanal, which is what we came to see.
In grading The Thin Red Line, I give the battle scenes an A, and the rest
of the movie an F.  That averages out to a C in my book, although I'm
confident that my mean-spirited rant will not detract from the greatness of
this movie.  If anyone needs me, I'll be watching a hockey game.  And
eating taro root.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
Writing a screenplay for a thriller is hard. Harder than pouring
concrete under the Texas sun.  Harder than building a bridge over
troubled waters. And incidentally, a whole heck of a lot harder than
writing a movie review.
Thrillers are all variations on a theme. You have a smart, resourceful,
and powerful Bad Guy, who has a goal he has to meet. You have a noble
and brave Good Guy, who has to protect the innocent, kill the Bad Guy,
and not get killed himself in the process. The trick of thriller writing
is doing all of this in an interesting and novel manner. This simple
formula can lead to            classic movies like North by Northwest,
High Noon, or Silence of the Lambs, or big summer blockbusters like Men
In Black, The Fugitive, or Air Force One, or it can lead to utter dreck
like Masterminds, Event Horizon, Kull the Conqueror.... is
anyone else getting depressed here?
Point is, it's not enough to follow the formula. You've got to throw in
something extra, something good and new and better than the last
version. Something to surprise and move all of us people who buy the
tickets and the popcorn and the Happy Meals. This is a hard thing to do,
but it is absolutely necessary in every way. Without that something
extra -- whether it's a great plot or a well-written screenplay, or
great special effects or great locations or great casting or great
performances or great big hungry dinosaurs -- the movie fails. That's
why The Jackal, with all its starpower, with all its budget, with all
its hype, gets a big fat F.
Bruce Willis is the Bad Guy, the Jackal, a legendary killer for hire.
Richard Gere is the Good Guy, a former IRA assassin with a vendetta
against the Jackal. The Jackal is trying to kill someone. Gere is trying
to stop him. Will Gere be able to stop the assassination in time and
kill the Jackal? (I'll give you three guesses, and the first two don't
count.) There are no surprises awaiting the audience in The Jackal, no
moment when you say to yourself, "I wonder what happens next?"
The script for the Jackal isn't ripped straight from today's headlines.
It's ripped off, straight from an episode of Millennium. Throughout the
movie, we learn what the Jackal's plans are and how he intends to
accomplish them. No surprise. The fun of a movie like this should come
from Richard Gere figuring out what the Jackal's plan is and developing
a clever plan to foil the Bad Guy. Instead, we get two (count 'em, two)
scenes where Gere is sitting in an FBI conference room somewhere and
instantly divines the Jackal's plan just as if he's Frank Black (or more
likely, just as if he's been handed a copy of the script). And we never
get more than a superficial clue as to why Gere has had this flash of
insight. It's like Gere's character is psychic, but neither he nor the
FBI (or the screenwriters) seem to know it. And just like in Millennium,
the Bad Guy has an overwhelming need to go after the people the Good Guy
cares about, whether or not they are important to what he's trying to do
or not. What's more, in the last half of the movie, the Jackal,
supposedly a super-smart professional terrorist who never makes a
mistake, comes down with a major case of the stupids.
As for the performances... Bruce Willis manages to get through the whole
movie without a wisecrack, which is a major achievement, but not enough
reason to see the movie. His disguises are good, but not as good or as
interesting as Val Kilmer's in The Saint. Richard Gere is made to talk
the entire movie in an Irish accent, which detracts from his otherwise
lifeless and dull performance. Sidney Poitier is probably the most
disappointing element in a overwhelmingly disappointing movie -- not
that his performance is bad or anything, it's not, but it is sad that
Hollywood won't use this talented actor in any part other than an FBI
agent (Shoot to Kill, Sneakers).
Writing a good plot and a good screenplay, like I said, is hard, but it
can be done. It wasn't done here. It is our job as consumers to reward
good screenplays and to denounce bad and uninteresting ones. Do not go
see this movie. You'll only encourage the producers to make more just
like it. Instead, stay home and rent Day of the Jackal, or In the Line
of Fire, or a fire safety video, for crying out loud. Anything other
than The Jackal, which lives up to its name by gnawing the dead bones of
other, better movies.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Title
Review for Shuang long hui (1992)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
1999 is already turning into the Year of the Bard.  Shakespeare in Love won
the Oscar, A Midsummer Nights Dream is coming to theaters soon, a Taming of
the Shrew update is already there.  So I suppose it shouldn't come as a
complete surprise to anyone that Jackie Chan has remade The Two Gentlemen
of Verona.
Well, perhaps that's a bit of a stretch, but the story of twins separated
at birth that fuels Twin Dragons is at least as old as Shakespeare's tale.
Jackie Chan steps out of his usual Hong Kong cop screen persona to play
mismatched twins -- one a successful American pianist and orchestra
conductor, the other a Hong Kong mechanic with ambitions to drive race
cars.  They cross paths in Hong Kong and, predictably, are swiftly mistaken
for each other. The mechanic gets crossways with one of the Hong Kong
street gangs, who are generous enough to provide any number of henchmen so
that our heroes can beat the stuffing out ot them.
Up to now, the Jackie Chan movies (that have been released in the US) have
always worked because they've been balanced in two important ways.  First,
there's been a balance between Chan's formidable rock-'em sock-'em skills
and his equally formidable skills as a physical comic.  The fun thing about
Jackie Chan movies is not that he beats up on the bad guys, but how he
beats up the bad guys -- with impeccable comic timing, just as though he
were in a Roadrunner cartoon.  Secondly, there's always been a balance
between the technical deficiencies of Jackie Chan movies -- the poor
dubbing, the silly scripts, the overall averageness of the supporting cast
-- and the excellence of the stuntwork and the imaginativeness of the One
Big Stunt that redeems the movie's flaws.
It's a tough balancing act for Chan, but he's always pulled it off up until
now.  The few movies that have gotten theatrical release in the States have
all been a hoot to watch.  Remember the scene where Jackie uses that
samurai sword to stop that out-of-control hovercraft in Rumble in the
Bronx?  Or the giant Kevlar hamster ball in Operation Condor?  Or the scene
where he wrecks that Pepsi truck in Mr. Nice Guy?  (Probably the greatest
product-placement scene ever, next to the one in Wayne's World.)  But in
Twin Dragons...
There.  I said it.  I didn't want to say it, believe me.  I love Jackie
Chan movies.  I've been a consistent defender of his work against those who
would dismiss his film career.  Why, I even kept my mouth shut after seeing
Rush Hour because I didn't want to rain on Jackie's parade.  But even in
the most generous light possible, Twin Dragons isn't good.
Shakespeare's work aside, there just isn't a lot that can be done with the
concept of mismatched twins.  The best Twin Dragons can do is use the
wrinkle that one twin is affected by the muscle movements of the other.  We
see the mechanic twin's hand twitching when the pianist twin plays, and we
see the pianist twin thrash around violently while the mechanic twin is
fighting.  I grinned a little at that, I'll admit, but the gag just gets
worked to death.  So is the gag where people faint when one twin, then the
other walks by.  Not to mention that the twins both have girlfriends, and
they keep crossing paths as well.
With all the really lame comedy present in the movie, you would hope that
the fight scenes and the stunt scenes would counterbalance things enough to
make Twin Dragons entertaining.  Unfortunately, it doesn't happen.  The
fight scenes aren't all that bad, really, and the final fight scene in an
auto factory is probably worth a ticket if you have a dollar movie theater
handy.  But the One Big Stunt that characterizes Chan movies is absent.
For whatever reason -- low budget, or that Chan's body isn't quite so
resilient anymore -- there isn't the one grand, gooey, destructive stunt
scene that's the signature of Jackie's work.
Twin Dragons is a disappointment, but it's not a bad movie.  Instead, it's
a reminder of just how good the other Jackie Chan movies are.  They've all
had to keep their balance in an unforgiving critical climate.  Twin Dragons
loses its balance, true, but it's a narrow high wire at best with heavy
winds.

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
GALAXY QUEST:  By Grabthar's Hammer, What A Movie!
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The only thing wrong with Galaxy Quest is that it was released at the
wrong time of year.  If any film ever deserved a mid-February release,
it is this one.  For Star Trek fans (and you know who you are) Galaxy
Quest is a great big gushy Valentine of a movie.  Galaxy Quest is to
Star Trek, in a way, what Shakespeare in Love is to Shakesperian
theater:  a warm-hearted, affectionally satirical love-letter.  Both
movies poke fun at their respective conventions while staying true to
that which is important.
(Not to say that The Trouble With Tribbles is equivalent to Romeo and
Juliet, mind you, just trying to make a point here.)
Galaxy Quest works because it hits the three points of the Star Trek
strategic triad:  the actors, the fans, and the show itself.  The movie
begins with the crew of the USS Enterprise... ahem, that's the NSES
Protector, sorry, preparing for their appearance at a convention.  Like
the Star Trek actors, the Galaxy Quest actors are trapped in Stereotype
Hell:  they can neither get another acting job nor escape their fans.
Some, such as Sigourney Weaver's communicatons officer, are touched but
bemused by the attention.  Others, like Alan Rickman's obligatory alien
life form, are sick to the point of despair at the prospect of another
sci-fi convention.
And then, way at the far end of the spectrum, there's Tim Allen, playing
actor Jason Nesmeth, playing Galaxy Quest star Commander Peter Quincy
Taggart.  Nesmeth is an egomaniac of staggering, galactic, even (if I
may say so) Shatnerian proportions.  (One even expects him to take off
his toupee at one point, such is the resemblance.)  Naturally, he loves
the attention from the fans, though he doesn't understand it.
Naturally, he hogs the limelight, to the annoyance of his co-stars.  And
naturally, he's the one who gets kidnapped by a race of space aliens who
believe that the "Galaxy Quest" show is real and that he can command
their replica starship to victory over the space lizards.
This starts the show, which we'll get to in a moment.  First, a word
about the fans, who are at once the core audience for Galaxy Quest and
the target for much of its satire. Accordingly, Galaxy Quest has adopted
an attitude that's mocking, yet respectful.  Most of the comedy directed
towards the fans is in the form of sight gags -- middle aged people
walking around with alien makeup on their heads.  It's possible that
some fans might take offense to this portrayal -- the woman in Arkansas
who showed up to the Clinton trial decked out in Starfleet regalia comes
to mind -- but the mockery in Galaxy Quest is nothing if not
affectionate.  (There is a Shatneresque explosion directed towards one
fan by Allen, but Allen gets his comeuppance, you just watch.)
The real true fans of the show are the Thermians, the alien race that
constructed the "Protector 2".  They have been monitoring Earth
television and are so convinced that what they see on TV is real that
they have remodeled their entire civilization around "Galaxy Quest"
reruns.  (Star Trek fans will recognize this as one of the show's
typical conceits -- the original show featured alien civilizations based
on the Roman Empire, Chicago gangsters, and even the Nazis.)  When the
Thermians show up at the hung-over Allen's house, he takes one look at
their pasty faces and Moe Howard haircuts and assumes they are fans.
(One wonders if this is an everyday occurence for Shatner.)
Allen's Buzz Lightyear character in Toy Story 2 asks himself at one
point, "Was I ever that deluded?"  Allen is plenty deluded here, at
first, thinking that the Thermian vessel is just an elaborate set.
(This is one of more existential moments in Galaxy Quest:  you have an
actor on an elaborate set playing the part of an actor who thinks he's
on an elaborate set.)  Allen, however, eventually realizes the truth and
hustles back to collect his "crew" for another joyride.
This is where the real show begins, and it's a splendid, hysterical
farce.  Galaxy Quest manages, one way or another, to spoof every single
Star Trek episode there ever was.  Every one of the show's conventions
is gleefully, impishly trashed to the point that I won't even bother to
catalog the goofiness.  The Galaxy Quest screenwriters are operating
with an immense amount of knowledge about the Star Trek universe -- so
much so that one wonders if they haven't been to a few sci-fi
conventions themselves -- but they manage to distill it all down into a
series of funny skits that should delight even those who have never seen
the show.
Like Star Trek itself, Galaxy Quest is an ensemble piece.  And like the
Star Trek actors themselves, the Galaxy Quest actors have experienced
stereotyping themselves.  The underappreciated Sigourney Weaver is back
in space again, but she's cleverly cast as the anti-Ripley, a blonde
bombshell with little to do and less to wear.  After his boffo
performance in Die Hard, Alan Rickman was typecast into sardonic villain
roles, and he appears here as a sardonic good guy.  (Unfortunately, he
doesn't steal the show hear to the degree and extent that he stole the
show in Dogma.)  Tony Shalhoub and Daryl "Chill" Mitchell are both
refugees from Must-See-TV ("Wings" and "The John Larroquette Show",
respectively).  Mitchell isn't given much to do, unfortunately.
Shalhoub isn't given much more, but he makes the most of what he has --
including one line that still makes me giggle every time I think about
it.
Tim Allen, of course, has the most stereotyping of anyone on the crew.
It's hard to say if Allen is a victim of stereotyping or if he just
doesn't have much range as an actor.  (Probably both.)  Nevertheless,
this is the perfect part for him, and he plays it with brio.  Allen is
allowed here to be cocky, overconfident, and incompetent but still be
charming and funny.
If Galaxy Quest is too early to be a Valentine, it is the funniest New
Year's card you'll get.  Star Trek fans will howl with laughter, kids
will giggle uncontrollably, and everyone else will, at least, be
entertained.  Go see it.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"JANUARY 1, 1000:  This was the historic day that humanity celebrated
the dawn of our current millennium. The occasion was marked by feasting,
dancing, and the public beheading of a whiny, tedious group of people
who would not stop insisting that, technically, the new millennium did not
begin until January 1, 1001."  -- Dave Barry

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Stephen Covey is not a moviemaker, and unfortunately, compulsive moviegoing
is not one of The Seven Habits of Highly Effective People.  But the
best-selling author has something to teach us about the moviemaking
process, and Enemy of the State serves as a vehicle for an Important Life
Lesson in spite of itself.
Covey uses the metaphor of the personal savings account to describe
individual integrity.  Your "Personal Integrity Account" increases when you
keep your promises to yourself and build your character.  If you have high
reserves in this account, you're better able to handle personal adversity.
You can also make withdrawals from this account by doing things that
undermine your personal integrity.  (Example:  "Enemy of the State is a
non-stop roller-coaster of a movie!  Be sure to catch this thrill ride!"
Curtis Edmonds, freelance movie reviewer.)
Just as all of us have our own integrity accounts, actors have their own
accounts that they've built up over the years.  When they turn in good
performances, they build up reservoirs of goodwill in the hearts and minds
of the audience.  These reservoirs can be depleted by a bad performance or
filled to overflowing by great work.  And if the actor's balance is very
high, he can cash in some of that balance and turn in a performance where
he doesn't have to do much heavy lifting.  That's exactly what happens in
Enemy of the State.  Producer Jerry Bruckheimer has assembled a team of
good actors -- Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Barry Pepper -- and
inserted them into a man-on-the-run plotline where everything happens at
high speed and character development is sacrificed for special effects.
The plot appears to be more complicated in the movie than it is on the
trailers, but it really isn't.  Prominent labor lawyer Will Smith has
something that the government wants, and they chase him the whole entire
movie in order to get it.  The "something" in this case is a videotape of
the murder of a Congressman by the National Security Agency.  We know this,
because the opening scene of the movie tells us the who and the why of the
murder, instead of leaving us in the dark and letting us figure out what's
happening at the same time Smith does.  To its credit, Enemy of the State
has a decent subplot involving the Mafia that distracts Smith -- but
instead of letting the audience play along, we're cursed with our superior
knowledge the whole way.
The novelty of the movie is supposed to be the use of satellite
reconnisance to monitor Smith's every move.  The satellite photography is
outstanding, however they got it, but it's edited very jerkily and I think
it's giving me a headache.  The movie ends up being one chase scene after
another, and all the chases seem cribbed from other, better movies.
There's a dash of The Fugitive in a tunnel scene, a shot of John Grisham's
whole lawyer-in-danger thing, a dab of Patriot Games in the satellite
imagery, and generous splashes here and there of Quentin Tarantino, but the
whole concoction never comes together.  (In fact, there's enough Tarantino
influence in Enemy of the State to make one wonder what QT might have done
with the script and these actors -- not to mention that he might have been
a good choice to play one of the geeky high-tech spies.)
To make matters worse, the actors in Enemy of the State aren't playing
actual characters.  Instead, they're playing their on-screen personas.
Smith's character is the Smooth Action Hero, leavened with one-liners.  The
Smooth Action Hero is more mature than in Men In Black or Independence
Day:  the wisecracks are still there, but they're toned down somewhat.
Hackman plays a renegade government agent who is trapped into helping Smith
do the spy stuff, and he plays his part in the same Grumpy Old Commander
persona that he displayed in Crimson Tide, his last effort with Scott.
Voight is coming off evil performances in Mission:  Impossible and The
Rainmaker that mirror his performance as an oily National Security Agency
executive.  And Pepper, fresh from his bravura performance as a Southern
sharpshooter in Saving Private Ryan, plays an NSA assassin who happens to
have a Southern accent.  All the above performances were pretty good --
save maybe for Voight's -- and they're what sustains Enemy of the State and
what allows the actors to make big, huge withdrawals from their integrity
accounts.  Tom Sizemore, almost unrecognizable as a Mafia tough guy, looks
to be the only actor who's not phoning in his performance.
Enemy of the State is not a bad movie, necessarily, it's just formulaic and
derivative and dumb.  It's not filmmaking so much as it's film processing,
just throwing in bits from other movies into the cinematic Cuisinart and
hoping everything comes out OK.  What you get is a moderately entertaining
movie with some good actors turning in average performances.  Instead of
being a win-win movie, (to return to the Covey bit for a second) it's a
win-lose movie -- a win at the box office, a loss for the audience.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Tabasco sauce is to bachelor cooking what forgiveness is to sin."

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
"But there is still too much violence on our nation's screens, large and
small.  Too many creators and purveyors of violence say there is nothing
they can do about it.
And there are still too many vulnerable children who are steeped in this
culture of violence, becoming increasingly desensitized to it and to its
consequences and, therefore, as studies show, hundreds of them more liable
to commit violence themselves."  President Bill Clinton
They had the White House Conference of Youth Violence yesterday, or maybe
it was the Summit on School Safety, I forget.  Lots of blather and
well-meaning phrases thrown around by a bucketful of sanctimonious
do-gooding hypocrites, stuffed to bursting with self-regard.  It was all
over the media, of course, plenty of pictures of the Clintons getting all
misty over the thought of the threat posed to America's children by violent
video games and movies.  All sorts of deep-thinking, sensitive quotes like
the one above.  Rubbish.
Payback is not a perfect movie, but it is the perfect antidote to the
current political and social climate.  In a world where violent movies are
reviled and blamed for the ills of our nation's youth, it's refreshing to
see a movie that is unapologetic for its content, straightforward in its
delivery of action and mayhem, courageous in its utter lack of regard for
the effect of the culture of violence on American children.  Payback is a
throwback, a gritty, thoroughly amoral action movie that celebrates all
that is violent and dangerous and mean-spirited. It celebrates only the
manliest of virtues -- self-reliance, grit, determination, stubbornness,
courage, fortitude, and sheer cussedness -- and presents the back of its
hand to sensitivity, gentleness and wimpishness. It has no redeeming social
value, no higher message, no spirit of goodness or decency or honor.
The moral tone of Payback is set in the first few minutes.  The first words
in the screenplay are "G-S-W.  Gun Shot Wound," and there are bunches of
them.  We see people drinking and smoking cigarettes and eating red meat
and not wearing  seat belts and all the other things that real Americans
used to do.  (Payback does demonstrate why you should wear your seat belt,
though.)  Things go downhill from there, morally speaking, with murder and
mayhem and torture and sudden violent death.
Payback is not a film for everybody.  There will be plenty of people, I'm
sure, who will bemoan the level of violence in this movie and wring their
hands over the constant insensitivity and moral deafness of the
characters.  I have a message for these people:  stay home.  Or go watch
Notting Hill or rent Sleepless in Seattle or watch Lifetime.  Payback is a
man's movie, chock-full of action and grit and double-crossing and plot
twists and pain and everything that makes a movie enjoyable.  It is not
pretty, it is not socially redeeming, it is not politically correct, but it
is a hell of a ride.
Payback is Mel Gibson's movie, and Mel makes the movie tick along like the
engine in a 70's muscle car at high rev.  Mel plays Porter, a professional
thief trying to settle a score with his former partner, who stole Porter's
fair share of a heist.  Along the way, Porter runs afoul of the Chinese
Mafia, two crooked cops, his wife, his girlfriend, a sadistic prostitute,
and an assortment of mob bosses, all of whom stand in Porter's way... but
not for long.
What makes Payback work is the innate coolness of Porter.  Porter is the
coolest bad guy since Samuel L. Jackson in Jackie Brown (or Pulp Fiction,
take your pick), but with a more laconic, brutal attitude than Jackson's
smooth jive talk.  Porter is so cool that he makes Fonzie look like Bill
Gates.  .
Coolness is like the Supreme Court's definition of pornography:  difficult
to define, but we know it when we see it.  Take this scene:  a group of mob
bosses are staking out Porter's motel room in a big, flashy car.  Porter
sneaks under the car, cuts the gas line, and then stands behind the car
just long enough for the mob driver to see him.  And then slowly, he drops
his lit cigarette... which falls in a pool of gasoline... which leads back
to the car... which goes kaboom!  And we see Porter, through the smoke,
staring at the wreckage.  It's a cool moment in a cool movie, and it's
absolutely silent.  (Except for the kaboom.) Gibson doesn't have to say
anything, not even a Schwarzeneggerian one-liner.  His cool is intact.
To make things even better, Payback is a movie where uncommon coolness is a
common virtue.  Maria Bello is supercool as Porter's hooker girlfriend, but
she's easily outstripped (chuckle) by Lucy Alexis Liu's sadomasochistic
hooker-with-a heart-of-barbed-wire.  The gangsters are just as cool, with
William Devane, James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson all contributing to
the movie's ice-cold spirit.
The only real drawback to Payback was the two girls who sat behind me and
related plot points to each other the whole way through the movie.  I am
pleased to say that I resisted temptation and let this antisocial behavior
pass without resorting to violence or even an unkind word or two.  I hope,
however, that the Presidential Summit to Prevent Unnecessary Talking In
Movie Theaters gets underway soon.  It's time for Washington to lay off the
entertainment business for awhile and take an interest in the real problems
our country faces.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
We all know what a John Ford Western looks like, and what an Alfred
Hitchcock thriller looks like, and what a Frank Capra drama looks like.
And, amazingly enough, we all know what a Quentin Tarantino movie looks
like.  Amazing, I mean, becaus he's only directed three movies.  Not
that either Reservoir Dogs or Pulp Fiction arise to the level of The
Searchers, North by Northwest, or Meet John Doe, by any means, but
Tarantino has a style as distinctive as John Wayne's red bandanna or
Jimmy Stewart's stammer.
But the key to Tarantino movies has always been the dialogue.  That's
why True Romance is a "Tarantino movie", even though Tony Scott directed
Tarantino's screenplay.  That's why Pulp Fiction will be studied in film
schools long after films like Buddy and The Jackal have evaporated like
the smoke from a Red Apple cigarette.  And that's why Jackie Brown is
just a little bit short of being the best movie of the year.  (Which
would be Titanic.)
QT is working with an Elmore Leonard novel as his source material, and
his screenplay has taken pains to remain true to Leonard's snappy
dialogue.  Although he's transplanted the setting from South Florida to
the familiar suburban outback of Los Angeles, QT has studiously kept his
trademark conversational vignettes out of the movie.  Also, the native
quirkiness of Tarantino characters is curiously absent -- partially
because Tarantino's not working with his regular cast  (Tim Roth, Steve
Buscemi, Harvey Keitel, QT himself).  And there's not a Big Kahuna
Burger or a four-way gun confrontation in sight.
And yet, these are minor quibbles, important to only die-hard Tarantino
fans. (And QT does add several signature touches -- one funny
split-screen moment, one Indiana-Jones-type map, and the turning-point
of the movie, told in three different segments from three different
perspectives.)
Jackie Brown is a fine movie, driven by plot and dialogue rather than
car chases and shootouts.  At its center, it's a duel between ghetto
arms dealer Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson, in yet another
Oscar-worthy performance) and stewardess turned courier Jackie Brown
(Pam Grier, making a boffo return to the screen).  The winner will get
half a million dollars, the loser will die.
Ordell is a man who knows that it's good to be the king.  He rules his
large gun business and small harem like an empire, dealing ruthlessly
and efficiently with threats -- but he's a classy and smart king.
Jackson takes a character that could be instantly repellant and makes us
like and respect -- and fear -- him.  The only note that rings false
isn't Jackson's fault:  QT has grafted his musical taste onto Ordell's
character, and has him listening to the durndest music.
Where Ordell is powerful and commanding, Jackie Brown is dignified and
sharp.  Jackie is a 44-year-old stewardess on a cheesy airline, running
money for Ordell from Mexico.  An arrest by a federal marshal (Michael
Keaton, in a surprisingly colorless, Joe Friday role) forces Jackie to
try to walk a twisted tightrope to outwit both the feds and Ordell.
Grier is superb.  She makes Jackie Brown into a real person, rather than
just an older, wiser Foxy Brown.  We see Jackie in different moods:
quietly desparate in a small interrogation room, shouting down Ordell in
a tense confrontation in her apartment, tired yet dignified in getting
out of jail, alternately trying to overcome her nerves and then trying
to act nervous for the benefit of the cops, and in a wonderful scene,
rehearsing her fast-draw.
But the best reason to go see this movie is the one that no one
expected, the one that no one had ever even heard from in years:  Robert
Forster.   The veteran of such films as Maniac Cop 3: Badge of Silence,
Satan's Princess, The Kinky Coaches and the Pom Pom Pussycats, and Orgy
of the Nymphomaniacs somehow caught QT's eye, and got the part of bail
bondsman Max Cherry.  Forster isn't marquee-idol handsome, and his hair
plugs are painfully obvious, but he is...  Gary Cooper!  Yes!  When the
menacing Ordell explains that he doesn't have the money on him for a
bail bond, he replies calmly, in his flat, nasal voice:  "Is white guilt
supposed to make me forget that I run a business?"  Tough, smart, and
yet vulnerable to Jackie Brown's charms, Forster is a calm center of
gravity amidst the swirling plots and counterplots.  Maybe Forster
doesn't get an Oscar, but it's a crying shame that the Academy doesn't
give out a "Comeback Player of the Year" award.
However, the biggest disappointment in Jackie Brown is the performances
turned in by the veterans:  Michael Keaton and Robert DeNiro.  They're
both wasted in small, supporting roles -- Keaton as a hipster federal
marshal, DeNiro as a stoner ex-con.  DeNiro is primarily a sounding
board for Jackson, and for much of the movie, he sits around on the
couch with Bridget Fonda's surfer girl, smoking marijuana out of an
improbable statuette.  There's nothing wrong with any of their
performances, it's just that I would have like to have seen more use out
of this great cast.
But as good as the cast is, and a good as this movie is, the best thing
is this:  Jackie Brown makes me want to read more Elmore Leonard
novels.  That's a fine tribute to the skills of Jackson, Grier, and
Forster -- and especially to my main man, Quentin Tarantino.  In a
Hollywood obsessed with special effects, tiresome sequels, and unfunny
bathroom comedies, QT has once again proven that telling great stories
in a stylish and original way is magic.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"I don't want to study law," she said with the
same tone as if she had been saying, "I don't
want to turn into a cockroach."

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Usually, when audience members talk during a movie, it shows a fundamental
lack of disrespect to the moviemakers, the actors, and their fellow
patrons.  If they're talking about plot points they missed in the movie, it
shows that they're easily confused or just not paying attention.  If
they're talking about things other than the movie -- like where to go for
dinner afterward -- that's a sign that you're dealing with people who are
totally oblivious to their environment and to moviegoing etiquette.
I don't have any way to measure this, but I believe it's getting worse.  I
went to see Lawrence of Arabia last week at the Paramount Theater in Austin
(in 70mm format, the only way to go) and this woman behind me asked her
date what year the movie was set in... and he gave her a ten thousand word
masters thesis on World War I and the Triple Entente.  This intermixed with
a blow by blow account of the first ten minutes of the movie that she had
missed while standing in line to get popcorn.  He talked almost the whole
way through the movie... no mean feat when we're talking about a three-hour
movie.
I say that to say two things.  First, if you're the kind of person who
talks at movie theaters, you might want to consider renting movies instead,
so you can talk all you want without disturbing other people.
Second, Arlington Road has the best screenplay of the summer.  I know this
because during every slack moment in the second half of the movie, I could
hear everyone else in the theater whispering to each other, trying to keep
up with the twisty plot.  It wasn't individual voices as such, but a
general background buzz from bewildered people trying to figure out what
was coming next.
In this, possibly the dumbest summer in movie history, the summer of
Jar-Jar Binks, the summer dedicated to the glorification of the lowest
common denominator, Arlington Road is... Yes!  A Smart Movie!  Arlington
Road is not one of your artsy-fartsy Merchant Ivory films that you need a
degree in art history to appreciate, mind you, it's just a thriller... but
it's a smart thriller that stays two or three mental steps ahead of its
audience and never insults our intelligence by asking us to believe
anything really stupid.  The plot is simple enough -- a family of
terrorists move across the street from a terrorism expert, who gets
suspicious -- but the elaborations of that plot are deftly done.
For example, we know from the outset as an audience that the Tim Robbins
character is an evil terrorist.  We know this because movies about people
who have unfounded suspicions about their wacky neighbors don't do very
well.  We know this because of the credit sequence, which shows us
negatives of dogs and picket fences and crabgrass and lets us know that
evil lurks in the heart of suburbia.  And we know this because Robbins
plays his character with a featureless, dull exterior that proves that he's
hiding something.
But what makes Arlington Road so smart is that the Jeff Bridges character
doesn't know any of this stuff.  He's got his suspicions, but they're based
on next to nothing.  Bridges finds out, for example, that the Robbins
character is from St. Louis, where terrorists blew up that federal
building.  (Arlington Road pretends that the Murrah Building bombing took
place in St. Louis, but knows that we're smart enough to see through
this.)  Ipso facto, Robbins is a terrorist, right?  But Bridges can't make
anyone believe this but us.  There's one wrenching scene where he's trying
to explain things to Hope Davis (in the unappreciated girlfriend role), and
he's raving like a Class-A nutter, and she's holding him, and he can't stop
spouting off about how this guy next door is a terrorist.
Another sign of intelligence from Arlington Road is how it handles the
inherent insanity in the setup.  It makes sense, in a twisted, paranoid
sort of way, that the Bridges character would see terrorists everywhere,
but what would motivate the Robbins character to move right next door to
him?  (The housing shortage in DC isn't that bad, is it?)  Arlington Road
has an answer to this, one I won't share with you.
In fact, when you get right down to it, when you have a movie that's this
smart, with smart plot twists, there's not that much you can say about it
without spoiling the fun for everyone.  The minor things that help make the
movie work -- the pouty curve of Hope Davis's mouth, the perky smile of
Joan Cusack, the way the Robbins' two little girls look in plaid jumpers
while they bar the door to the house, the horrible things that happen to
Bridges's perfect hair during the course of the movie, Tim Robbins
lip-synching to the words of the Boy Scout oath --are great, but they're
secondary to the sinuous curve of the screenplay as it unwinds itself.
For all fans of Smart Movies, Arlington Road is as welcome as a tall glass
of lemonade during a heat wave, with smart performances, smart casting, and
smart directing complementing an exceptionally smart screenplay.  This...
yes!  is a movie to talk about.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
MAGNOLIA:  The Really, Really Loud Music of Chance
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Magnolia professes to be a movie about coincidence and chance, so I'll
give you a coincidence.  Saturday evening, a day in the life.  Do I go
catch the nine o'clock Magnolia showing at the Lincoln 6 or find some
other form of harmless entertainment at home?
Then the noise starts.  Boom Boom Boom BOOM.  Boom Boom Boom BOOM.  The
noise of my reprobate neighbor playing his stereo too loudly again.  All
I can hear is the bass line coming right through the wall, but that's
enough -- especially because he always plays the same song, with the
same monotonous beat.  I could bang on his door (yet again) or complain
to the apartment complex folks (yet again) or call the cops (which I
haven't done yet, but may have to) or go see Magnolia.  Magnolia seemed,
at the time, to be the lesser of the four evils.
Magnolia not only features a scene where a cop is called to check on a
noisy neighbor with an overloud stereo (there's your coincidence) but
it's got to be a contender for some Worst Use of a Soundtrack Award.
Magnolia has the obligatory rock-and-roll soundtrack, played at full
screech, of course.  That in itself is not so bad, but director Paul
Thomas Anderson frequently lets the soundtrack bleed over into the
conversation, making the audience strain to understand what's going on.
And that wouldn't be so bad without the opera music (inserted,
seemingly, to make critics characterize the movie as "operatic"), which
is followed by the classical harmonica trio.  And that wouldn't be so
bad if there wasn't a laughable moment -- straight out of one of those
Gap commercials -- where all the characters sing the same song, one
after the other.  And that wouldn't be so bad... if... if...
If it wasn't for the second-worst thing about Magnolia, which is the
incidental music.  It's the kind of music we've heard ever since
Psycho:  the monotonous repeating tones that signal a big emotional
climax.  Except, in Magnolia, the tones go on for ever... for hours...
and overlay overlapping scene after overlapping scene... and don't ever
lead to anything.  The overall effect is like a trip to the dentist.
It's just bad, no two ways about it, and the fact that this endlessly
mind-numbing music overlays several equally mind-numbing sequences of
boring, overlong exposition.  Magnolia explores many types of negative
emotion -- hate, resentment, anger, bitterness, guilt -- but I wasn't
feeling any of those, just an increasing sense of enervation that
bordered on actual physical pain.
The story of Magnolia is a mismatched jumble of seven or eight different
stories, like a prime time TV soap opera but less coherent.  Magnolia is
one of those movies where it's hard to tell the players without a
scorecard -- especially because they're introduced quickly, over one of
those overloud rock songs I was telling you about -- so here goes:
*  Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), television producer with lung cancer
*  Linda Partridge (Julianne Moore), Earl's wife, dealing with guilt and
depression
*  Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman), Earl's male nurse
*  Frank "T.J." Mackey (Tom Cruise), Earl's estranged son and wildly
over-the-top misogynistic self-help guru
*  Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), host of a game show produced by Earl
*  Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), a young contestant on the game show
in 1968
*  Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman), a current game show contestant
*  Cynthia (Felicity Huffman), game show producer who probably shouldn't
be in this list except that you should watch Sports Night and complain
when ABC takes it off the air
*  Claudia Gator (Melora Waters), Jimmy Gator's troubled daughter
*  Officer Jim (John C. "Chest Rockwell" Reilly), LAPD trooper who tells
Claudia to turn her music down and then stays for coffee
You would think that it would take a long time to tell all these stories
and find out all the varied ways that people interact with each other,
and you would be right.  You would think that there would be some good
acting with this collection of actors, and you would be right again.
And you would also think that this would take less than three hours.
You would be wrong.
There are any number of good things to recommend Magnolia, from the
lewd, hyperactive antics of Cruise to the gut-wrenching deathbed scene
of Robards to the touching way that Hoffman lights Robards's cigarette,
to the endearingly goofy way that Reilly talks to himself while he's
alone in the police car.  The worst thing about Magnolia is that they
are spread out over three excruciatingly long hours, and that all these
moments take so long to develop.
For example, there's a wonderful scene where Julianne Moore walks into a
pharmacy to pick up an armload of prescriptions.  The pharmacists are
suspicious and let Moore know of their suspicions in an annoying,
patronizing manner, causing Moore to scream at them in helpless rage.
It's a neat scene, but it's actually three or four tiny scenes that are
interspersed with tiny scenes from the other stories.  The final effect
is similar to reading five different James Patterson books serially, one
tiny chapter from one book followed by a chapter from another book, over
and over again.
So, is Magnolia worth seeing?  I didn't think so, not for awhile, until
I remembered another coincidence.
You see, I saw Magnolia on Saturday, January 8, 2000, the same day of
the Tennessee Titans - Buffalo Bills playoff game.  Both Magnolia and
the game ran a little over three hours.  The game was mostly dull, a
tight defensive struggle, but the Bills managed to score a go-ahead
field goal with twenty ticks left on the clock.  As the world knows, the
Titans took the ensuing kickoff back for the winning score on a
completely improbable, unexpected play.  The "Music City Miracle",
they're calling it in the papers today.  That one shattering,
heartbreaking play transformed an otherwiseblah game into something that
will be remembered for years.  And, coincidentally, there is a
shattering, completely unexpected moment towards the end of Magnolia
that you won't see coming.  It's not quite in the same league as a
kickoff return for a touchdown, mind you, but it's the most audacious
plot twist of the year.
In fact, I enjoyed the ending so much that I'm buying my neighbor a
ticket.  If nothing else, I may get three hours of peace and quiet for a
change.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"JANUARY 1, 1000:  This was the historic day that humanity celebrated
the dawn of our current millennium. The occasion was marked by feasting,
dancing, and the public beheading of a whiny, tedious group of people
who
would not stop insisting that, technically, the new millennium did not
begin until January 1, 1001."  -- Dave Barry

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The premise of Wag the Dog is so simple that it's adequately explained
by the commercials.  With 11 days to go until the election, the
President (who we never see) calls in political dirty-tricks artist
Robert DeNiro to distract attention from a burgeoning sex scandal.
DeNiro enlists Hollywood producer Dustin Hoffman to produce a "pageant",
a phony war against Albania, fought on the blue screens of Hollywood and
the recording studios of Nashville, with Woody Harrelson as the
reluctant, psychotic hero.  And if there wasn't anything more to the
movie than this, it would be a second-rate heist comedy at best,
enlivened by great actors -- like Sneakers Goes to Washington.  (A heist
comedy?  Yup.  DeNiro and Hoffman are "stealing" the election, so to
speak, and the movie is more about how they do it -- and the fun they
have doing it -- than anything else.)
Wag the Dog succeeds because it's based one great truth:  The American
people are stupid.  OK, maybe it's not "love thy neighbor as thyself" or
even "two plus two makes four", but a truth nonetheless.  (Any average
person who thinks that they're really smart about the two things this
movie satirizes -- moviemaking and the political process -- is invited,
nay, challenged, to spend a week either watching a movie actually being
made or 48 hours straight watching C-SPAN when the House is in
session.)  And because we're so utterly, predictably stupid, Hollywood
knows that a certain percentage of us will go see Hard Rain or Magoo,
Washington knows that  we won't notice a few million dollars spent here
and there on porno art grants and cigar subsidies -- and DeNiro's
character knows that American geography skills are so weak that we won't
be able to locate Albania on the map.
The beauty of Wag the Dog is that it isn't a light, meaningless comedy
about politics (like Speechless, the Michael Keaton - Geena Davis
picture) or from the level of light-hearted politcal satire to
near-greatness. Nor is it a hard-edged cynical look at the manner in
which a morally-deprived, ethically challenged baby-boomer connives his
sleazy way into the White House (like Primary Colors -- and yes, I am a
little disappointed in the way the last two elections turned out, thanks
for asking).  Instead, David Mamet's script strikes that delicate
balance between comedy and cynicism needed for satire.  It does this by
keeping us in a fantasy world where most of the schemers' schemes come
off beautifully, and fail only in entertaining and humorous fashion.
DeNiro is playing a variation on his  Al Capone character from The
Untouchables, without any of the violent rages. It's all:  "What do I
love?  What is it that brings me joy?  Baseball," minus the savage
bloody beating with the bat.  He threatens a lot of people, mind you,
but he's doing it in a very nice, polite way.  It's a very mellow,
restrained performance, which fits in with the air of gamesmanship in
the script.  Hoffman, on the other hand, is giddy, exuberant and
joyous.  This kind of thing is what his character lives for, and he's so
excited that he can't even shut up.  Even on the edge of disaster, he's
bright-eyed (behind oddly tinted sunglasses) and positive.  Insiders
note that he's basing his character on some powerful-but-anonymous
producer -- which may or may not be true, but Hoffman still exudes the
kind of lets-put-on-a-show electricity that you figure a producer needs
to have.
The best part and the most frustrating part of Wag the Dog is in the
supporting cast.  The characters are so well drawn and so well acted
that we want to see more of them, listen to them talk in that wised-up
Mamet dialogue, get to know them better -- which we don't.  Anne Heche,
is dead-bang-on in her portrayal of a political press aide -- cool and
composed on the outside, panicked and frenzied on the outside.  Denis
Leary (one of my favorite actors -- see The Ref) is the "Fad King", who
handles the profitable "back-end" -- T-shirt tie ins and shoe contracts
and other creative, innovative ways to separate a fool from his money.
They could make a whole movie, just about the Fad King, and I'd go see
it.  Willie Nelson and Merle Haggard handle the musical end of things
fabulously, from the upbeat gospel chorus theme song, to the weepy
country waltz, to the hilarious "Ballad of the Green Berets" parody.
Woody Harrelson has a brief, but memorable part as the overmedicated
"hero" of the Albanian conflict.  Craig T. Nelson, as the opposition
candidate, and the ever-reliable William H. Macy, as a wacky CIA agent,
are given surprisingly short shrift.  (One of my small gripes is that we
never see what the spin doctors on the other side are doing.)
Wag the Dog is a funny movie about serious problems:  the trivialization
of American politics, the role of the press in dumbing down the issues,
the impact of Hollywood in creating campaign commercials, the reduction
of all things political to soundbites and sidebars -- the list goes on.
We can solve most of these problems by taking a greater role in our
national life and educating ourselves as voters and citizens.  Wag the
Dog reminds us of what can happen if we don't.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"There's one thing that is forbidden on journeys by sled,
and that is whimpering.  Whining is a virus, a lethal,
infectious epidemic disease.  I refuse to listen to it."
  --  Peter Hoeg, "Smilla's Sense of Snow"
